Summary
"One Bed Apartments at Home X, with Integrated Appliances and Communal Gardens. Available from £107,625 for a 35% Share Through Shared Ownership. Call a member of our Sales Team for more information!"
"Kendrick Property Services are delighted to offer an opportunity to acquire a rare Grade l listed building in the heart of Brighton's famous Kemp Town. The work on Sussex Square started in 1823 with the original shell completed by 1827, these works were over seen by Thomas Kemp after whom Kemp To..."
"A perfect fusion of nautical Art Deco style and spectacular, uninterrupted sea views from an exclusive cliff top in Roedean, this luxury six bedroom home has sun soaked terraces facing the English Channel on every floor and the beautifully landscaped garden with a heated pool and hot tub faces so..."
RARELY AVAILABLE IMPRESSIVE GRADE II LISTED SEMI-DETACHED VICTORIAN VILLA SITUATED IN THE COVETED CLIFTON HILL CONSERVATION AREA OF CENTRAL BRIGHTON. THE HOME IS ARRANGED OVER FOUR FLOORS WITH A GUEST SUITE ON THE LOWER GROUND LEVEL AND THE RARE DISTINCTION OF OFF-STREET PARKING. GENEROUSLY PROPO...
"This sea facing home on Roedean Road is truly one of a kind, collaboratively designed by both the current owners and leading architects, Denizen Works… The brief for this project was simple, to maximise the flow of natural light and capture the incredible views within the key li..."
"Self-catering holiday house in Brighton 7 bedrooms sleeping up to 30+ per property The Railworks are two exceptional townhouses, each with seven en suite bedrooms, vast reception rooms and professional kitchens. They are being sold as a business opportunity for use as luxury shor..."
A luxurious and prestigious home located on Montpelier Terrace.
"GUIDE PRICE; £2,000,000--£2,250,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Family homes of this calibre don’t come onto the market every day. Newly renovated with an exceptional finish throughout, an abundance of o..."
"Classically beautiful and by the beach, this elegant Grade II listed Regency house embraces glorious views of the English Channel and has a sunny, south facing balcony to fully enjoy it. New life now breathes through this historic home in a sensitive restoration where harmonious proportions and p..."
"This magnificent and prominent building fronts onto the bustling Seven Dials and provides five floors of accommodation, currently occupied as B1 prestigious offices, with scope for a variety of alternative uses such as D1 medical or conversion to a grand Regency house or residential Mansion apart..."
"Planning consent = unique opportunity! Soaring above Brighton Marina in a spectacular coastal setting, this fabulous four bedroom house with a south facing garden and sea facing terraces on three existing levels offers an interesting choice -you can either just add the finishing touches to a glam..."
"Marine Parade £2,250,000 This unique house is located in the perfect seafront position, with uninterrupted sea views to the front and Kemp Town village behind. The Property has undergone extensive refurbishment and has been finished to the highest of standards. There are two entrances to ..."
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 4-bedroom Kemp houses are architecturally unique with superior specifications and details externally and internally. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
"Here we have an excellent opportunity to acquire stunning, five newly converted flats with many offering private patio gardens in a sought after residential location! These properties have been finished to an extremely high specification throughout and benefits from a fabulous open plan living ar..."
"The exclusive homes opposite Queen’s Park simply do not appear on the market often and this magnificent six bedroom Edwardian house has been sensitively modernised to create an effortlessly sociable home with a garage, off street parking and formal garden at the front, and a beautiful oasis..."
"**RESERVE YOUR BESPOKE HOME NOW- 2 REMAINING ** The Orchard is a stunning bespoke contemporary development of four 4 bedroom houses in a woodland setting in Ovingdean. These homes offer private gardens and courtyard, EV parking facilities and garages, and are built to an outstanding specifica..."
"***** ONLY TWO REMAINING ***** ***View our Interactive 360 Degree State-of-the-Art Immersion Tour*** AN INCREDIBLY MODERN DETACHED NEWLY BUILT SIX BEDROOM HOUSE WELL-SITUATED IN A GATED COMPLEX IN THE EVER-DESIRABLE ROEDEAN AREA. WITH FANTASTIC COASTAL VIEWS, SECURE OFF-STR..."
"*** LAST TWO REMAINING - ASKING PRICE £1,750,000 *** ***View our Interactive 360 Degree State-of-the-Art Immersion Tour*** AN ULTRA MODERN DETACHED NEW BUILD FOUR BEDROOM HOUSE PERFECTLY POSITIONED IN A GATED COMPLEX IN THE EVER-DESIRABLE ROEDEAN AREA. WITH FANTASTIC ..."
"FIRST HOUSE RESERVED OFF-PLAN - PLOT 39 - BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 4-bedroom Montpelier house is a stunning flint fronted, double gabled with superior specifications and detailing. Visit Brookworth.com for more information."
"Substantial double fronted home offering sympathetically restored spacious accommodation with a delightful rear garden, located in the sought after Golden Triangle area of Brighton."
A simply stunning detached family residence situated in an idyllic position at the foot of the South Downs close to everything Brighton and Hove has to offer!
"A fantastic, detached family home in an excellent position at the foot of the South Downs, close to everything Brighton and Hove has to offer! Off Street parking for several cars is available and the impressive energy rating of this home ensures the home runs efficiently and cost effectively."
"**AVAILABLE TO RESERVE NOW** A newly constructed three bedroom house, ideally positioned adjacent to Preston Park. The spacious house extends to 1,776 ft² (165 m²) and benefits from its own landscaped garden, allocated parking space and a 10 year new homes warranty. ** Choice of some int..."
"The coastal village of Ovingdean nestles at the foot of protected Downland which rolls to the sea and this historic, flint faced barn is in prime position on the small green by the 11th century St Wulfran’s Church. Beautifully converted into a luxury four-bedroom house with landscaped, sout..."
"Guide Price £1,600,000 - £1,700,000 This charming former coach house is hidden behind an imposing brick wall, leaving much to the imagination on what might be on the other side. As you pass through the charming gate, an enchanting house unveils itself, drawing you in furthe..."
"WAS £260,000 (17/03/23 to 27/03/23) Now £250,000 - 1 Bed, Lower Ground floor Garden Flat available with no onward chain. The Accommodation comprises briefly of, double bedroom, with bay window, lounge dining area, kitchen with access to a spacious rear garden and bathroom. The propert..."
"An attractive property in a quiet position within the village of Ovingdean, with a useful annexe which could offer multi-generational living, or be used as a holiday let, and far-reaching views. The main house has three beds and two baths, whilst the annexe offers bedroom, bathroom and kitchen."
"Auction Date: SOLD PRIOR TO AUCTION Auction Guide £1,600,000 Mixed freehold residential/commercial landmark building with planning permission that has already been implemented to form 3 additional flats within the roof space to provide for 2 x 1 bedroom flats and a studio flat. ..."
"A superbly presented 5 bedroom, 2 bathroom semi-detached Victorian villa with a garage and driveway."
"With the wow factor the moment you walk into its sculpted hallway, this sun filled 5 bedroom detached house frames glorious sea views from its elevated position 2 minutes from the beaches and picturesque High Street of Rottingdean - and just 10 from Brighton. With an integral garage and plentiful..."
"Guide Price £1,500,000 to £1,600,000 A magnificent detached 5-bedroom period property set within private wrap-around gardens in the highly sought-after Surrenden district of Brighton and ideally placed for Withdean Park and some of the best schools in the city. Originally the farmhouse ..."
"Architect designed and remodelled, this substantial family home is situated on one of Brighton and Hove’s most prestigious locations. It is immaculately presented throughout, with fantastic room sizes and a southerly aspect to fill the house with natural light. Beautifully renovated, the ground f..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,500,000--£1,600,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Set within the renowned ‘Golden Triangle’ district of the city, this beautifully renovated and exceptionally spacious Victorian house ..."
Beautifully presented property with many period features and stylish modern touches in a fantastic central location.
"Guide Price £1,500,000 to £1,750,000 A fantastic opportunity to acquire a most fabulous, opulent converted church in the heart of Brighton. Officially dedicated in 1887 as ‘The French Protestant Church of Brighton’ this wonderful property held regular church services until its ..."
"*** Guide Price £1,500,000 to £1.750,000 *** Incredible 6 bedroom detached mock Tudor house located in the historic village of Rottingdean. This beautiful home boasts six bedrooms, four bathrooms as well as a contemporary one bedroom Garden Studio overlooking the rolling South Downs N..."
"A beautifully refurbished five bedroom detached house located in Brighton's prime address, Dyke Road. This magnificently presented house has easy access into and out of Brighton and makes a perfect home for a growing family."
"Boasting an enviable address at the end of this highly desirable cul-de-sac, we are delighted to offer this deceptively spacious, detached family home with beautifully presented, versatile accommodation which spans three impressive floors and measures an impressive 3008 sqft/286 sqm. Whilst the p..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,400,000--£1,500,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. CHAIN FREE. This exceptional, seven-bedroom detached family home sits in the green and leafy environs of Preston Valley; just minutes ..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,400,000--£1,500,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. As the most substantial house on the road, this beautiful family home has undergone a complete transformation in recent years to include a full re..."
Superb five/six bedroom detached house recently refurbished to a high standard. This impressive home offers extremely versatile living accommodation. Built in the 1920’s this stunning Tudor style property has a new kitchen/dining room and a fantastic sun room.
"AN ELEGANT, FIVE STOREY GRADE II LISTED REGENCY TOWNHOUSE, CENTRALLY-POSITIONED IN BRIGHTON. THE PROPERTY BOASTS AN ATTRACTIVE PRIVATE SOUTH FACING FRONT GARDEN, A ROOF TERRACE, TWO PRETTY SOUTH FACING BALCONIES AND AN ARRAY OF PERIOD FEATURES. AN ENCLOSED PARKING SPACE ACCESED BY A GARAGE DOOR A..."
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom detached Brunswick houses have superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom detached Palmeira houses have superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
"Behind this traditional facade lies a modern, spacious family home boasting over 3000 sq ft of space with a large Southerly facing level rear garden, swimming pool & pool house. The property has been cleverly extended and really must be viewed to be fully appreciated. Upon entry you are greeted b..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,250,000---£1,300,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Surrounded by mature trees on a peaceful close in Withdean, this beautiful five-bedroom detached family home feels every inch the country abode, yet it remains well-connected with excel..."
"Enjoying an enviable position within this sought after Historical Village, on one of the most desirable roads in the area. A rare opportunity to acquire a substantial corner plot with potential to build 3 new houses (subject to planning consents). The plot is currently occupied by a substantial 3..."
"An idyllic four bedroom detached family home situated on a beautiful tree-lined residential street conveniently located between Preston Park and Withdean. Features include a South facing garden, three reception rooms, a garage and off road parking."
"*** OFFERS IN THE REGION - £1,250,000 *** A WELL-PRESENTED AND GENEROUSLY-SIZED SEMI-DETACHED VICTORIAN FAMILY HOME WITH FOUR/FIVE BEDROOMS, A LARGE REAR GARDEN, TWO BALCONIES, A PRIVATE DRIVEWAY AND TWO GARAGES LOCATED IN THE HIGHLY-SOUGHT AFTER DYKE ROAD AREA CLOSE TO PRESTON P..."
" ** Guide Price £1,250,000 - £1,350,000 **  This beautiful four bedroom house enjoys a fashionable setting on the edge of Kemptown Village where you are never far from fresh coffee, quiet pubs and restaurants. With four generous levels, this majestic hous..."
"A rare gem with a sociable, south facing terrace and a courtyard in legendary Kemptown Village, this tranquil four/five bedroom Victorian beauty has timeless charm and a glorious 176.8m2 (1903 square feet) in which to work, rest or play. Inside, generous proportions have been subtly enhanced to o..."
**No Onward Chain** This beautifully presented and recently refurbished first-floor apartment sits moments away from Brighton Seafront and is a short walk to the City Centre. The wonderful open-plan living area and fitted kitchen are flooded with plenty of natural light from floor-to-cei...
" ** Guide Price £1,250,000 - £1,350,000 **  Soaring above 7.5 acres of garden enclosures for the residents with a secret tunnel to the beach, this award winning three-bedroom penthouse in Grade I listed Sussex Square has stunning views of the English Chan..."
"Fabulous from the immaculate Victorian frontage to a secret oasis of south facing double patio garden at the back, this beautifully proportioned three/four-bedroom house in fashionable Kemptown Village has a magnificent blend of period detail and designer finish throughout 4 stylish storeys provi..."
"Exciting opportunity to purchase an absolutely unique property in Crescent Road, currently arranged as a house with extensive gardens, and self-contained flat. Extraordinary six-metre reception room."
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom 3-storey Marine town houses offer superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
"Designed by the highly regarded Turner Associates, Brighton, this modern property has been thoughtfully conceived to fit in with the surrounding architecture. It offers 5 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms and a lovely open ground floor L-Shape reception space, as well as ample parking with EV charging point."
Prime | Plot | Brighton In prime position on the crescent; this chalet house sits on the highest single plot stretching from Peacock Lane through to Surrenden Crescent. The house is already...
"***Guide Price £1,100,000 - £1,200,000*** This stunning, extended, detached house with garage and large South facing garden. Situated in this extremely popular location close to Preston Park station and many schools."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,100,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. On an exclusive no through, private road this tranquil, four bedroom house is a rare find, designed and built for a luxury lifestyle in its own large grounds with ..."
"Situated in the favoured 'Golden Triangle' this 4 bedroom bay fronted Victorian semi detached property has been extended to provide a 4th bedroom with ensuite shower and on the ground floor to form a 19'6"" x 15'1"" kitchen/family room which connect to a westerly rear garden. "
"Coming to the market for the first time in over 25 years this much loved 4 bedroom family home offers spacious accommodation with views over the water from all the principle rooms and comes with a private 12m mooring. Features include drawing room, kitchen, dining room, study, two bedrooms with e..."
"A spacious and substantial family home situated on a prominent and larger than average corner plot. The property accommodation comprises of a spacious living room with solid wood flooring, triple aspect and stunning sea views. There is a fitted kitchen with attached dining room and separate utili..."
"This property is a rare opportunity to acquire a spacious, detached house in a sought-after location with planning permission for extension and improvement. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate all that this fantastic property has to offer. "
"Offers Over £1,100,000 Beautiful five bedroom detached family home in the heart of Rottingdean Village."
*** GUIDE PRICE £1.1M - £1.25M *** A rare opportunity to acquire a refurbishment or development opportunity in a sought after road within the historic and picturesque village of Ovingdean. A desirable position which is currently occupied by a spacious 3 bedroom detached bungalow with extremel...
"GUIDE PRICE £1,100,000 - £1,200,000 Set in a commanding position with impressive views across Preston Park and towards the South Downs is this generous Edwardian home with over 2269 sq ft or 210 sqm of living space. As you would expect this double fronted home is a delight having been sy..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this impressive 4/5 bedroom, double fronted Victorian home which has been fully modernised but retains many original period features including fireplaces, ceiling covings, stripped wooden floorboards and sash windows."
Newlands Road - Five Brand New family homes in stunning contemporary design 
"Fox & Sons are delighted to offer you this 5-6 bedroom detached house with south facing terraces which wrap around the house maximising the views of the Downs and the sea. The pool room includes a gym, sauna and indoor pool which is also located next to the annex."
"* READY SPRING 2023 * Plot 46 A BRAND NEW four bedroom detached family home featuring a large open plan lounge/dining area, spacious kitchen & high specification finishes throughout. The property includes a ground floor study, utility room, south-west facing garden & private driveway."
"GUIDE PRICE: £1,000,000--£1,100,000. OPEN DAY SATURDAY 1ST APRIL. VIEWING BY APPOINTMENT ONLY. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Design led from the lavender scented garden at the front to the generous, west facing sun trap at the ba..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase this expansive home situated in the historic South Lanes of Brighton. The property has over 2,000 sq/ft of versatile accommodation, a fabulous sauna and two private roof terraces."
"A Delightful Four Storey 4/5 Bedroom Period Home | Guide Price £1,000,000 - £1,100,000 | This wonderfully spacious, light and character-filled period house has been well maintained and offers vast, versatile living accommodation over four floors and has two patio areas. Viewings are a..."
"Sitting on a quiet mews, tucked away behind Regency Square and just moments from the beach and city centre, sits a fantastic investment and development opportunity. It comes in the form of an entirely unique four-bedroom house which is brimming with potential to add considerable value. Originally..."
"Two minutes from the playground and cafés of Queen’s Park with five big bedrooms, a large cellar and a sunny west facing garden this beautiful Victorian house is a within a golden, 3 minute triangle of sought after primary schools including outstanding St Luke’s, the Royal Suss..."
"**READY FOR A SPRING COMPLETION** 37 Edward Street Quarter is part of Brighton's newest eclectic community where the best of the city will live, mix and meet. 60 luxurious one, two and three bed apartments, minutes from the sea and city centre; many with stunning coastal views. If you thrive ..."
"Beautifully renovated and perfectly positioned close to the beach, the City Centre and Seven Dials, this exceptional four-bedroom townhouse is a hidden gem in the city. It sits in Brighton & Hove’s most prestigious conservation area; Clifton Hill & Montpelier, abundant with original..."
A simply stunning four double bedroom detached family home positioned in a prime location on one of Brighton's most prestigious roads close to everything the city has to offer.
"**Guide price £1,000,000 - £1,150,000** This exclusive new development is quietly hidden away on a quirky one-way street right in the cultural heart of the city, WITH OFF STREET PARKING! Whilst the outside of this house looks very traditional, a clue to the contemporary delights within ..."
"A boutique development of a 7 Bedroom maisonette with 6 bathrooms. All recently having undergone an extensive refurbishment with modern touches, with show stopping reception space for the holiday let market"
"*** OFFERS OVER £1,000,000 *** BEAUTIFULLY-PRESENTED FIVE BEDROOM THREE STOREY EDWARDIAN SEMI DETACHED HOUSE. NO ONWARD CHAIN. STUNNING VIEWS FROM THE ROOF TERRACE OUT ACROSS PRESTON PARK. Situated in a prime residential area offering easy access to central Brighton &..."
"This is an impressive, high specification, detached family home. With the accommodation arranged over three floors there are five bedrooms and four bathrooms. The master bedroom has a dressing room along with a luxury bathroom. Outside is a good sized rear garden and a large driveway & garage."
This newly refurbished freehold property located in the heart of Brighton City centre offers buyers a great investment opportunity. This freehold property is in a prime location and is mad...
"This stylish, contemporary, four bedroom home is tucked away in a quiet, yet desirable street in the heart of the Montpelier and Clifton Hill Conservation area. The property is arranged as two separate dwellings, perfect for a growing family or additional income. This stunning property has recent..."
"Mill House is a stunning four bedroom home dating back to the 1650's which has been sympathetically restored and is now offered for sale in excellent decorative order. The property boasts two luxury bathrooms, including an en-suite shower room as well as a separate studio, making the ideal home o..."
"Abundant with original Victorian period detail spread over four generous floors, this beautiful five-bedroom townhouse is immediately impressive. It has previously been used as a luxury holiday let for large parties visiting the city, catering for up to 28 people, but it would also be a stunning ..."
A most attractive 3/4 bedroom detached family house situated in this highly favoured residential close to the delightful Withdean Park and with a delightful secluded 100' level mature rear garden. * * NO ONWARD CHAIN * * 
"Suberbly styled, interior designed home in the Clifton & Montpelier conservation area. From the glass-roofed dining space, to the exposed bungaroosh wall in the bathroom, the house exudes elegance and charm from top to bottom. Close to the city centre & offered with no chain."
"An impressive 5 -bedroom, 3 -bathroom family house with historic proportions, large light cellar and a stylish kitchen dining room that flows out to a private walled courtyard garden, separate formal reception room, and contemporary bathrooms. All the generous double bedrooms have space for home ..."
"Mishon Mackay are proud to present this staggeringly large 5-bedroom end of terrace house on Hanover Place, also known as Hanover House. The house is split across four floors and presents large proportions including the mightily impressive open-plan kitchen dining space which leads out to a priva..."
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom semi-detached Adelaide houses have superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom semi-detached Arundel houses have superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
"GUIDE PRICE £950,000 to £985,000 Maslen Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this 5-6 double bedroom detached family home in a SOUGHT-AFTER AREA of Woodingdean, close to a FREQUENT BUS SERVICE offering EASY ACCESS TO THE CITY CENTRE. Some of the property highlights include the be..."
"An elegant five-bedroom red brick Victorian family home, tastefully and stylishly decorated, benefitting from a South facing garden with home office, off road parking and many period features throughout. "
"OIEO £950,000Hilltop is situated in one of the most prestigious locations of the Withdean area, on a quiet lane set back from Dyke Road. Perfectly positioned between the South Downs National Park and the city. Within walking distance is Preston Park railway station providing excel..."
"Stunning two bedroom lower ground apartment located in Eastern Terrace, one of the most popular of Kemp Town’s Grade II listed Georgian terraces. The house was built in 1828, and is separated from the coast road by a communal garden."
"Hamlyn Smith are delighted to present this wonderful, four-bedroom, period property in Rock Grove, which has access to the extensive gardens of Kemp Town Enclosures. Elegant accommodation is arranged over three floors, and there is a private roof terrace."
"A beautifully presented and extended detached bungalow having well laid out and spacious accommodation with particularly large living area, located towards the entrance of this exclusive private cul-de-sac adjacent to Dyke Road Avenue. Offered for sale with potential to extend and develop subject..."
"This impressive three floor maisonette can be found just a block inland from Brighton Beach and has not only use of the Kemp Town Enclosures but also its own private roof terrace. Internally there are 4 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms and a gorgeous living room."
"A beautifully presented 4 bedroom bay fronted Victorian terraced house having the benefit of a bright and sunny 52' west facing rear garden, and being situated in the highly favoured 'Golden Triangle' forming part Preston Park Conservation Area. * * VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED * * NO ONWARD CHAIN * *"
"This is a beautifully presented and elegant four bedroom semi detached house built in 2019 with seven years NHBC remaining. This property has a lovely living room which opens on to the westerly garden, a contemporary kitchen, bathroom and ensuites to two bedroom. Garage. Viewing Essential"
"A stunning and architecturally designed 4 bedroom detached house with an impressive roof terrace, situated in a sought after location between Dyke Road and Preston Road. Viewings are highly recommended."
"With a guide price of £950000-£985000 Welcome to Downs Valley Road nestled in the leafy suburbs of popular Woodingdean, this gorgeous 5-6 bedroom family home is just a stone’s throw from the rolling South Downs and boasts spectacular sea views of Brighton’s glistening c..."
BRAND NEW Skylarks development by Brookworth Homes - The 3-bedroom semi-detached Sussex houses have superior specifications and detailing throughout. Visit Brookworth.com for more information.
"Incredible interior design, a wealth of original features and exceptional sea views greet you in this beautiful two-bedroom apartment on Kemptown Seafront. It is immediately clear that the current owner has a refined eye for colour and interior design, celebrating the original character of the ho..."
"DUPLEX APARTMENT - FLAT 3 (FLAT 4 - SSTC) 1ST & 2ND FLOORS A stunning development of 4 luxury apartments in the idyllic village of Rottingdean, all with sea-facing terraces, panoramic views, underfloor heating, allocated parking, and lift access to all floors. With its quint..."
"A simply breath taking three/four bedroom, one/two reception room duplex apartment with uninterrupted sea views and two balconies. The accommodation is arranged over two floors and spans approximately 132 square meters/1,430 square feet and offers versatile living and lift access to all floors. "
"Hamptons is delighted to offer this stunning development of 4 new luxury apartments (one already reserved) in the picturesque village of Rottingdean. One 3-bed duplex penthouse and two 2-bed apartments are available, all boasting individual terraces with panoramic sea-views and allocated parking."
What a view!!! This stunning duplex penthouse apartment offers direct sea views from two private terraces for those romantic alfresco breakfast mornings. Imagine also having the views from inside too.... well look no further because with this home you can enjoy a stormy evening with front row sea...
"* READY TO MOVE INTO * This incredible brand new 3 bedroom penthouse is a one of a kind home. Finished to a luxurious standard throughout. This stunning home boasts spectacular views of the sea, also benefitting from a private balcony and allocated parking.*CALL TO BOOK YOUR APPOINTMENT*"
"Fox & Sons are delighted to present to you this Arts & Crafts style four bedroom semi-detached house situated with direct uninterrupted views of the sea. This well appointed house has 3 reception areas, Inglenook fireplace, kitchen, 2 bathrooms, conservatory, garage and gardens."
"**BOOK YOUR TOUR** Stunning penthouse apartment spanning over 1,000 sqft featuring a full length sunny terrace with breath-taking panoramic coastal views. Double reception room with pale Oak Herringbone wooden flooring and 4 sets of French doors bringing the outside in. Situated in Brighton's..."
Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented 3 bedroom family home in the heart of Patcham. Starting at the front you have a large driveway for parking of up to 4 cars. Upon entering the property you are greeted with a large hallway with ample space for coat...
"A mid terrace Georgian house located in a popular, sought after and central location, with spacious and flexible accommodation arranged over four floors."
"3 Bedroom Home - Quality living in a convenient location The Mews presents the opportunity to live in a popular area of Brighton offering a mix of one, two and three bedroom homes. Benefitting from a secure gated setting, these properties feature impressive finishes including bespoke S..."
"***Guide Price Of £900,000 - £950,000***
A beautifully presented three bedroom Victorian house located on a peaceful residential street in the heart of the City. The house has been magnificently restored and refurbished to a high standard making it the perfect property to move straight ..."
Fox & Sons is delighted to offer this beautifully presented four bedroom detached chalet bungalow has been renovated and improved to a high standard throughout. Located in one of the most desirable roads in the village of Rottingdean. Sold with no onward chain.
"Guide Price £900,000 to £1,000,000 An immaculately presented six bedroom detached family home boasting in excess of 3600 square feet and set in one of the most sought after roads in the highly desirable Woodingdean area. Having undergone extensive renovation over recent years, this prope..."
"Modern detached house in a private gated mews. It has parking, a south facing garden and three double bedrooms. The garage has been developed into office/occasional bedroom and the kitchen has been extended to create a modern open plan room that has the real 'WOW' factor."
"Fox & Sons are proud to bring to the market this mock Tudor semi-detached family house. The property comprises of three double bedrooms, two bathrooms, large living room, modern kitchen, separate dining room, large rear garden, garage and parking for 2 to 3 cars to the front."
"A substantial freehold mixed-use investment comprising a shop and basement plus a self-contained 3 bedroom registered HMO above. The shop is let on a 12 year lease from July 2018 at a passing rent of £28,000 per annum whilst the maisonette is let on an AST at £2,200 per month providing ..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £900,000--£1,000,000. CHAIN FREE. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Architect designed and built-in 2006 using bespoke eco technologies and lighting systems for energy optimisation– this house was way ahead of its time. Entirel..."
"Guide Price- £900,000- £950,000 Arranged over three floors this beautifully presented family home is sympathetic, yet contemporary in its finish. As you enter the property, a spacious hallway provides access to all rooms on the ground floor. To the front of the property is the living roo..."
"Guide Price £900,000 - £950,000 Situated in Rottingdean Village, this stunning four bedroom detached house has been wonderfully refurbished and improved."
"Guide Price £900,000- £950,000. This lovely, detached family home is in the popular Withdean area and boasts just under 1,700 sq ft. Located on this quiet tree-lined road in Brighton, this is one not to miss!"
"Four Bedroom detached house in an elevated position, allowing for some breath-taking views in one of the most desirable cul-de-sacs in Rottingdean."
ST MARGARETS PLACE  - VIEWING BY APPOINTMENT - CONTACT HANOVER HOMES - A rare opportunity to acquire a spacious freehold in very central Brighton location. The property is currently arranged as a 3-4 Bedroom upper maisonette with a separate one bedroom lower ground floor flat.
"An attractive and spacious 4/5 bedroom bay fronted Victorian terraced house situated in the favoured Preston Park Conservation Area, enjoying the benefit of a south facing rear garden with 16' x 9' workshop/summerhouse and having over 1,800 sq ft (170 sqm) of versatile living space. "
"An attractive and spacious 4 bedroom Victorian terraced house situated in the favoured 'Golden Triangle' forming part of the sought after Preston Park Conservation area, the property retains many period features including period fireplaces, decorative ceiling covings and stripped floorboards. "
"A rare opportunity to acquire this beautifully presented ‘Tudor style’ semi detached family house with a large 160’ rear garden and enjoying an open aspect with extensive views towards the Chattri and the South Downs. Positioned in one of Patcham's premier roads, this property is one not to be mi..."
"Exquisite Three Bedroom Victorian Home In Montpelier & Clifton Hill | This beautiful & impeccably maintained period residence boasts three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, a spectacular kitchen / breakfast room and a private West facing rear garden all located in such a sought after ..."
Generous four bedroom detached house with a newly built large one bedroom annexe in the rear.
"This is a well presented five bedroom detached house offering superb family accommodation comprising: 27 x 21' living room, 27' kitchen/dining room, utility room, ensuite to master bedroom, family bathroom & gf shower room, integral garage and good size rear garden. Sought after location."
"An attractive detached four bedroom family home which occupies a generously sized plot with a self-contained detached annexe at the rear, in a popular residential area just up from Falmer Road and close to Happy Valley Park with elevated views at the front of the South Downs and the sea beyond. T..."
"A luxury retreat with countryside views which roll to the sea, this detached four bedroom house has off street parking for several cars and a glamorous, self-contained one bedroom annexe in the large sunny garden. 2 minutes from a popular primary school, 1 from Happy Valley Park and 4 from local ..."
Large detached home with lots of character and charm located on a sought after road in Patcham. The property benefits from having parking to the front and a patio and lawned garden to the rear.
"A 3-minute stroll from our famous beaches but tucked away from the tourist trail, this beautiful four-bedroom historic home enjoys a fashionable setting on the edge of Kemptown Village where you are never far from fresh coffee and a croissant -or a restaurant. With four generous levels, inside th..."
A unique opportunity to purchase a substantial detached three/four-bedroom family home offered to market in good condition with enormous potential for further enlargement throughout subject to the relevant consents.
"Guide Price £850,000 - £900,000 | Freehold | Four bedrooms | Five storey | Sea views |Cosmopolitan location |Large kitchen/breakfast room | Spacious living room on raised ground floor | Bathroom and additional shower room ensuite to principal bedroom | Courtyard Garden | Close to beach"
"*** OFFERS OVER £850,000 *** LOCATED ON A BEAUTIFUL TREE LINED ROAD IN THE EVER POPULAR PRESTON PARK AREA; A SUBSTANTIAL FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH A LARGE SOUTH FACING GARDEN, A SIZEABLE GARAGE AND A DRIVEWAY. Arranged across two floors, this considerable..."
"GUIDE PRICE £850,000 TO £900,000 A delightful home? An investment? A plot? This fantastic property has so much flexibility and features a superb cottage to the front and a garage and self-contained flat to the rear of the site."
"Steeped in history, this unique and stylish five-bedroom property was originally the Tilley’s horse-bus stables during the late 19th Century, then converted to a cinema and theatre until 1956 when it was converted again to a residential property. In more recent years it has been a luxury ho..."
"An exceptionally spacious 5 bedroom, 3 bathroom Victorian terraced house with a sunny west facing rear garden. The accommodation offers 1,603 sqft (149 sqm) of versatile living space which is arranged over 4 floors. "
A superb opportunity to live in one of the nicest areas in Brighton and having the chance to make this already fantastic house your own. Featuring a large garden with far reaching views over the South Downs and a modern open plan kitchen diner with space for the whole family.
A delightful four bedroom detached family home situated in a prime location and benefitting from a high specification throughout!
"Guide Price £850,000 - £900,000 Absolutely superb five-bedroom contemporary home, with extraordinary views, a garden, a garage, and luxuries that include smart lighting, ethernet in every room, underfloor heating, and a steam room."
"Situated in the picturesque village of Ovingdean, this three double bedroom attractive home enjoys a semi-rural location yet is only a 10-minute drive along the coast from central Brighton. Offering three bedrooms with stylish accommodation arranged over two floors. The home has been completely r..."
"3 Bedroom Home - Available to Reserve Quality living in a convenient location The Mews presents the opportunity to live in a popular area of Brighton offering a mix of one, two and three bedroom homes. Benefitting from a secure gated setting, these properties feature impress..."
"This vast detached family house is set back off the road. The abundance of living space on offer gives you the potential for further development, the ideal home to put your own stamp on.The generous, sunny rear garden is the cherry on the cake!"
"John Hiltons are pleased to be able to offer as sole agent this delightful four bedroom, two reception room detached family home which enjoys an elevated position with seas views, close to local shops in favoured West Saltdean. Internally, well arranged accommodation is considered spacious - enj..."
** DETACHED 3 BED PROPERTY WITH PANORAMIC VIEWS | MATURE GARDEN | GARAGE | OFF-ROAD PARKING | SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION**
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this 4/5 double bedroom townhouse with desirable East/West facing aspects with water views from all main rooms. Well presented the property features a quality kitchen/dining room, spacious living room leading to the West facing waterside patio, 2 bedrooms ..."
Four bedroom two bathroom detached house with lovely gardens in popular Rottingdean.
"A simply stunning, modern four-bedroom detached family home offered to market with no onward chain and located in an elevated position enjoying magnificent rooftop, sea and down land views."
"**£800,000 - £850,000** This four bedroom family home is perfect for those who appreciate modern living, luxury and style. Located in the highly desirable Tivoli Crescent, conveniently situated near local amenities, reputable schools, and excellent transport links, making i..."
"Guide Price £800,000 - £850,00 Attractive detached four bedroom home with great views and NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"Nestled in the heart of Patcham this charming, detached home offers a tranquil escape from the hustle and bustle of city life."
"Guide Price £800,000 to £850,000 This great 4 bedroom home on Barn Rise, Westdene is the perfect property, being flooded with natural light and spanning over 1,840 square feet, situated opposite an open green and within a stone’s throw of Westdene Primary School. As you enter you are imm..."
"A truly unique smallholding on the very edge of the City boundary, extending to some 2 acres with a Certificate of Lawfulness (CLU) for 2 residential dwellings. The property offers enormous scope to create a secluded, yet accessible, homestead."
"GUIDE PRICE: £800,000--£850,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Peacefully situated in an attractive Edwardian terrace, this elegant family home has been beautifully maintained by the current owners in the 23-years they have lived here, with an immaculat..."
"*** OFFERS OVER £800,000*** A THREE STOREY VICTORIAN SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE WITH FOUR GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS, A SPACIOUS REAR GARDEN AND A BRIGHT CONSERVATORY. THE PROPERTY IS SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN AND SITUATED CLOSE TO PRESTON PARK. This spacious family home offers an a..."
"An opportunity to acquire this lovely deceptively spacious four bedroom detached chalet style house set in lovely secluded gardens. Comprising: lounge 22' having feature fireplace, master bedroom with ensuite dressing room and bathroom , ensuite ground floor bedroom 3, garage with private driveway"
"GUIDE PRICE £800,000-£850,000 This exceptionally spacious Four bedroom detached bungalow offers an excellent opportunity to enhance and personalise. Having been heavily extended, boasting almost 2000 sq ft of internal floor space including the oversized double garage and storeroom at str..."
"***Guide Price £800,000 - £850,000***
An amazing three bedroom end of terraced Victorian property which boasts plenty of character and period features with ample accommodation and a rear patio garden. The property is situated in Clifton Hill conservation area, commonly known as the Mayf..."
"GUIDE PRICE; £800,000--£850,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Built as a show home in 1932 for the Braybon Show on a site in North Street, Brighton to advertise new, detached properties to be built on the Bevendean Estate, approximately two years later..."
"** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three bedroom mid terraced house in the ever popular roundhill area in Brighton. Upon entering the house you have a large hallway with ample space for coats and shoes, moving through the the open..."
"A substantial and immaculately presented detached house arranged over three floors, offering versatile accommodation, ideal for family occupation, with room to spread out. Occupying a large plot in a favoured location opposite the South Downs, close to local amenities, local schools and frequent ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £800,000 - £850,000Valley Drive, is situated in one of the most prestigious locations of the Withdean area perfectly positioned between the South Downs National Park and the city. Within walking distance is Preston Park railway station providing excellent transpo..."
"This stylish detached house is without a doubt located in one of Woodingdean's most desirable locations, couple this with outstanding coastal views and circa 2000 square feet of accommodation this property really stands out. This property is also being sold with no onward chain!"
A red brick Edwardian family home which has 4 bedrooms and is being sold with no onward chain. Located just moments from the sea and Brighton town centre. It has a modern finish but also offers buyers a blank canvas to add their own décor.
A well-proportioned two-bedroom basement flat with private rear garden in a desirable setting on the seafront
"GUIDE PRICE: £800,000 - £850,000 This remarkable two bedroom lower ground floor apartment is certainly not one to be missed as it boasts generous proportions throughout the home as well as being kept in a great condition throughout as well as a breathtakingly large patio garden."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £800,000-£850,000 *** A SUPERB THREE STOREY TERRACED FAMILY HOME WITH FOUR BEDROOMS AND A SOUTH FACING GARDEN LOCATED IN THE POPULAR PORT HALL AREA OF BRIGHTON. Set back from the road, this sizeable family home is thoughtfully presented throughout..."
This four bedroom family home is ideally positioned within a short distance to Preston Park station providing commuter links to Gatwick and London. Being within the catchment area of various desirable schools and with local amenities close at hand.
"GUIDE PRICE £800,000 - £825,000Gableson Avenue is situated in one of the most prestigious locations of the Withdean area perfectly positioned between the South Downs National Park and the city. Within walking distance is Preston Park railway station providing excellent trans..."
"* BUYER INCENTIVE AVAILABLE - £500 John Lewis VOUCHERS UPON COMPLETION, WHEN PURCHASING THIS PROPERTY THROUGH MISHONS * - GUIDE PRICE £800,000 - £825,000 - A beautifully manicured property, available for a new family to call home. The house stands proud fro..."
"This attractive detached home is situated close by to the popular Withdean Park and the beautiful array of lilacs and pond. There is plenty of parking at the front with an additional garage, steps lead up to a feature archway and matching front door. When you step inside the entrance hallway you ..."
Justin Lloyd are delighted to offer a rare investment opportunity to purchase a freehold building with a commercial unit and residential units.
Three bedroom maisonette occupying the top two floors of this period property situated in this Regency Square on Brighton seafront. The property is offered with no onward chain and the accommodation has been renovated by the current owners.
"This property is being sold with no chain, making it an excellent opportunity for anyone who is looking for a hassle-free move. Don't miss your chance to own this stunning home in one of the most desirable locations in Brighton. Contact us today to arrange a viewing!"
"Two minutes’ walk from the station with the vibrant al fresco lifestyle and night life of North Laine around the corner – but out of hearing- this handsome three bedroom period home in a quiet one way street is good to go as a home or a rental. With period charm and character, four sp..."
A simply stunning four double bedroom detached family home situated in a prime location and offered to market in fantastic condition throughout!
Situated in the highly sought after Waldegrave Road forming part of the 'Golden Triangle' is this 3 bedroom bay fronted Victorian terraced house enjoying a sunny 55' west facing rear garden. The property is in need of updating and re-decoration offers a buyer the opportunity to create own dream home
"** 3 BED DETACHED HOUSE WITH A BEAUTIFUL 50 FT GARDEN ** This is a well loved family home that has been in the same family for 90 years and requires some updating. The location is superb for nearby Preston Park station, Stanford infants, Dorothy Stringer and Varndean schools. It offers so much, w..."
"Valley Drive is a popular residential tree-lined street in the sought-after Withdean area. It is in easy access of the A27/ A23 and is approximately 1 mile from Preston Park Train Station. Local shops, parks and schools, such as, Westdean Primary and Patcham High School are near by. An ..."
"A spacious 4 bedroom, 2 bathroom bay fronted Victorian terraced house situated in this popular location close to the Fiveways community. Some original period features, 25' thru' lounge/dining room, 17' kitchen/breakfast room, level walled rear garden with gated rear access."
"ELLIOTTS are delighted to offer this ATTRACTIVE Tudor Style SEMI-DETACHED house, located in the PRESTIGIOUS WITHDEAN DISTRICT of Brighton, EXTENDED to provide accommodation extending to nearly 1,400 Square feet/129 Square Metres, Particularly spacious ground floor living space with a large main r..."
"GUIDE PRICE £750,000 - £800,000 Enjoying views over the heart of Patcham and the Downs beyond, is this charming extended Family Home. This particular run of sought-after Mock-Tudor semi-detached properties offer fantastic accommodation, flexible living arrangements, huge gardens boasting..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £750,000--£800,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. CHAIN FREE. Preston Park has a top spot in the Sunday Times Best Places to Live Guide and this immaculate, four-bedroom house is quietly tucked away just a four-minute walk from ..."
**REFURBISHMENT POTENTIAL | 4 BED DETACHED CHALET BUNGALOW | SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION | GARAGE AND OFF-ROAD PARKING | SPECTACULAR VIEWS**
"*** GUIDE PRICE £750,000 - £800,000 *** An attractive refurbished and extended period townhouse providing spacious family accommodation over four floors. The property comprises a ground floor entrance leading to an L-shaped hallway, ground floor living room with feature fireplace, period feat..."
"A new, modern 3 bedroom home in the heart of Rottingdean village, benefiting from a west facing garden and gated parking for two cars."
A beautifully presented home full of character in the sought after Clifton Hill conservation area
"Balfour Road is a tree lined road located in Fiveways, close to local individual shops and coffee shops with a great sense of community. The local schools are great, the local parks are popular and you are a shirt walk to the train station. The house itself is arranged across three floors providi..."
"Guide price £750,000 to £800,000 A delightful three bedroom three storey town house offering period features and contemporary styling throughout, including a bespoke open aspect kitchen/breakfast room. To the ground floor there is a bright living/dining room with exposed brick f..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £750,000--£800,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Double fronted with four double bedrooms, two bathrooms and two generous reception rooms, this substantial family home is ideal for families with children of all ages. It sits within a hugel..."
A bright and spacious three bedroom second floor apartment with direct sea views and secure underground parking.
"This Victorian family home is offered for sale in good decorative order, with a period style feature open fireplace in the lounge and restored sash windows to the front of the house. The rooms are a great size throughout and the loft has been converted to provide a fourth bedroom with an en-suite..."
"GUIDE PRICE £750,000-£800,000 This four bedroom detached property in Patcham offers versatile accommodation spanning in excess of 1600 Sq Ft over three floors. As you enter the property there is space for coats and shoes which then lead to the kitchen/living room..."
"** Guide Price £750,000 - £775,000 **A spacious 4 double bedroom Victorian terraced house (1,636 sqft,152 sqm) with a westerly rear garden, retaining much of its original charm and character with many period features including ceiling covings, stripped wood floors, fireplaces, dado/picture rails "
"AMAZING, UNIQUE & WOW FACTOR! Having undergone a Stunning transformation, offering the highest level of modern living, making this an enviable place to entertain all of your friends, whilst bringing up family in a stylish but functional home. WE LOVE the amazing open plan kitchen/family room, ext..."
"***FREEHOLD Investment - Three units****** Guide Price £750,000 - £800,000***Freehold Investment Property comprising Two one bedroom & one 2 Bedroom maisonette flat situated on a sought-after street just metres from Lewes Road Sainsbury's & Universities."
"GUIDE PRICE - £750,000 - £800,000 A Unique and recently Renovated Detached Family Home, having been Extended and Improved with the addition of Solar Panels resulting in a 'B' Energy Efficiency Rating. Located in the sought after ""Hollingdean Dip"" offering great Local School catchments an..."
"GUIDE PRICE £750,000 - £775,000 CHAIN FREE A WELL-PRESENTED Grade II house offering VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION arranged over three floors located in heart of the POPULAR NORTH LAINE district of Brighton within a SHORT WALK of BRIGHTON MAINLINE STATION"
** BACK TO MARKET 16TH MARCH** An attractive three bedroom Victorian property over three floors with a west facing garden close to railway station. Situated in the highly sought after Clifton Hill Conservation area which is conveniently close to both the city centre and Brighton's main...
"GUIDE PRICE £750,000 - £800,000 One of just four incredible detached new homes built with Eco-sustainability in mind and to the highest of specifications, situated on one of Patcham's most popular roads just moments from the South Downs National Park!"
"A beautiful 4 BEDROOM bay fronted EDWARDIAN FAMILY HOME with PERIOD FEATURES and accommodation arranged over 3 floors including through lounge/dining room with STRIPPED WOODEN FLOOR, dual aspect kitchen/breakfast room, MASTER BEDROOM on the top floor with EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM plus family bathroom..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £750,000--£800,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Valley Drive sweeps up through Withdean from the sports stadium to Dyke Road Avenue; lined with an array of mature trees and substantial homes built on generous plots. This elegant, semi-det..."
"A truly beautiful family home in the extremely popular Fiveways area of Brighton. This expansive four bedroom home offers delightful versatile living space within touching distance to some of the outstanding local schools, parks and facilities."
"St Aubyns - Rottingdean Village’s exciting new development of 1, 2, 3 and 4 bedroom homes – offering something for everyone."
"One of just four incredible detached new homes built with Eco-sustainability in mind and to the highest of specifications, situated on one of Patcham's most popular roads just moments from the South Downs National Park!"
"Good to go as an HMO, this 6-bedroom house currently commands a rent of £4,200pcm (set to increase to £4,450 from August 2023) and is priced to deliver approx. 7.62% gross yield. With 120m2 (1291sq ft) of space offering flexible accommodation over three storeys, it is in a..."
"*READY SUMMER 2023 *RESERVE NOW* Plot 62 This stunning 3 bedroom house features a large open plan lounger / dining Room, and spacious kitchen, Finished to a high standard throughout.This property includes a private garden and an allocated parking Space,"
4 Vaughan Williams Way is an end of terrace home with two allocated parking spaces and EV charger. It's in a stunning location being directly opposite the new village green space. 
"GUIDE PRICE: £725,000 - £775,000 Tucked away within this popular and quiet close is this immaculate four bedroom detached family home. The location is considered to be excellent having direct access to the South Downs. The accommodation features a spacious kitchen/dining room that benefi..."
"Avard Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented two double bedroom high spec penthouse located in the prestigious Dyke Road. Situated in the desirable Seven Dials area of Brighton with easy access to many independent shops, bars and restaurants. Including the Small..."
"* * GUIDE PRICE £725,000 - £750,000 * * An attractive 4 bedroom, 2 bathroom bay fronted Victorian terraced house with a sunny south facing level walled rear garden. Situated in this highly favoured residential area close to Fiveways with its local shopping facilities."
"PlOT 23. This beautiful three bedroom detached house features a large open plan kitchen/dining room, and spacious living area, Finished to a high standard throughout.This property includes a private garden and an allocated parking space."
"***GUIDE PRICE £700,000-£750,000*** Substantial, Victorian house located in the desirable West Hill conservation area. This quiet one way street is perfectly placed just moments away from Brighton railway station, the City centre and excellent schools. Ente..."
"Wonderful flint fronted Contemporary home. Situated in this exclusive close. A modern three-bedroom property. Wonderful open plan living space with a central atrium, Mod Kit, Spacious Galley living area, Family Shower rm & En-suite to Master. Rear patio garden. Gas C.H. "
"This vastly extended semi-detached family house will be the envy of all your friends! With an abundance of living space on offer, the kitchen / diner is the perfect entertaining space with separate snug and conservatory for cosy nights in. The current sitting / playroom would lend itself to an id..."
" ** SECURE PARKING SPACE INCLUDED **  Embrace the Brighton lifestyle in this party perfect three bedroom house with sunny patio garden to enjoy and a very rare, secure allocated parking space a few doors down. With immaculate, sunlit rooms spread over a generous 98.2..."
Chain Free! This beautiful detached house is situated in an elevated position in a popular part of Brighton. It has been finished to the highest of standards even with 'Miele' integrated appliances. Working from home or looking for business space? The double room self-contained office is the cher...
"Guide price £700,000 - £725,000 An extended and BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED Victorian FAMILY HOME that measures 1328 sq ft/123 sq m and enjoys an elevated position within popular Queens Park."
"* * GUIDE PRICE £700,000 - £720,000 * * A deceptively spacious 3 bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow situated in this popular location just north of Surrenden Road. Extended accommodation with 25' lounge and 20' kitchen/dining room both with glazed doors leading onto the rear garden. "
Stunning Four Bedroom Family Home With Beautiful Large Garden And Stunning Sea Views
"GUIDE PRICE: £700,000--£750,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. CHAIN FREE. Exceptionally spacious with four double bedrooms and three linked reception rooms, this modern and extended semi-detached house is ideal for both family time and enter..."
"An incredibly versatile and high specification four/five bedroom terraced family home situated in the highly desirable Roundhill Conservation area, close to everything Brighton and Hove has to offer."
Set directly on Brighton´s lively seafront and positioned on the 8th floor of an iconic purpose-built development Cavendish House is situated perfectly; the apartment is located within easy reach of everything Brighton has offer. 
"A SUBSTANTIAL 4/5 BEDROOM, 2 RECEPTION ROOM VICTORIAN HOUSE with well presented & spacious accommodation arranged over 3 FLOORS. THIS IMPRESSIVE PROPERTY has a pretty PERIOD OPEN FIRE, numerous period features, PLANTATION SHUTTERS TO SASH WINDOWS, a BEAUTIFUL LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN, a modern kitc..."
"Justin Lloyd Estate Agents are very proud to bring to the market this luxury seafront apartment offering some of the highest standards available on the market, set within one of Brighton's most iconic buildings; The Van Alen Building."
"A DELIGHTFUL 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACED RED BRICK PERIOD FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN THIS EXTREMELY POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA. The house benefits from many ORIGINAL FEATURES including fireplaces, picture & dado rails. The accommodation is generous with Lounge, dining room, breakfast room and kitchen on th..."
"Magnificent city centre penthouse apartment offering a stunning 1098 sq feet of space, south facing roof terrace with views to the sea, secure underground parking and no onward chain."
"**COMING SOON** Park Avenue is an elegant collection of extensively renovated one & two bedroom apartments and two newly constructed houses, ideally positioned adjacent to Preston Park. The apartments benefit from outside space, views across Preston Park, and a 10 year new homes warranty. "
"On the outside you see a traditional family home, on this inside a contemporary well-proportioned home offering 2011 square feet of luxurious accommodation. No expense has been spared in creating a modern master piece, a show home with a difference. Throughout there are many bespoke designs, incl..."
"Four storey Victoria terraced house with four double bedrooms situated in the popular North Laine Conservation area. The property comprises; a good sized living room with feature fireplace, a modern fitted kitchen with space for a breakfast table and chairs and a double door leading to a patio area."
A freehold whole-house set close to the centre of Kemp Town Village and the seafront. In need of a light refurbishment and with permission to revert to a 5 bedroom family home. 
Purplebricks Brighton & Hove is delighted to offer this imposing four bedroom detached home with lovely laid to lawn rear garden and spacious driveway. The property is set on an elevated position with breathtaking views of the south downs and sea views. The property is considered to be in good ...
"This is a beautifully presented and elegant four bedroom semi detached house built in 2019 with seven years NHBC remaining. This property has a lovely living room which opens on to the westerly garden, a contemporary kitchen, bathroom and ensuites to two bedrooms and parking space. Viewing Essential"
"** IDEAL FOR INVESTORS ** A rare opportunity to purchase a mid terraced 6 bedroom house in Brighton which is ideal for investors with the tenants already in place. Situated in a popular location in Brighton close to London Road shopping area, Preston Park and excellent options for travel links. R..."
"Quintessentially ‘Brighton’, this luxury seafront apartment benefits from some of the most iconic views in the city. With glazing running continuously along its southern elevation framing the entire coast line from east to west, the exceptional vista takes your breath away every time ..."
"Knight & Knoxley are delighted to present this fantastic, light and spacious, two-bedroom garden flat in Springfield Road, which has been well cared for by its current owners. Rare off-street parking. Extremely private, being at the rear of a large, semi-detached building with its own entrance."
"An interesting freehold investment opportunity in a prime Brighton location. The property is arranged as a grocer/deli on the ground floor paying a rent of £16,500pa in occupation on a 5 year lease expiring March 2025 and a 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom flat on the first floor currently let on an AS..."
"OPEN HOUSE THIS SATURDAY (1ST APRIL) - by appointment only. Chain Free! Original semi-detached family home in Surrenden Park with sea views from the upper floor, close to excellent schools and lots of green open space, ideal for dog walks. Fiveways is just a short walk away with individual shops ..."
Perfect for all types of buyers! This 5/6 Bed House offers great opportunity with a modern finish and central location. *Ideal AIR BNB* Could also make a beautiful family home.
"Stylish, three bedroom house | Detached | Open plan living space | Large south facing patio | Rear access | Popular city centre location | Close to great schools and parks | New double glazing | Short walk to Stations"
"GUIDE PRICE £675,000 - £700,000 This spacious four bedroom family home is offered for sale within one of Fiveways premier roads. The accommodation is arranged over three floors and features a South facing bright and airy open plan living/kitchen/dining room with a modern fitted kitchen a..."
"Wonderfully distinctive four-bedroom, two bathroom family home on a large plot with a great rear garden and a double garage with small pit."
"**BOOK YOUR TOUR** A spacious 2 bedroom apartment over two floors giving it a house like feel and featuring an enviable private patio. Centrally located on the edge of the North Laine Quarter, this duplex property is located within a boutique development ROX, which features an array of commun..."
"This charming cottage was built on what was the stables to Southdown House which was constructed in the early eighteenth century, in the heart of Patcham Village where you can find near by shops, pubs and restaurants. As you approach the property you will notice it's beautiful flint elevation und..."
"Guide Price £650,000 - £660,000 Yopa are delighted to offer this extended four / five bedroom semi detached family home which has been beautifully renovated. The property benefits from incredible views across Brighton."
"Share of Freehold split level apartment which is being sold with no chain. Located in central Kemptown and moments from the sea. Two bedrooms, two bathrooms, kitchen/diner, utility room, patio garden and terrace."
"** Guide price £650,000 - £675,000 ** A completely RENOVATED AND EXTENDED, four bedroom, semi-detached house in the popular district of Westdene offered for sale in PRISTINE CONDITION with a large HOME OFFICE/GYM in the garden."
"GARDEN APARTMENTS - FLAT 1 & FLAT 2 GROUND FLOOR A stunning development of 4 luxury apartments in the idyllic village of Rottingdean, all with sea-facing terraces, panoramic views, underfloor heating, allocated parking, and lift access to all floors. With its quintessential ..."
"GUIDE PRICE; £650,000--£700,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Beautifully renovated with bright, spacious rooms, this four-bedroom detached house sits on a quiet close in Patcham. It resides in one of the city’s leafy enclaves, surrounded by matu..."
This unique three storey house is full of character & benefits from two separate street entrances. Situated in an excellent location with great infant & primary schools within easy reach. The property is ideal for those that need to commute with Brighton's mainline train station within 1 km.
"A stunning two bedroom apartment with direct sea views, a large south-facing roof terrace and private rear garden, allocated parking and a lift."
With a fantastic South facing aspect directly overlooking the marina's outer harbour this 3 double bedroom penthouse will not disappoint! The living room has the most fabulous views over the marina and sea with has access onto the balcony. Adjacent to the living room is a separate dining room wit...
Fox & Sons are delighted to offer for sale this attractive and spacious four storey period terraced townhouse situated in the heart of the highly desirable North Laine conservation area within a few minutes' walk of all central Brighton has to offer.
"A massively extended and lavishly appointed six bedroom licensed HMO property with Certificate of Lawfulness, which is currently rented to professionals generating a gross annual income of £47,748, with potential for further uplift. This stunning property, with both a two-storey and single storey..."
"The property comprises, four double bedrooms, a single bedroom that would make a perfect study or dressing room, a beautifully fitted kitchen, two bathrooms, an open-plan living/dining area with bi-fold doors leading onto a private rear garden with the ‘Man Cave’ currently used as a gym/bar and c..."
"A stunning split level, 2 double bedroom garden flat located in the heart of Kemptown within 5 minutes’ walk of the seafront. The flat comprises of a master bedroom with a walk-in wardrobe and en suite shower room. A 2nd bedroom suite which includes a dressing room, with an en suite bathroo..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a substantial end of terrace, double-fronted period property situated in the popular Roundhill Conservation Area, bordering Preston Circus. Currently arranged as a one/two bedroom flat on the ground floor, with a three bedroom maisonette on the ground and first floor..."
Fox & Sons are delighted to offer for sale this FOUR BEDROOM three storey town house located in the heart of Brighton city centre.
"A simply stunning four bedroom semi-detached chalet-bungalow situated in the ever popular Mill Rise, Westdene."
"*Guide Price £650,000 - £675,000* Family home located in friendly community of Hollingdean, close to Fiveways and within the catchment area for great local schools for children of all ages. Brighton city centre/seafront is walkable and there Are also great transport links to the city and beyond."
"A Bright and Spacious first floor one bedroom conversion flat, set within this elegant period property. The property is centrally located in the FASHIONABLE KEMP TOWN with its excellent shopping, cafes, bars, and restaurants. THE WONDERFUL KEMP TOWN SEAFRONT IS CLOSE BY AT THE END OF LOWER ROCK G..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £650,000 - £700,000 *** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to bring to market this extended four bedroom semi detached family home located on Mackie Avenue, in the heart of Patcham. An excellent spot for families and commuters, Patcham offers a friendly environment with a var..."
* READY TO RESERVE* Plot 9. This stunning three bedroom duplex apartment boasts en suite to master bedroom and its own garage parking. *PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE*
An attractive 3 double bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow situated in this popular residential area with a southerly rear garden and off street parking. The property is situated in this elevated position enjoying extensive views over Patcham and towards the South Downs.
A rarely available two bedroom two reception room detached bungalow in a quiet cul du sac benefitting from Solar roof panels and no onward chain!
"Newly built, two bedroom apartment with uninterrupted sea views and rear patios with gardens. The accommodation spans approximately 87 square meters/942 square feet. Lift access. Great size sun terrace to the front with sea views."
"A rarely available substantial seven bedroom licensed HMO property which is let until 23/08/2023 and is being sold as an ongoing investment with potential for high returns. The property is being readvertised for the next academic year at £3791.66pcm or £45,500 per annum. The accommodation is arr..."
"Coapt are delighted to present this beautiful Brighton Townhouse, representing a lucrative and sound investment, the property is up and running as a 6 bedroom HMO, with a tenancy's in place running until August 2024. Situated in the ever popular ward of Hanover, this property benefits from bei..."
"* RESERVE TODAY * Boasting a large south-facing terrace and private rear garden, this brand new two bedroom apartment is READY TO MOVE INTO now. Finished to a luxury standard throughout, this stunning home further benefits from allocated parking."
A beautifully presented family home located in arguably one of Woodingdean's most sought after addresses. Throughout there has been substantial upgrading and renovations to a high standard with further upgrades planned in April for a new ground floor bathroom and an electric car charging point. T...
"A two-bedroom property with extraordinary proportions throughout as well as magnificent sea views. Nestled in the forever popular Kemptown, this apartment is certainly not one to be missed."
"Situated in one of Woodingdean's most popular roads is this outstanding detached five-bedroom family home offering modern open-plan living, a good-sized garden with an outside gym, ample off-street parking for several cars and a single garage. The property comprises, four double bedrooms..."
"This amazing Victorian period mid terraced property is being offered with three good sized bedrooms, lots of charm/character and has been decorated to a good standard throughout. The house would be ideal for families with the area being second to none for schools and close to Preston Park with al..."
A 3 bedroom duplex flat with it's own garage and a 10 year new homes warranty. The main bedroom has a walk-in wardrobe space and an en-suite.
"A wonderful and stylish, four-bedroom terraced home with a South facing rear garden, situated moments from Brighton Mainline Station and the bustling North Laine District."
"Located in the heart of Brighton and on the most wonderful stretch of Kensington Gardens is a truly unique and highly desirable Four/ Five-bedroom, double fronted maisonette with a superb outlook of the famous pedestrianised shopping precinct."
"Welcome to Avalon, a secluded apartment complex situated in one of Brightons most desirable locations, moment from the seafront. Property in this spectacular building rarely come to market, this is an opportunity not to be missed! This apartment comprising of 3 double bedrooms, one en-suite, s..."
"This 4 double bedroom semi-detached chalet bungalow has been tastefully transformed to provide good size MODERN, LIGHT & AIRY accommodation. Some of the property highlights include the driveway providing off road parking for several vehicles, the beautifully presented lounge/diner & Kitchen. In t..."
"An extremely well presented and extended three storey period property with many period features. The property comprises; two good size double bedrooms, a sitting room and a basement lounge/dining area with a separate kitchen, a large bathroom and a secluded patio garden."
"Situated in this sought after road in Woodingdean is this tastefully presented MODERN, LIGHT & AIRY 3 double bedroom detached bungalow sat on a corner plot. Some of the property highlights include the PRIVATE DRIVEWAY, garage, the SUBSTANTIAL garden area, the good size accommodation & the separat..."
"GUIDE PRICE £625,000 - £650,000 Having been renovated and extended to an exceptional standard, with an amazing open plan Kitchen/Diner complete with huge bi-folding doors flowing to the large level rear garden, is this stunning semi-detached bungalow. The property is bought to the market..."
"Exceptional property offering plenty of space, style and convenience. Excellent location, attractive features and fantastic curb appeal, this double fronted house is a great investment for anyone looking to live in the heart of Brighton. "
"GUIDE PRICE £625,000 - £650,000 This detached bungalow is set on a large corner plot and has huge potential for extension or development, subject to the necessary consents. The attractive 1930s bungalow currently consists of a 14' living room with a westerly aspect overlooking the rear g..."
"This is an attractive house full of character with a prime address in the popular North Laines of Brighton within a very short walk of the Basket Makers Pub which received the Best Pub award. The property was recently modernised when a new open plan layout was created with a new kitchen,..."
"Grade 2 listed cottage situated in the heart of the Rottingdean conservation area. In need of updating. The accommodation comprises: 3 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom, front and rear gardens. Situated within reach of shops, restaurants, pubs, cafes in the high street and the beach."
"3 bed terraced house in a highly sought after location. Accommodation comprises off 3 double bedrooms, one with en-suite, and separate family bathroom on the first floor. As you make you way down stairs, you are presented with a sizable lounge, nice kitchen diner with integrated appliances, Wc / ..."
"A stunning and immaculate two bedroom house, right in the heart of the Kemp Town Village. Stunning proportions are on offer as well as an ample amount of natural light throughout this unique mews home. The off-street parking is such a benefit in this central Kemp Town home."
"One of a kind spacious detached family home, fantastic living spaces ideal for entertaining, beautiful large rear garden. Highly sought after North Woodingdean location, ample parking and handy garage."
"CHAIN FREE, charming two-bedroom, semi-detached mews house with parking space and/or southerly courtyard (scope for installation of EV charging point). The seafront is just a block away with the plentiful amenities of Kemp Town village also close by."
"Mere moments from the beautiful Brighton promenade, this incredibly large three-bedroom maisonette comprising of 1300 square feet spread across two floors has been newly refurbished and redecorated with new carpets throughout. Offered for sale with no onward chain."
"A bright and spacious recently modernised 3 double bedroom first floor flat with its own private street entrance, off road parking and distant sea view from the rear conveniently situated close to Dyke Road Park being within walking distance of Preston Park Station"
"This superb property has been subject to much improvement in recent years and offers a wealth of stunning 'designer' features throughout. With three/four bedrooms, views, garden and off road parking. This lovely property must be viewed to be fully appreciated. SOLE AGENTS"
"Grab this fantastic chance to acquire this deceptively SPACIOUS, FAMILY HOME which has been in the same family's tenure for many years. The property has been sympathetically extended to create GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION over two floors. The property is located within walking distance of Happy Valley ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000-£625,000 A three bedroom cottage in a popular part of Patcham. Originally built in 1909 as part of the old farm, the owner has restored this historic building back to life! Families will love the modern finish combined with the historic feel. "
"This stylish, stunning semi-detached house has a fantastic open plan kitchen / dining area beautiful by-folds to the generous, flat rear garden. If you are looking for an ultra-modern, light, bright family home, look no further, this could be the one!"
"**Guide Price £600,000 - £700,000** An extremely rare opportunity to purchase this one-off, private gated mews house, deep in the heart of Kemptown Village. This freehold property has its own private entrance, South facing terrace and ample parking. As soon as you enter this ex..."
**SHARE OF FREEHOLD** A fantastic three bedroom third and fourth floor (top) maisonette situated in this beautiful square adjacent to Brighton seafront. A rare opportunity to purchase a property in the original house of the Georgian developer of Marine Square. Benefiting from three south facing w...
Luxury | Living This large luxury four bedroom terraced house has been fully refurbished to a high standard throughout and arranged over for floors. This home offers a fantastic opportunity...
Spectacular Extended Semi-Detached Family Home | This wonderfully presented chalet-style property boasts four double bedrooms and expansive living accommodation as well as a large sunny garden with sun terrace - viewings are highly recommended to fully appreciate everything this home has to offer!
"Guide Price £600,000-£650,000 Avard Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this 4 double bedroom house spanning over 3 floors. The period property is situated in the ever sought after tree lined Shaftesbury Road. This property is ideal for commuters as London Road train station, wit..."
"An oasis of calm which opens to a sunny, south facing garden this three/four bedroom terraced house is a rare beauty, tucked away in a quiet no through road in a convenient area of our city popular with professionals, families and investors as a choice of primary schools, a park and the vibrant s..."
"Occupying a prominent corner plot is this spacious extended family home. Our vendors have enjoyed this large home over the past twelve years and the versatile space it offers, and are able to offer no onward chain. The property can easily be described as a 'Tardis' having the benefit of large roo..."
"*GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* A massively extended 7 bedroom student HMO property which is currently let and is re-let for the next academic year at £3655 PCM or £43,860 per annum. Planning consent was granted in 2018 for 7 bedroom HMO use. The accommodation consists of 7 double bedrooms, 2 s..."
"Peacefully positioned in a leafy close off Surrenden Road. Bordering the playing fields of Varndean College, this family home is perfectly positioned on the end of terrace. Useful side access through to the garden and a garage, this family home has buckets of potential to make your own."
"Standing proud with stunning southerly views, this beautiful home enjoys an elevated position ensuring wonderful views all year round, from the balcony especially the views are as far reaching as the sea on a clear day. The living accommodation offers flexibility and spans almost 1300 square foot..."
"This beautiful home enjoys an elevated position ensuring wonderful views all year round, from the balcony especially the views are as far reaching as the sea on a clear day. The living accommodation offers flexibility and spans almost 1750 Square foot across 2 floors (excluding garage). The garde..."
" ** Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000 **  Both the sea and Sussex sunshine stream through this beautiful, three bedroom apartment which soars above the English Channel and has use of a gated garden square and communal garden. On the top, 4th floor of a Grad..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION on 26th April 2023 Guide Price: £600,000+ Freehold Residential Investment Extremely rare opportunity to be able to purchases this freehold residential investment comprising of 4 self contained flats currently let via Assured Shorthold Tenancies produ..."
"A truly stunning and unique two bedroom duplex apartment situated at the top of an iconic contemporary building within the heart of Brighton city centre. Stunning city views from the private roof terrace, an allocated parking space and sold with no onward chain."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 This stunning apartment features an Easterly facing balcony along with the added bonus of a garage. We love the spacious lounge/dining room which has been tastefully designed along with the impressive fitted kitchen which has integrated appliances and gran..."
Exceptionally deceiving large three storey detached 4 bedroom house. No chain.
"***Guide Price £600,000 - £625,000***
A great opportunity to acquire this truly stunning three storey family home which is presented in lovely condition throughout and offers versatile accommodation for anyone looking for a light and airy space.
"
"CHAIN FREE! This private, two-bedroom luxury maisonette is in one of the most impressive historic houses on Brighton’s seafront and has a private balcony as well as access to glorious communal gardens. Attributed to Charles Barry, who went on to design the Houses of Parliament, ..."
One of just three stunning terraced cottages which have been tastefully transformed into incredible family homes with a specification that is second to none! Situated on one of Patcham's most popular roads just moments from the South Downs National Park!
"Paradise found, this spacious two bedroom apartment with a large courtyard is private and quiet, spanning the entire lower ground floor of a magnificent Grade I listed house in one of the UK’s finest Regency crescents, which embraces both the exclusive gardens for residents and the English ..."
"A beautifully presented three-bedroom top floor apartment with direct sea views with use of a gated garden square and communal garden. On the top, 4th floor of a Grade II listed Regency building spanning over 1,241 Square Feet, this spacious split-level home has been improved throughout with an e..."
We are delighted to be able to offer this beautifully presented three bedroom detached single storey bungalow which enjoys an incredibly quiet position on a sought after Crescent in Rottingdean. This enviable lifestyle property has been significantly improved by the the current considerate owner...
"Spacious & surprisingly light, raised lower ground floor flat on the curve of Sussex Square & Lewes Crescent. Sold with a residents key to the gardens and access to the seafront via a private tunnel, there are two double bedrooms, two bathrooms, a study/gym and both a front & central ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £650,000 *** We are delighted to offer as sole agent and with no onward chain this wonderfully spacious, three double bedroom mid-20th Century duplex apartment which is arranged over the seventh and eighth floors to the rear of Brighton’s iconic Metropole Hotel. Bo..."
"** Guide Price £600,000 - £625,000 ** A sunlit sanctuary, this immaculate three-bedroom house radiates style from the smart off street parking at the front to the leafy, landscaped oasis at the back- complete with a paved dining terrace and south facing seating area. On a p..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £600,000-£650,000** A delightful semi-detached 1930s Mock Tudor house with much character and large south-west garden backing on to woodland. Enjoys a favourable position set back from the road in a desirable residential area close to the highly rated Westdene Primary School. The pr..."
"We are delighted to present to the market this 3 bedroom detached bungalow situated in this sought-after area of Woodingdean which is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property benefits from a carriage driveway which provides OFF ROAD PARKING for several vehicles, a well-maintained priva..."
A beautifully presented three bedroom detached single storey bungalow which enjoys an incredibly quiet position on a sought after Crescent in Rottingdean. This property has been significantly improved by the current owners and now offers a stunning contemporary interior which includes refitted ba...
"Beautiful four bedroom detached bungalow offering modern and comfortable family living. Benefiting from open plan living, modern kitchen appliances and stylish fixtures and fittings making this property is sure to impress."
"GUIDE PRICE: £600,000--£650,000. CHAIN FREE. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Peacefully positioned on a leafy close in Surrenden, bordering the school playing fields of Varndean College, Balfour Primary and Dorothy Stringer, this terraced hous..."
"Gated Mews House that has being newly refurbished throughout. It has a south facing patio garden, two double bedrooms, spate kitchen and good size lounge. It also benefits from having a private parking space with is a rarity for Kemptown Village."
"Charming, detached bungalow in an incredibly sought after location in the heart of North Woodingdean, a short stroll from the shops, bus stops, and schools, means that everything is on your doorstep. Other features include a newly laid block paved driveway, a handy garage, and a low maintenance g..."
"Situated in Rottingdean is this three bedroom semi detached property, recently renovated to a high standard."
"Delightful four/five bedroom semi-detached property with a double storey side extension located in a highly sought after location overlooking Westdene green. A bright and spacious entrance hall leads through to a modern fitted kitchen/breakfast room, with white high gloss units and soli..."
"A TASTEFULLY PRESENTED 3 double bedroom DETACHED CHALET BUNGALOW which is situated in this sought-after area of South Woodingdean. Some of the property highlights include 2 BATHROOMS (one en suite), OFF STREET PARKING for several vehicles, GARAGE, an extended lounge/diner & an extended kitchen/br..."
"This three bedroom family home is located in the popular district of Westdene, being only a short distance from the sought after Westdene Primary school. The property has a fresh feel and features a modern contemporary style kitchen. There is a bright and spacious through lounge/dining room which..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £600,000 *** A SPACIOUS AND VERY WELL-PRESENTED FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR MAISONETTE WITH A LARGE SOUTH FACING ROOF TERRACE LOCATED IN THE FAMILY FRIENDLY FIVEWAYS Set on the upper floors of an attractive end of terrace period property, this lovely home sp..."
"Maslen Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this 4 bedroom semi-detached family home in a SOUGHT-AFTER AREA of Woodingdean, close to a FREQUENT BUS SERVICE offering EASY ACCESS TO THE CITY CENTRE. The MODERN, LIGHT & AIRY property has been tastefully decorated & benefits from far..."
"Attractive 3 bedrm semi det chalet with Private drive to garage and a South facing garden. Spacious light and airy accommodation. Lounge, conservatory, modern kit, dining rm, master bedrm with ensuite cloakrm, modern bathroom. First floor spacious landing, two further bedrms, Shower rm."
"Embracing the glory of its location in a Grade II Regency square on Brighton seafront, this three bedroom maisonette faces south with uninterrupted views of the English Channel. Spanning the two top floors of the central house which is broader than the other homes, there is an astounding 111m2 (1..."
"Chain Free! This deceptively large plot is home to a quaint detached bungalow in beautiful grounds. Situated opposite the nature reserve, it is on a set back, quiet road in Patcham but walking distance to local amenities and main bus routes."
"This BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 4 bedroom family home has just been tastefully transformed & completely refurbished including a new gas boiler, electrical system, LED lighting, kitchen units, sanitary ware & flooring & full external re-pointing carried out. The property benefits from good size MODERN,..."
"A superbly positioned three bedroom semi detached house, situated in a highly sought after village location in Rottingdean. The property benefits fom a good size living room with bay window, separate dining room overlooking the rear garden, fitted kitchen and sunroom also overlooking the garden. ..."
"A deceptively spacious three-storey, mid-terrace house offering flexible and versatile accommodation. Situated in a popular residential area close to Fiveways and within close proximity to highly rated local schools. The lower ground floor has been converted by the current owner to create a delig..."
"** MODERN FAMILY HOME IN WOODINGDEAN ** A beautifully presented 4 bedroom semi detached house in a prime position in Woodingdean with 1 off road parking space and gardens to 3 sides, close to local shops, amenities, parks, schools and easy access onto the A27. On a bus route directly to Brighto..."
"An attractive 2 BEDROOM BAY FRONTED PERIOD HOME located in an extremely popular tree lined road, close to highly regarded local schools in the popular FIVEWAYS community. Highlights include stripped wooden doors, wooden floorboards in some rooms, potential to extend into the loft (STNC) and a PRE..."
"GUIDE PRICE £575,000 - £625,000 A simply stunning two double bedroom top floor apartment offered to market in fantastic condition throughout and situated in one of Preston Parks most prestigious roads."
"Guide Price £575,000 - £600,000 A modern three bedroom, semi-detached house, complete with parking, useable loft room and a fantastic garden. This much loved home is ready for a new family to move in straight away… You enter via the porch, a spacious addit..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £575,000 - £600,000*** The perfect investment purchase! An entire freehold building currently arranged as a ground and lower ground floor garden maisonette, then a first and second floor maisonette. Both properties provide a total income of £3000 PCM. There is no onw..."
"David Harrington Property is delighted to offer to market this Fantastic house in Falmer Gardens, Woodingdean."
"The beautiful semi-detached house boasts a bright and airy living space following on to the bright spacious bedrooms upstairs. The pretty rear garden has an outbuilding with power, ideal for those working from home. This is a perfect family home in the heart of Patcham."
"An attractive four-bedroom mid-terrace family home with a 75´ (approx) rear garden, situated in an admired location of Brighton, moments from Fiveways and many schools that cater for all ages."
"A significantly upgraded and beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home in a cul-de-sac location in the highly sought after suburb of Woodingdean, Brighton. The property enjoys fabulous elevated views across the South Downs towards the English Channel and is surrounded by a variety o..."
"A three-story, three bedroom mid-century townhouse in the heart of Brighton. This mid-terrace house has a small, private garden in the back. In need of renovation and modernization. The pr..."
"Situated in the sought after Westdene area of Brighton within walking distance of the excellent local primary school, this spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home offers well-planned bright and airy accommodation with the potential to convert into the loft and out to the rear (STNC). "
HUGE potential and CHAIN FREE - this beautiful home is just waiting for new owners to make it their own. In a sought-after area of Woodingdean this property offers plenty of scope for extension subject to the necessary planning consents. Being in need of a cosmetic make over this property is also...
"With a generous 105.8m2 (1139sq.ft) to enjoy over two storeys, this four bedroom maisonette in an historic house has space and grace. With the sea at one end of this beautiful Regency terrace and the alfresco, relaxed lifestyle of Kemptown at the other, elegant period proportions are instantly re..."
"Looking for a picturesque family home with spacious living? Or you need self-contained space for a teenager? Try your hand at airbnb? This semi-detached house has the potential! The self-contained studio room can only have an electric plug in oven/hob, so is easily removed. With breath-taking vie..."
"OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £565,000. Four Storey mid-terraced Victorian home located in the popular ""bakers bottom"" which is known for its friendly neighbours and a great local pub not forgetting close proximity to Kemp Town Village and Queens Park. Flexible use of space with three/four..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £561,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £850,000"
"This delightful bungalow is ideal for someone looking for a bright, airy, and spacious home with the potential to make it your own. With a large sunny rear garden to enjoy glorious sunshine throughout the entire day. This property has potential to extend subject to planning permission. Spacious r..."
"Situated in a POPULAR residential location is this spacious & characteristic three double bedroom detached chalet bungalow. The property benefits from off road parking & garage, two substantial rear gardens & stunning views of Woodingdean. The property is also offered for sale with no onward chai..."
"Great opportunity to improve this semi-detached home near Preston Park. This property is being sold with no onward chain, ensuring a smooth and hassle-free buying process. Don't miss out on the chance to make this house your dream home, book a viewing today!"
"Superb raised ground floor flat with good sized front and rear gardens. This fantastic property benefits from bright and spacious accommodation comprising; lounge with south facing bay windows, double bedroom with feature built in wardrobes, bathroom, modern kitchen and good storage. The delightf..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £560,000. IN NEED OF MODERNISATION. VACANT POSSESSION. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. A sunlit sanctuary in need of a little love, this 1930’s three bedroom beauty with a garage and fabulous gardens will respond to any ..."
A three bedroom bungalow which is being sold with no chain in a very popular location. The garage has be converted so could be used for someone looking for a property that would produce an income or a great work from home set up.
"Guide Price £550,000 - £600,000 A beautifully presented four bedroom home, located in a quiet cul-de-sac in Westdene, benefitting from a good size rear garden, front terrace, garage and far reaching views over the Downs. As you enter, the hallway allows access to all rooms and ..."
"Guide Price £550,000 to £575,000 Lextons are delighted to offer to market a wonderfully presented 2/3 bedroom home situated in the highly desirable Roundhill Conservation Area. This crisp, clean and contemporary home ticks all the boxes when it comes to modern design. Upon enter..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £550,000--£600,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Full of light with a spacious, sunny patio at the back, this three bedroom 1901 terraced house is a rare beauty, tucked away in a quiet but convenient area of our city popular with professio..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £600,000 ** Beautifully decorated in classic style, this charming three bedroom, double fronted house has generous Victorian proportions and a patio to enjoy. Just a 1 minute stroll from Rottingdean’s vibrant High Street and 4 from the beach ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000 *** A WELL-PRESENTED AND GENEROUSLY-SIZED THREE BEDROOM TERRACED FAMILY HOME WITH AN ATTRACTIVE GOOD-SIZED REAR GARDEN LOCATED IN BRIGHTON. Situated between Hartington Road and Elm Grove, this sizeable family home is classicall..."
"My Sales are delighted to offer an impressive Three Double bedroom, mid terrace, period house, situated in the popular area of Hanover. Benefits from a private south facing balcony and a rear private courtyard. Local to Great Transport Links. "
"This recently build house is a great investment opportunity and currently rents for approximately £45,000 per year. it is in very good condition and is being sold with the current tenants in situ. Located on the East of Brighton, inland from The Marina and is in a popular area."
"Stunning two bedroom, two bathroom apartment situated on the third floor of a converted Grade II listed period building on the seafront in Kemp Town."
"Stunning flat in immaculate condition located in friendly community of Fiveways and within walking distance of Brighton train station. Basement room providing extra versatile space, communal gardens and bike storage plus allocated parking space. Virtual tour available."
"**GUIDE PRICE £550,000 - £575,000** Boasting an enviable address and a quiet tucked away position, this four double bedroom semi-detached family home is located only moments from the heart of Rottingdean village with a wonderful village pond, high street and seafront. Well arranged accommodation..."
"Directly overlooking an open green with beautiful far reaching views is this spacious four bedroom detached chalet bungalow. The ground floor accommodation features a 28' living/dining room with patio doors leading out to the garden, modern fitted kitchen, separate utility room, stylish shower ro..."
"* Offers Over - £550,000 * Spacious detached chalet bungalow with FIVE bedrooms. The lounge/dining room has been extended to offer a great living area. The property also has a private driveway, garage and a WEST facing garden."
"Fantastic 1950's mid terraced house with spacious accommodation arranged over three floors. The property offers flexibility in its layout and is currently arranged as three bedrooms, with two reception rooms, although there is certainly the possibility of creating a fourth bedroom if required. Th..."
"*** £550,000 - £575,000 *** This lovely semi-detached property benefits from an entrance hall with downstairs W/C, once you walk out of the hallway you are met with an open plan lounge-dinner and separate kitchen. The lounge diner then leads out to a sizable rear garden over 3 ti..."
"Occupying a prominent residential location in Kemp Town, set slightly back from the main Coast Road and being readily accessible to local shopping facilities in St Georges's Road, Brighton Marina Village with its varied range of leisure facilities, East Brighton Park and Golf Course"
"GUIDE PRICE: £550,000--£575,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Inviting company with its sunny walled garden and spacious, light rooms offering the choice should you wish to work from home; this Victorian three bedroom house has immense period charm an..."
"*Guide Price £550,000-£575,000* Beautifully presented three storey period home located on a quiet one-way street in the West Hill conservation area, moments away from Brighton railway station and the city centre."
A WELL-PRESENTED 3 bedroom bungalow situated in a quiet cul-de-sac in NORTH WOODINGDEAN. The property benefits from an OPEN PLAN living space which looks out onto a west facing astroturfed garden. There is OFF STREET PARKING with a two car drive and the property is also close by to local amenitie...
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to bring to market this extended four bedroom semi detached family home located on Westfield Crescent, in Patcham. An excellent spot for families and commuters, Patcham offers a friendly environment with a variety of local eateries, independent shops and pubs as wel..."
"Superb two bedroom apartment with spectacular sea views and no onward chain. This beautifully presented two bedroom apartment occupies the 15th floor with breath taking views across Brighton and beyond. The property has been well maintained throughout, comprising; two double bedrooms, one benefit..."
"***Guide Price £550,000 - £600,000*** This spacious four-bedroom maisonette is offered to the market with no onward chain. Located in the heart of Brighton, the property is arranged over three floors and is currently being utilised as a holiday rental unit, sleeping up to 16 pe..."
"A Bright & Spacious One Bedroom, Third floor flat in this historic, purpose built block. Situated on Marine Parade this particular property is one of the side facing flats with oblique sea views from Kitchen and lounge. The double bedroom is to the rear of the property. The bathroom has ..."
This BEAUTIFUL 3 BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE is situated in the SOUGHT-AFTER HANOVER AREA and is presented in EXCELLENT DECORATIVE ORDER with modern kitchen and bathroom and SPACIOUS THROUGH LOUNGE/DINING ROOM. All three bedrooms are WELL PROPORTIONED. The property offers GOOD SIZED ACCOMMODATION and ...
A fantastic opportunity to acquire a four bedroom family home located within the sought after area of Westdene. This semi-detached chalet home is of excellent proportions and provides substantial living space internally. The ground floor accommodation briefly comprises: reception hallway...
"Guide Price £550,000-£575,000 Avard Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this fantastic 5 bedroom end of terraced house spanning over 4 floors. The property sits on a popular street in an ideal location close to Lewes Road with easy access to the A27 and just a short stroll from M..."
"This 3 bedroom detached bungalow is situated in this sought after area of Rottingdean & is being offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property benefits from GOOD SIZE ACCOMMODATION throughout, a well-maintained PRIVATE rear garden, a conservatory & a shared driveway with private gated acces..."
"* READY TO MOVE INTO NOW * Enjoying stunning views across Brighton and Hove, this two bedroom apartment comes complete with integrated appliances, high specification finish throughout and flooring. Situated in Central Brighton within close proximity to the seafront."
"Yopa are delighted to offer a rare opportunity to buy this spectacular two bedroom, two bathroom period town house which has been modernised and refurbished to an impeccably high standard. Situated in Gloucester Road in Brighton in the heart of the vibrant North Laine area close to Brighton station."
"End of Terrace house with four bedrooms, two bathrooms and West Facing patio garden. It was build more recently than most properties in the surrounding area giving a modern build with period charm."
"** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** A five double bedroom HMO property in a great student location, currently let for £2708.00 pcm until 29/7/23. The spacious accommodation is presented in good condition and comprises five generously sized bedrooms, high-end bathroom and shower room, separate kitchen a..."
"Guide Price £550,000-£575,000 Avard Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom period Victorian house situated in the popular Ditchling Rise area of Brighton. Located between the Fiveways and the popular 'Level area'. There are local shops and cafes nearby and it'..."
"*** GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** An attractive red brick period property with HMO licence for five people, currently let until 15/08/23 at £2,708 pcm, then from 25/08/23 at £2,925 pcm. Prime location for student letting, just off Lewes Road, close to city centre, local shops and frequent ..."
"This is a great house located in a quiet cul-de-sac that is being sold with no chain, it also benefits from having a garage which is a rarity for the local area."
"***Guide Price £550,000 - £600,000*** A contemporary 3-storey townhouse situated in this popular location between Brighton seafront & Western Road shops offered to the market with no onward chain. This property would make an Ideal investment/holiday home or a main-family home. ..."
** 2 BEDROOM END OF TERRACE WITH PLANNING FOR FURTHER PROPERTY ** A opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom spacious end of terrace house with planning permission subject to conditions being met on land to the side of it for a further 2 bedroom property. Situated in a popular residential area in Cold...
"Fox & Sons are excited to bring to the market this beautifully presented home situated in a sought after location in Hollingdean. Benefiting from two bedrooms, lounge/dining room, kitchen, family bathroom and a West facing rear garden with raised patio area. Viewings are strongly recommended."
"GUIDE PRICE: £550,000--£600,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Perched up on the hill in Hollingbury, with far-reaching views over the local landscape, sits this well-presented three-bedroom chalet bungalow. It has been well-maintained by the current ow..."
"GUIDE PRICE; £550,000--£600,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. With three bright bedrooms, a large attic room and sunny west garden this appealing terraced house is an ideal buy or investment. In an area of the city popular with professionals and famili..."
"Mishon Mackay are proud to present this charming two-bedroom lower ground floor apartment in Sussex Square. Along with the delightful apartment, you also have access in the forever-famous Kemp Town Enclosures."
"A rare find, an extended semi detached bungalow all on one level. The property boasts a lovely lawned rear garden and shared driveway with enough space for a medium size car to be parked outside the garage. The property has been extended full width at the rear creating a lovely lounge dining room..."
"This lovely, detached bungalow is situated in a quiet close set back from main roads. With fantastic size rooms, a quaint low maintenance garden, this bungalow has room for improvement, ready for you to put your own stamp on!"
"GUIDE PRICE £550,000-£575,000 Set in the historic and elegant Chichester Terrace in the heart of Kemp Town, this regency apartment with over 1250 sq feet of space. Built circa 1855, this is an opportunity for buyers to enjoy a piece of history in a prime location. Thi..."
"A well presented refurbished family home in highly sought after North Woodingdean, just moments from the South Downs, country walks and high street, you could not to be better placed for local amenities and schools. Uniquely this property offers a 24 foot office / games room (with garage frontage..."
"**COME AND VIEW YOUR SELECTED APARTMENT** 37 Edward Street Quarter is part of Brighton's newest eclectic community where the best of the city will live, mix and meet. 60 luxurious one, two and three bed apartments, minutes from the sea and city centre; many with stunning coastal views. If you..."
| INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY | 5 DOUBLE BEDROOMS | IDEAL STUDENT HOUSE | PERFECT LOCATION | 
"2 Bedroom Apartment - Available to Reserve Quality living in a convenient location The Mews presents the opportunity to live in a popular area of Brighton offering a mix of one, two and three bedroom homes. Benefitting from a secure gated setting, these properties feature im..."
"* SHOW FLAT AVAILABLE TO VIEW - CALL NOW TO BOOK * Plot 10. Situated on the first floor is this BRAND NEW two bedroom apartment. Boasting spacious living accommodation, high specification throughout and situated in the desirable village of Rottingdean. PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE"
"A stunning three bedroom, bay fronted Victorian family home which has been significantly refurbished throughout. The property is conveniently positioned on Lynton Street, nestled just off Elm Grove, within easy walking distance to Brighton Station, North Laine district, the city centre and excell..."
"A very well presented and positioned, east facing second floor apartment located in the sought after Brighton Marina Village. Direct sea views, two spacious double bedrooms, bathroom, en-suite shower room, open plan living space and a west facing balcony."
"Yopa are delighted to offer this very well presented and lovingly maintained, spacious three bedroom bungalow with a large driveway and separate garage. This property benefits from a lovely tiered rear garden with stunning views in the most sought after area of Woodingdean, Brighton."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £528,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £800,000"
Fox and Sons are delighted to offer for sale this very well presented three bedroom family house with lovely rear garden. The home provides modern and open plan living with a light and airy feel. Viewing comes highly recommended.
An exciting opportunity to purchase a very well presented four-bedroom semi-detached family home situated on the popular Braeside Avenue – one of just six of such a bespoke design!
"Water laps against boats at anchor which you can enjoy from the ground floor, 18 metre terrace facing west for the sun with views over your own mooring. Brighton Marina is a popular location with restaurants and casino, and surrounded by the sea, this prime waterfront two-bedroom apartment is wit..."
"This beautiful terraced family house has been finished to a fantastic, modern standard. With a large hallway and a sizeable cloakroom there is plenty of room for buggies and shopping. The stunning open plan kitchen and lounge dining area leads to the lovely flat, rear garden. With great size bedr..."
"A FABULOUS 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE situated in this extremely popular & HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER RESIDENTIAL AREA. The property benefits from many features including LOVELY MODERN FITTED KITCHEN AND BATHROOM PLUS GROUND FLOOR CLOAKROOM, good sized front and rear gardens, GARAGE (current..."
"A STUNNING 3 BEDROOM extended VICTORIAN house located within the SOUGHT-AFTER HANOVER district of the city close to independent shops, cafes and pubs. The property has light & airy accommodation including a SPACIOUS THROUGH LOUNGE/DINING ROOM and newly fitted modern kitchen and bathroom. To the ..."
"A wonderful four-bedroom semi detached house. Not only does the home offer generous proportions throughout, but it also has a wonderful summer house which can be used as a guest suite or office space."
"Price Guide: £525,000 - £550,000 This delightful LIGHT & AIRY 2 bedroom detached bungalow is situated in this sought after area of NORTH WOODINGDEAN. Some of the property highlights include the conservatory, MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM, private low-maintenance rear garden, GARAGE & off road parkin..."
"Situated in this sought after road in Woodingdean is this LIGHT & AIRY 2 double bedroom detached bungalow. Some of the property highlights include the PRIVATE DRIVEWAY, garage, the SUBSTANTIAL garden area, the good size accommodation & the raised decked seating area. Viewings are highly recommend..."
This generous semi-detached family house is sat on a fantastic corner plot along with a double and single garage! With lovely size rooms and a huge rear garden this home is ready for someone to put their stamp on! With room for improvement and potential for further development (subject to plannin...
"GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 Location doesn't get much better than this, having beautiful distant views towards The South Downs to the rear and open downland to the front. Internally, the well cared for accommodation comprises a good size lounge for those cosy nights in, a large kitch..."
"PRICE GUIDE: £525,000 - £550,000 Situated in this sought-after area of Woodingdean is this LIGHT & AIRY 3 double bedroom semi-detached family home which benefits from GOOD SIZE ACCOMMODATION, a private driveway & a well-maintained rear garden. Some of the property highlights include the STUNNING..."
"A two bedroom Victorian terraced home situated close to Preston Circus. London Road station is within a few minutes walk and there is easy access to the city centre. The property requires modernisation and benefits from no onward chain. LORNE ROAD - TWO BEDROOM HOUSE - £525,000 - VIEWING BY AP..."
"A very rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this stunningly presented, 2 bedroom, ground floor apartment which benefits from a large waterside patio and access to your own 12 meter mooring. The property has been beautifully upgraded and with all the main rooms overlooking the water the ambience..."
"Offering a luxury lifestyle with sea views whenever you leave the building, this stylish two bedroom apartment in a classically beautiful Regency terrace has a great blend of generous proportions and contemporary sophistication. The private living/dining room is stunning with a vaulted skylight a..."
"An impressive immaculately presented detached bungalow measuring almost 1240 square feet. The accommodation is bright and spacious and offers wonderful views over Woodingdean and neighbouring countryside. If so, desired this property could quite easily be extended subject to the necessary plannin..."
READY TO MOVE INTO NOW A spacious two bedroom apartment with private balcony at the popular Edward Street Quarter development. Only a 0.4 mile walk to the beach.
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £525,000 Tucked away within the leafy environs of Patcham Old Village, this historic two-bedroom cottage is beautiful both inside and out, having been recently renovated to exacting standards using only the finest materials and craftmanship. Originally a 16th Centu..."
"HMO | This mid terrace house is a great investment opportunity achieving an excellent annual yield. Presented in very good condition, it is being sold with the current tenants in situ and is located on the East of Brighton, inland from The Marina in a highly sought after residential area."
Three bedroom detached home situated in a desirable location not far from Rottingdean village.
"Beautiful house, which is very well maintained and decorated in neutral tones, set within a gated mews with parking and a delightful slate tiled courtyard. Central location"
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£550,000 This attractive semi detached home is positioned directly opposite Westdene Green forming one of two mock Tudor homes. The accommodation whilst requiring some modernisation is currently configured with the ground floor comprising a living room overlooking th..."
"Guide Price: £500,000 - £550,000 Hamlyn Smith are delighted to present this three-bedroom semi-detached house with a fantastic garden in Eldred Avenue, Brighton, which has the potential to be a beautiful family home. Garage. Potential to extend, subject to necessary consent."
"***GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£550,000*** Set in a striking Regency building, this lovely apartment is offered with no forward chain. This lovely property has been very well-maintained and decorated throughout with accommodation spanning just over 1,000 square feet. ..."
"With a south facing balcony to embrace its prime location on Brighton’s seafront, every room in this two bedroom first floor apartment has views of the English Channel – plus it comes with a space in the underground car park. This iconic Grade II listed Regency building retains its op..."
"Three bed, semidetached family home located in Elm Grove. This property benefits from 3 double bedrooms, spacious lounge, separate dining room which leads to the kitchen. The property benefits from front & rear garden. The property is located on Elm Grove, near the Brighton Racecou..."
This is a charming house which offers buyers huge potential to extend and convert (STNPC). It currently offers versatile living and could be used as a two/three bedroom house. It is being sold with no chain and will prove popular.
"A very tidy and well-presented spacious house. Light, bright, and great for a family and for those wishing to work from home, with a home office set up downstairs and open plan living. The conservatory gives all year round views of the garden. The garden is generous in size with fabulous views an..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £525,000 *** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this stunning former school principals accommodation and office fully restored to it’s former regency splendour with no expense spared. The property enjoys the entire ground floor with its own outsi..."
"** Guide Price - £500,000 - £550,000 ** Grade II Listed Cottage which occupies a prime position in the heart of Rottingdean village in need of refurbishment."
"Located in an impressive Grade II listed townhouse with a generous fully-landscaped West facing garden, this is the most prestigious one bedroom garden apartment currently available in Brighton & Hove. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 *** THE FINEST ONE BEDROOM GARDEN APARTMENT CURRENTLY AVAILABLE IN BRIGHTON & HOVE. SET ON THE GROUND FLOOR OF AN IMPRESSIVE GRADE II LISTED SEASIDE TOWNHOUSE WITH A GENEROUS FULLY-LANDSCAPED WEST FACING GARDEN. Set on the slightly raised g..."
"Well-presented 4 bed chalet bungalow, located in a sought after location in Brighton. Accommodation comprises of on the ground floor, hallway, living room, kitchen with stylish freestanding units and butler sink, wet room with w/c and two double bedrooms. Stairs to first floor, landing, two bedro..."
"Superb light & airy 2 Bedroom GF gdn flat. Sit in a wonderful residential location close to Preston Park and three train stations. Some Oak Flooring, Good dec order with some period features Excellent size Lounge with mod kitchen, mod bathrm large master bedrm. Private rear Garden Gas heating."
"An exceptionally well-presented house, a fabulous family home, with its spacious open plan kitchen/breakfast area ideal for entertaining, all bedrooms are double so everyone has ample space, the extensive utility room would also make a home working office, generous sized rear garden is perfect fo..."
6 bedroom HMO which is being sold with tenant in situ. It would make an ideal investment and is close to the Royal County Hospital. Please contact us to arrange viewings and answer any questions you may have.
"Justin Lloyd are delighted to offer this large four bedroom family house with both front and back garden, driveway and garage. This family home is located in Woodingdean with great views over Ovingdean, along with sea views from the front of the property."
"Avard estate agents are delighted to offer for sale this 2 bedroom mid terraced house. The property does require some updating but is a fantastic prospect and must be viewed to be fully appreciated. The property is situated off the main busy road, in a quiet crescent but at the same time being cl..."
"Licenced HMO FOR SALE BY PRIVATE TREATY Guide Price: £500,000+ The property is fully let on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy Agreement expiring on 8th September 202 producing an annual income of £33,804 offering a current yield of 6.7%. On 16th September 2023, a new 12 month tenan..."
"David Harrington Property Group are the selling agents for this fantastic newly built detached three bedroom home. Offered for sale with no ongoing chain in Rotherfield Crescent, Brighton."
"Guide Price £500,000-£525,000Fabulous 3 double bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow with 2 bathrooms, G.C.H..,D.G., Off Road Parking, Modern Kitchen with integrated appliances, Front & rear Gardens with views of the South Downs. Situated in this sought after location close to amenities. SOLE AGENTS"
"***Guide Price £500,000 - £550,000*** We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning four-bedroom property which is situated over two floors in this beautiful semi-detached Victorian villa on a lovely quiet road. On the first floor of this superb home is a large hallway,..."
"Cox & Co are delighted to offer this two-bedroom converted apartment on the second floor of a period regency property in Central Brighton, just off the main seafront coast road. Cavendish Place is situated directly off Brighton seafront, quiet no-through road moments from the beach and i..."
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this two-bedroom, two-bathroom apartment located in Aylwin House on Dyke Road Avenue. Aylwin House is located in a prime location in Brighton, offering easy access to a range of amenities. The area is well-connected with excellent transport links,..."
"Enjoying an elevated position and exceptional views this beautiful home is definitely one for the short list! Immaculately presented throughout, you could quite literally move in, unpack and enjoy your new home and stunning surroundings without having to lift a finger! The location itself is high..."
** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this new to market beautifully presented 2 bedroom terraced house in an ever popular location in Brighton. Upon entering you are greeted with a large hallway which opens out into a huge open living dining area with plenty ...
This lovely bungalow is situated in West Saltdean and offers a good amount of space for a family home. The property consists of 2 good size bedrooms to the front with views across...
"** 3 BEDROOM MASIONETTE WITH ROOF TERRACE ** A well presented 3 bedroom maisonette in a sought after location near Lewes road, London road and the level in central Brighton close to local bus links and shops. Features include a open plan fitted kitchen with living room a fitted bathroom, roof ter..."
"GUIDE PRICE ~ £500,000-£525,000 This MUST SEE incredible SHARE OF FREEHOLD apartment is planted in a beautifully designed Victorian Terrace building, in the heart of Clifton Hill conversation area. With a PRIVATE ENTRANCE & TWO PRIVATE PATIO TERRACES it's not something to mis..."
"Let at £2,000pcm until July 2023, Woodingdean is a sought after area popular with professionals, families and investors as it is quiet but connected with local shops, cafes, restaurants and bus routes into the city and station around the corner- which also gives older children a degree of i..."
This Victorian house has a south facing garden and will make an ideal family home. It has a huge amount of charm throughout and all of the rooms are a good size. Many on the street have converted the loft which could be done if someone wanted to create more space (STNPC).
"A fabulous two-bedroom apartment in a sea front Kemptown Regency building. Two seconds from the beach and with its own private entrance, dedicated parking space and secluded patio. EPC: C Council Tax: B"
"Exquisite Luxury 3 Bedroom Apartment With Stunning Sea Views | This stunning Kemp Town seafront apartment features breath taking sea views, three double bedrooms and has been finished to an immaculately high standard throughout - viewings are an absolute must!"
"*** OFFERS OVER £500,000 *** THE FINEST ONE BEDROOM GARDEN APARTMENT CURRENTLY AVAILABLE IN BRIGHTON & HOVE. SET ON THE GROUND FLOOR OF AN IMPRESSIVE GRADE II LISTED SEASIDE TOWNHOUSE WITH A GENEROUS FULLY-LANDSCAPED WEST FACING GARDEN. Set on the slightly raised g..."
"A lovely two bedroom end of terrace house on George Street, central Kemp Town. Positioned just moments away from Brighton seafront as well as a whole host of amenities & local businesses making this the ideal location for this delightful home. "
This stylish semi-detached home offers fantastic bright and spacious living spaces throughout. Beautifully presented the open plan kitchen/dining area is ideal for entertaining and flows effortlessly onto the generous sunny rear garden. Double bedrooms and bathrooms are spread over both floors fo...
"Tucked away from the hubbub of Western Road and Seven Dials, while remaining in close walking distance, stand the Grade II listed townhouses of Norfolk Terrace. This exceptionally spacious one-bedroom garden flat is formed from the entire ground floor of one, so it has the soaring ceilings and or..."
This stunning apartment offers spectacular sea views and plenty of natural light
"Situated near Brighton hospital, Lewes Road & Brighton racecourse this location ticks all the boxes. Decorated beautifully throughout, this family home is super spacious, with additional handy basement storage area too. Step through the double French doors into the low maintenance rear garden. Of..."
"SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM THIRD FLOOR APARTMENT IN AWARD WINNING DESIGN 'BERKLEY HOMES' BLOCK WITH TWO BALCONIES & ALLOCATED CAR PARKING SPACE. Two double bedroom third floor apartment in Preston Mansions, a beautiful modern block of luxury apartments, completed in 2006, built by 'Berkley Hom..."
"Nicely set back from the road with delightful panoramic views at the front, this four bedroom semi-detached chalet bungalow offers immaculately presented accommodation and well-maintained front and rear gardens, both of which are of a manageable size. Generously proportioned rooms which consist o..."
"A newly built 3 bedroom, 2 bathroom detached house offering spacious accommodation over two floors, a contemporary kitchen featuring integrated Bosch & Neff appliances, off-street parking, a rear patio & garden areas, and a 10-year Build-Zone New Homes Warranty."
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£550,000 This attractive semi detached home is positioned directly opposite Westdene Green. The accommodation whilst requiring some modernisation is currently configured with the ground floor comprising two reception rooms, a family bathroom, fitted kitchen, conserva..."
"** LAST TWO BEDROOM REMAINING ** The Heritage Collection, newly renovated elegant two bedroom apartment, boasting lovingly restored period features. Located in the West Hill conservation area, ideal for Brighton station."
"Situated in the popular Hollingdean area of Brighton is this spacious semi-detached three bedroom family home. As you enter the property through the front porch, you are greeted by a spacious entrance hall with 'Parquet' flooring which leads you into the cosy living room with beautiful far reachi..."
"LAST REMAINING two bedroom apartment located in this stunning refurbished new build development. Boasting two bathrooms, this apartment has views over the tree lined street."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 This well presented apartment is situated in this attractive purpose-built apartment building. Constructed in the 1990's, the property benefits from secure underground car parking space with a useful storage cupboard. The interior of the property has been ..."
"Open to Offers! A charming detached bungalow with large bright rooms throughout. Fantastic location close to a large park and great walks. Beautiful garden that has been lovingly kept over the years and enjoys sun throughout the day. Potential to extend subject to planning, handy off street parki..."
"*NEW VIEWING PLOT LAUNCH EVENT SATURDAY 1ST APRIL * ECO FRIENDLY Three bedroom Terraced Home using Passivhaus principles situated on the outskirts of Brighton. Complete with a fully fitted kitchen, under floor heating and flooring throughout."
"Double fronted, detached, four bedroom chalet bungalow with two reception rooms, separate kitchen and a southerly aspect low maintenance garden, located in a popular family area. The property benefits from a single garage and workshop, with side access to the rear garden and stunning views to the..."
Semi detached two bedroom bungalow with off street parking and delightful rear garden.
"Streamlined yachts and the distant glitter of harbourside restaurants form a spectacular backdrop to this glamorous, two bedroom apartment which delivers a prime, waterfront lifestyle within Brighton’s cosmopolitan Marina. Both of the double bedrooms enjoy picture perfect views over the mai..."
"A beautiful and spacious patio apartment located on Kemp Town Seafront, which benefits from its own private entrance. Featuring a large master bedroom, spacious second bedroom with en-suite, and family bathroom. A modern fitted kitchen and an exceptionally large patio garden. SOLD WITH VACANT POS..."
"A beautifully presented ground floor three bedroom deco apartment in this iconic building. Boasting 3 double bedrooms a bow fronted living room with views across to the West Pier, separate kitchen and modern bathroom. This immaculately presented apartment comes with a Share Of Freehold. Internal ..."
A very nicely presented two bedroom apartment forming part of the second floor of a modern purpose built block in the sought after Brighton Marina Village. The apartment is approached via very well maintained public ways and passenger lift. It has a balcony that enjoys westerly views and is offer...
"***£475,000 - £500,000*** Well Presented, Victorian, mid terraced house located in a highly desirable area of Brighton. Accommodation comprises of open plan living area, kitchen, 3 Double bedrooms and family bathroom. the property also benefits from a private rear garden, fu..."
"A spacious two bedroom detached house situated in a highly sought after location close to local amenities and bus routes. The property is in need of modernisation but does benefit from large double aspect living room, kitchen overlooking the rear gardens with large lean to, ground floor bathroom ..."
"A very well presented, second floor, three bedroom apartment located in a central position close to Brighton seafront and Steine Gardens."
"**GUIDE PRICE £500,000 to £550,000**Three bedroom semi detached chalet bungalow in Patcham Village which has been extended to provide two bedrooms and an en suite bathroom in the loft space of the property. "
"A spacious and bright modern house, well decorated, with open plan living, in Hanover close to Queens Park and in the catchment of St Luke's School"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £500,000 *** ADJACENT TO THE SEAFRONT IN A FAMOUS BRIGHOTN SQUARE . A SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM TOP FLOOR MAISONETTE WITH A SOUTH FACING ROOF TERRACE. SHARE OF FREEHOLD AND NO ONWARD CHAIN. This well-presented top-floor maisonette offers a..."
" A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, two double bedroom, mews house forming part of a GATED DEVELOPMENT offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, immediate vacant possession and GARAGE."
"Chain Free! Built circa 1974 and with one careful owner, this impressive, detached family home offers more than 1300 square foot of spacious accommodation and stunning views of the south downs and coastline."
"GUIDE PRICE £475,000 to £500,000 This extended family home features a spacious through lounge dining room with Karndean wood flooring and an open plan modern kitchen, creating a great social living space. The living room has plenty of space for sofa's and a dining table and chairs. From ..."
"£475,000-£500,000 Avard estate agents are pleased to offer for sale this 2 bedroom semi detached bungalow with a fantastic rear garden. Ladies Mile Road is situated in a desirable location in Patcham being ideal for nature lovers, dog-walkers and families with nearby nature reserve (know..."
"A lovely two bedroom apartment, nestled within the buzz of Brighton. The property exudes a wealth of natural light and internal space, throughout. Also including both front and rear courtyard."
"** IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** A substantial six bedroom licensed HMO property with potential for high rental returns, benefitting from a two storey side extension plus conservatory to rear, increasing the original footprint considerably. The accommodation consists of six bedrooms, two sh..."
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* A licensed 5 bedroom HMO situated in a popular student location, within walking of Brighton University Moulsecoomb campus and frequent transport links to the city centre. Accommodation comprises of lounge, kitchen and 2 bedrooms on the the ground floor, 3 bedrooms, bathroom ..."
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* A licensed 5 bedroom HMO situated in a prime spot for students, just a short walk from Brighton University Moulsecoomb campus and frequent transport links to other campuses and the city centre. Accommodation comprises of lounge, kitchen and 2 bedrooms on the the ground floo..."
"This stunning and recently constructed semi-detached family house offers beautiful features throughout. Immaculately presented with sleek and stylish decor, en suite to principal bedroom, off street parking and the Downs on your doorstep, all offered with no onward chain. The location here is fan..."
"A beautifully presented, two double bedroom, mews house with garage & off road parking, the property is sold with no onward chain."
"An IMMACULATELY PRESENTED, two double bedroom apartment with a SOUTH FACING PATIO with a SHARE OF FREEHOLD."
Newly refurbished 5/6 bedroom detached house which has a lovely finish throughout. It is being sold with no onward chain and would make a lovely versatile family home.
"OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 8TH APRIL 2023 - by appointment only. This well-proportioned and spacious double fronted period flat, its own private entrance front and back, is also in a fabulous location. Close to town with all its amenities and transport links yet set well back from the road with a stunni..."
"Step inside this modern 2 bedroom maisonette on Queen’s Road in the centre of Brighton. Located over two floors, the first floor of this stunning duplex is dedicated to an open-plan lounge and kitchen area and a WC while the second floor is comprised of two double bedrooms and a lar..."
"This delightful two bedroom cottage style property is a fantastic opportunity to acquire a charming home in a sought-after location. With its spacious living areas, beautiful garden, and convenient location, this property is sure to appeal to a range of buyers. "
"A WELL PROPORTIONED 3 bedroom semi-detached FAMILY HOME situated in a POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION. The property is in need of some modernisation and updating but benefits from SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION, LAWNED REAR GARDEN and GARAGE situated at the rear. Energy Rating: D66 Exclusive to Maslen Estat..."
"Three double bedroom semi-detached bungalow sold with no chain. Private parking infront of the house, and a shared driveway leads to the garage.Both bathrooms are renovated, west facing garden with stunning sea view, conservatory with new glass roof, hard wood decking & hot tub in the garden."
"Fox & Sons are delighted to market this stunning four bedroom end of terraced house, situated on Bevendean Road. The property benefits from accommodation over three floors, four bedrooms, two bathrooms, generous living/kitchen area, sunny rear garden and off-road parking. This is a must see!"
Avard estate agents are delighted to offer for sale this 3 bedroom semi detached house situated just off the popular Ladies Mile Road . Portfield Avenue is located in the sought after residential area in Patcham. Close by is the A27 taking you out onto the London Road. Within a short distance dri...
"A two bedroom older style terraced house in a popular location bordering Preston Circus and the Roundhill conservation area, midway between Fiveways and 'The Level' recreational park. Generously proportioned rooms which could be reconfigured upstairs to create three bedrooms by relocating the ba..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £525,000** Offered with no onward chain and boasting a prominent position on Rottingdean's historical High Street, we are pleased to be able to offer a wonderful opportunity to acquire this charming Grade II listed flint fronted character cottage, which is surprisingly ar..."
"OIEO £475,000Bloomsbury Street, Brighton. Located within the heart of kemp town village and just a stones throw from Brighton's iconic beach. This is one of the most sought after locations, within close proximity are a variety of local shops, quaint cafes, restaurants and bars, al..."
Three bedroom semi-detached bungalow which is well presented throughout. All three bedrooms are a good size and the master has an en-suite. The kitchen/diner is a good size and it would be ideal for numerous different types of buyers including the family market or someone looking to downsize.
"Situated on the first floor of this beautiful building with views across the park, big windows and lots of light. You are walking distance to the train station and within the 'Golden Triangle' area of popular Fiveways with coffee shops, local shops and foodie pubs and a friendly community. Virtua..."
***COMING SOON*** Fox & Sons are delighted to market this three bedroom Victorian townhouse. The accommodation is split over three floors and has the added benefit of not only one rear terrace but two and a rear garden! This is a must see and viewings by appointment only.
***COMING SOON*** Fox & Sons are delighted to market this beautifully presented two bedroom terraced house situated in the heart of Hanover. This is a must see and viewings by appointment only.
"VILLAGE PEOPLE! This pretty cottage is set in the heart of the Old Village in Patcham encompassing all that is great with a village setting. The location is considered to be excellent with a local bakery, Co-op, hardware store, delicatessen's, and a selection of cafes. The ground floor accommodat..."
"A 2 Bedroom apartment positioned on the 3rd floor of Embassy Court, designed in 1936 by the Modernist architect Wells Coates and retaining some original features."
**CENTRAL BRIGHTON LOCATION | 3 BEDROOMS | PATIO COURTYARD | NO ONWARD CHAIN**
"This three storey town house is situated in the heart of Rottingdean having sea views from the front. Victoria Mews is situated just off West Street close top local shops, cafes, pubs, restaurants as well as the beach and promenade. No Onward Chain"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £462,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £700,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £461,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £699,000"
"A spacious family home, ideally positioned on a most favoured street in the popular Coombe Road area. This three bedroom extended semi-detached house benefits from views of the South Downs National Park. The property comprises entrance porch, spacious hallway with storage, downstairs WC, a good s..."
"REF: BS0374 Beau Sullivan Estate Agent powered by eXp are delighted to market this four bedroom, five bathroom town house located in the heart of the city centre. 
"
"DEAN & CO - A 3 bedroom house with modern shower room, PRIVATE driveway, GARAGE & good size attractive GARDEN being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Ideally located for local schools and other amenities, shopping is available in Carden Avenue or at the nearby Asda superstore, M&S food hall & Matalan."
"**BOOK YOUR TOUR** A spacious 1 bedroom apartment over two floors giving it a house like feel and featuring an enviable private patio. Centrally located on the edge of the North Laine Quarter, this duplex property is located within a boutique development ROX, which features an array of commun..."
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom Apartment – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000*"
"A well presented, SPACIOUS, third floor, two double bedroom apartment with a GARAGE and lovely views across Preston Park offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and a SHARE OF THE FREEHOLD."
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this period property, conveniently located just off of Preston Street and within close proximity of the beach, West Pier and promenade. Brighton is an exciting and lively city with an amazing variety of festivals and activities all year round. Th..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented and spacious three bedroom home situated in a premier road within Patcham. As you enter the property you have a large, enclosed porch with space for shoes and coats. To your right is a superb fitted kitchen/diner which runs the full leng..."
"** CHAIN FREE, 3 BEDROOM, WEST GARDEN ** A three storey house, with a large lounge/diner with oak flooring, downstairs WC and an extended kitchen, with French doors out to the West garden. 2 bedrooms and family bathroom on the first floor and a loft conversion bedroom 2 on the second floor, with ..."
A newly renovated end of terrace house. A great family home with a modern kitchen and bathroom. A spacious rear garden with far reaching views .
"Guide Price £450,000 - £490,000 Three bedroom end of terraced house in the centre of Rottingdean, less than 500 metres from Rottingdean beach with great sea views."
"This modern semi-detached family house has a fantastic layout and generous living accommodation. The stylish kitchen / diner to the rear is perfect for entertaining guests, with the separate lounge for those cosy winter nights. The garden and powered cabin just add to the vast offering of this home."
Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this outstanding two bedroom apartment which occupies part of this recently converted building conveniently located just off Brighton seafront in the quiet residential Russell Mews. This apartments benefits from being ideally situated with Brighto...
"This is a wonderful opportunity to acquire this VERY WELL PRESENTED, three bedroom semi detached house, which is located in this PRIME LOCATION, close to the Moulscombe train station which offers FANTASTIC TRANSPORT LINKS to the Universities and Brighton town centre. Local shops are located (cont.)"
"New to the market is this stunning split level maisonette situated in central Brighton. The spacious apartment is within walking distance of the bustling Seven Dials where an array of local shops, cafes and restaurants are at your disposal. Within less than a mile you have Brighton mainline stati..."
"** CHAIN FREE AND REFURBISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD ** A beautifully presented 2 double bedroom, 2 storey Victorian terraced home with a 23ft open plan lounge/kitchen/diner. This home has new windows, new kitchen with integrated appliances, new bathroom, redecorated throughout and new flooring. Fron..."
"A newly refurbished 3 bedroom maisonette, modernised and finished to a high standard throughout. The property will be sold with vacant possession on a lengthy lease, features ORP for a small car or motorbike, a garage and a small outside terrace. "
"A four bedroom HMO with accommodation over 3 floors. It is currently let out for £2500 pcm making this a fantastic investment opportunity. It is a perfect location for students close to local amenities within easy access to the universities and into the city centre.
"
"***Guide Price - £450,000 - £475,000*** Truemans are delighted to offer to the market this second-floor two double-bedroom luxury apartment which occupies part of this recently converted building conveniently located just off Brighton seafront in the quiet, residential, exclusive gated d..."
"Maslen Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this 2 bedroom detached bungalow in a SOUGHT-AFTER AREA of Woodingdean, close to a FREQUENT BUS SERVICE offering EASY ACCESS TO THE CITY CENTRE. This property has loads of potential & benefits from being offered for sale with NO ONWARD C..."
A meticulously refurbished second floor apartment situated in a prime location in a Regency building adjacent to Brighton's seafront.
"***GUIDE PRICE: £450,000 - £475,000*** *HMO INVESTMENT or FAMILY HOME* Robert Luff & Co are delighted to bring to market this deceptively spacious five bedroom house situated in this popular residential area located close to Brighton City Centre. Piltdown Road is located within Whitehaw..."
"Tucked away in the Cul-De-Sac that is Luther Street, is this beautiful two bedroom Hanover home. The property is completely turn key, so a stunning and more than comfortable finish. One can see in the photographs how well finished the house is, and what a great sociable space it is. The floor is ..."
A stunning 2 double bedroom luxury balcony apartment which forms part of Sirius 2 - a MODERN development within the exclusive Brighton Marina Village. This BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED and spacious apartment enjoys far-reaching VIEWS as far as Brighton Pier to the West. Accommodation includes a large op...
"Freehold to whole property. Blending period charm with lovely contemporary design, this is a quite magnificent living space in a brilliant & much sought after location. Two double bedrooms, open plan living and a courtyard garden. Close to seven Dials. Handy utility area"
"Delightful semi detached house in a sought after road, close to great schools and nurseries. All double bedrooms, large bright open plan kitchen/diner, fantastic large rear garden with sunshine all day. Great potential to extend subject to planning. Useful garage with handy off street parking and..."
"Spacious Maisonette which is being sold with no chain, has a share of the freehold, three bedrooms and is over 1,100 sq ft. The ground floor has open plan lounge dining room the leads to the well-presented kitchen."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. A fantastic semi-detached family house with a driveway and a garage. There is an abundance of potential to put your own stamp on. . This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your informat..."
"Fox & Sons are delighted to welcome to the market this six bedroom semi-detached 1930's house. Located in Bevendean, there's an array of local shops, excellent transport links and the South Downs close by for Sunday walks. This chain free house is one not to be missed, viewings by appointment only."
"*NEW VIEWING PLOT LAUNCH EVENT SATURDAY 1ST APRIL * A brand new two bedroom terraced home situated on the outskirts of Brighton close to Fiveways. ECO FRIENDLY HOMES using Passivhaus principles and also come complete with a fully fitted kitchen, under floor heating and flooring throughout!"
"GUIDE PRICE: £450,000--£500,000. SHARE OF FREEHOLD. CHAIN FREE. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. With exceptional garden and park views from every room and a stylish interior, this generous two-bedroom apartment impresses from the mo..."
"46ft South Facing Rear Garden With Garden Room / Office | This spectacular two storey period maisonette has two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, period features, two entrances and a magnificent sunny rear garden with garden room / office. A share of the Freehold & outside dog shower are ..."
Greenacres is a fantastic purpose-built apartment block situated in Preston Park. The block is beautifully maintained and has lift access to the apartment.
"*** DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITY *** A rare opportunity to purchase a two bedroom semi-detached house with large rear garden, which has planning permission to erect an adjoining house to the side under Planning Ref: BH2019/01195. The vendor has commenced on the proposed works by undertaking the de..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 *** WONDERFULLY POSITIONED FACING BRIGHTON SEAFRONT; A FANTASTIC 2 BEDROOM GRADE II LISTED PENTHOUSE APARTMENT WITH A SUPERB ROOF TERRACE OFFERING UNRIVALLED SEA VIEWS. SHARE OF FREEHOLD. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This impeccably-presen..."
"Spacious and bright Maisonette situated in a tranquil leafy street near East Brighton Park, Brighton Marina and a short walk to Kemp Town Village, the seafront, Brighton College and The Royal Sussex Hospital. Large living room opening to the dining area. "
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 Offered for sale with No-Ongoing chain and providing flexible living accommodation is this three/four Bedroom Semi Detached Family home. The property is presented in good condition whilst requiring some finishing off in a few areas, allowing the new owner ..."
"***Guide Price: £450,000 - £475,000*** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this outstanding two bedroom apartment which is situated on the first floor of this recently converted building conveniently located just off Brighton seafront in the quiet residential Russell Mews. ..."
"Step inside this magnificent two-bedroom apartment in the famous Royal Crescent Mansions on Marine Parade. This apartment not only benefits from generous proportions throughout as well as stunning sea views, but it also has the addition of the allocated underground parking space which is a real r..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 *** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this semi-detached house ideally situated in this fantastic location close to the A27 with great direct bus links into Brighton and close to local supermarkets and the downs. Accommodation offers li..."
Fantastic two double bedrooms and two bathrooms in the sought after Alexander Quarters Development. The location of this property is perfect with easy access to Brighton mainline station and also being within walking distance of both 7 Dials and Western Road with its range of bars and restaurants
"We are pleased to offer, with no onward chain, this deceptively spacious terraced house which is thought to date back to the early 1900s. Originally arranged as two bedrooms and two receptions, the property is currently arranged as three bedrooms and two receptions. The property has been really..."
Spacious Top Floor Flat of an attractive period building in a prime central location close to the shops and bars and restaurants with a short stroll to the seafront. The property could either be rented out or would also make a fantastic home. The accommodation is arranged over one floor and inclu...
"Fabulous ground floor apartment which we understand was previously the Ballroom from when Tudor Close was a hotel. The apartment has a lovely 22'9 x 17'9 living room, two double bedrooms, a fitted kitchen with appliances, a bathroom and use of the communal gardens. Viewing Essential."
"An attractive period property located close to The Level & Seafront. Offering spacious accommodation but in need of complete refurbishment. With Two Bedrooms, Bathroom, through Living Room, Breakfast Room, Kitchen & Cellars. Gas CH & Dble Glazing In need of complete refurbishment. Chain Free. SOLE A"
"David Harrington Property is delighted to offer to market this Fantastic Apartment located in Sharpthorne Court on Cheapside, Brighton."
Striking views over Patcham and the South Downs are one of the many wow factors of this property! The accommodation has been reconfigured to offer spacious living accommodation that includes a 14'9 lounge which has been opened to the 14'9 dining room with doors leading directly to the patio area....
"*** SHOW HOME NOW AVAILABLE*** WAS £300,000 NOW £290,0000 Stunning 2 bed, Ground Floor, new build apartment located in a quiet close on the outskirts of Brighton. Accommodation comprises two double sized bedrooms, bathroom and open plan living/dining/kitchen area, leading t..."
This spacious first floor apartment is part of a select development of apartments having been constructed in 2016. The beautifully presented accommodation features a 22' living/dining/kitchen area with direct access to the south facing balcony. The kitchen has contrasting high gloss anthracite an...
"GUIDE PRICE: £450,000 - £475,000 PARKLIFE! Offered for Sale with No-Onward Chain, A Share in the Freehold and a Balcony benefitting a West and Southerly aspect. Presented in fantastic condition with white décor and recently laid grey carpets this Fourth Floor apartment is simply ready to..."
"Chain Free! Charming, detached bungalow in an incredibly sought after cul de sac in the heart of North Woodingdean, a short stroll from the shops, bus stops, & schools, means that everything is on your doorstep, with ample off-street parking & easy to maintain garden."
"A modern extended end of terrace family home offering more than 1200 Square foot of bright and spacious accommodation. The kitchen/diner is without a doubt the heart of this home, a beautiful space to gather the family at meals time or entertain on a more formal basis."
 Well proportioned buy to let investment located in the popular Coombe Road being within a short walk to Brighton University and the many amenities on Lewes Road. 
"7 Lenham Avenue, Saltdean, BN2 8AE We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £425,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts take..."
"The PropertyWe are pleased to present this stunning first floor, two bedroom and two bathroom Loft style apartment, centrally located in Brighton's North Laines, This former Evening Argus printworks building provides plenty of history and character located on Robert Street within the North Laine "
"Chain Free! Built in approx. 1850 this historic home has been given a modern twist. Modern kitchen and Shower room, with underfloor heating. Located in a quiet yet central street which is just a walk to the train station, shops and the seafront. Lots of fun on your doorstep, all that Brighton has..."
Dual aspect two bedroom two bathroom apartment located on the eighth floor benefitting from an East facing Juliette balcony.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £429,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £650,000"
"A licensed four-bedroom HMO which is let until 05/09/2023 at £2,100 pcm (£25,200 pa) then from 06/09/2023 for a further 12 months at £2,350 pcm. A 1930s end of terrace house with a generously sized west facing garden, situated in a popular area for students. Well maintained accommodation which co..."
This two bedroom house in Centurion Road is an excellent opportunity for those seeking a comfortable and stylish home in a fantastic location. Don't miss out on the chance to make this property your own. Chain Free!
"A well presented and fully furnished 5 bedroom end of terrace house in this popular location with off street parking. The property has a full HMO licence and currently achieves £550 per month for the double rooms and £520 per month for the single which generates £32,640 per annum. This is a fanta..."
"This quaint, mock Tudor style semi-detached bungalow is elevated in a popular part of Westdene with fantastic views! There is still room for improvement in this home, ready for you to put your own stamp on it! The handy garage is welcome addition to this lovely home."
"GUIDE PRICE: £425,000 - £450,000 Our vendors have enjoyed many happy years in this spacious three bedroom home with far reaching views and being ideally positioned opposite an open green. The ground floor comprises a useful entrance porch that leads to a 14' separate living room with vie..."
"** LOTS OF LIVING SPACE & A 38FT SOUTH-WEST FACING GARDEN ** A deceptively spacious 2 storey 2 bedroom Victorian terraced house, located towards the lower end of Elm Grove. 2 large reception rooms and an extended open plan kitchen/breakfast room on the ground floor. 2 bedrooms and a family ba..."
"A charming three bedroom home situated in central Brighton moments from the seafront/ promenade and Western Road where there is an array of boutiques, restaurants, cafes and bars."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 Situated in this private courtyard development within the heart of Patcham Village is this two bedroom pretty flint face cottage. The ground floor comprises of a fitted kitchen with integrated appliances, 14' living room with French doors leading out to t..."
"A gated entrance to this block makes it safe and secure, an ideal for a 'lock up and leave' located within the Laines of Brighton. Top floor apartment with city views, 2 balconies and a large living space. Everything is walkable from your doorstep - the beach, restaurants, bars, shops."
"This chain free home is an exciting project not to be missed. Accommodation over three floors and additional loft space, there's lots of potential. Viewing highly recommended to appreciate the space this home has to offer!"
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to the market this semi-detached family home, situated in the heart of Coldean, close to local shopping facilities, parks, schools, bus routes, mainline station and the A27. Accommodation offer entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three good sized ..."
"OPEN HOUSE THIS SATURDAY (1ST APRIL) - by appointment only. Guide Price £425,000- £450,000 This semi-detached family home is located in a quiet cul-de-sac, in a popular residential location close to the Amex Stadium. Excellent sized rooms throughout, sunny rear conservatory and dining room, leadi..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000. Superb apartment occupying the entire lower ground floor of this attractive, well managed period building. The property benefits from good sized rooms, a large hallway and a lovely layout, all combining to create a real sense of space throughout. The wel..."
"This fantastic family semi-detached house gives generous living accommodation to the ground floor with roomy, light, bright bedrooms to the first floor, with room for improvement and potential for further development, it is the perfect opportunity to put your own stamp own."
Having potential to refurbish and add your own stamp is this two bedroom bungalow. The current configuration comprises a 14' dual aspect living room; 12' kitchen with a range of basic wall & floor fitted units; a shower room with a modern fitted walk in shower unit; and two bedrooms. Outside the ...
"This big, bright four bedroom Bevendean house with a sunny garden currently provides an income of around £25,000per annum, as an HMO. Good to go with double glazing, central heating and a modern kitchen and bathroom, Bevendean is well connected with local bus routes to Brighton University a..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautiful bri...
"A spacious three/four bedroom semi-detached bungalow with garage and 140ft multi-tiered garden, enjoying a South-West aspect and downland views from the rear of garden. Generously sized accommodation with the added benefit of a conservatory/living space to the rear and further scope to convert th..."
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY to acquire this BRIGHT & SPACIOUS 2 double bedroom GROUND FLOOR GARDEN FLAT in an EXCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT of purpose built flats, located on a sought-after road adjacent to Surrenden Road; a short walk from PRESTON PARK, train station and a selection of local shops and amenities...."
Fox & Sons are delighted to market this generously proportioned three bedroom terraced-house in a popular location. Situated beside the sought after stunning South Downs National Park and within walking distance to the cosmopolitan city of Brighton and coastal beach. This is a must see!
"Offered with no onward chain, this well-proportioned, two double bedroom, detached, single storey bungalow enjoys an elevated position in the increasingly popular Coldean Village, with an open outlook to the rear alongside good size front and rear gardens and garage. Internally the property offer..."
"SPACIOUS & WELL PRESENTED 3 bedroom BAY FRONTED mid terrace FAMILY HOME situated on this popular residential street in the HOLLINGDEAN AREA of Brighton close to highly rated local schools, local shops, amenities and bus links to the town centre. Highlights include L shaped open-plan kitchen, dini..."
"Spacious and bright well presented top floor two double bedroom purpose-built flat with allocated parking in sought after Montpelier area close to the station, shopping centre and seafront. Lounge diner and a well-fitted kitchen feature the flat has the benefit of a long lease and share of freehold."
"*** OFFERS OVER £425,000 *** A MODERN THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE WITH A LARGE WEST FACING GARDEN LOCATED IN HOLLINGDEAN. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This property is a very good-size and modern throughout. On the ground floor, there is a large living and dining room and a sepa..."
A spacious and well positioned two-bedroom semi-detached bungalow with fantastic potential to improve and extend (STPP).The property comprises o...
"Chain Free! *Guide Price £425,000- £450,000* This deceptively spacious family home is a fantastic purchase. Located on the outskirt of Bevendean, with views across the city and backs onto the South Downs. Beautifully modernised throughout, you can unpack your bags and move straight in!"
"New to the sales market is this stunning, recently updated three bedroom, two bathroom apartment with glorious panoramic sea views from all major rooms. This superb property is situated on the second floor of Courcels which is a purpose building block in Kemptown, just north of Brighton Marina."
"Chain Free! This beautiful home sits on an impressive corner plot with the wonderful views westerly across Woodingdean roof tops and beyond. Internally the house presents well with an abundance of modern technology. Outside there are gardens predominantly to the front and side of the property, wi..."
"Panoramic Views, Two Double Bedrooms, Two Bath / Shower Rooms & 23ft Living Space | A spacious and beautifully presented fourth floor Art Deco apartment with a breath-taking 23ft living space, two large double bedrooms and two bath / shower rooms located in the beating heart of the City centr..."
"** Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 ** The picturesque painted terraces of Hanover rise from the leafy level at the heart of the city to the playground and tennis courts of Queen’s Park, and this characterful two/three bedroom Victorian house between the two has a plen..."
A two bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW in the SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION of North Woodingdean! The property benefits from a lovely kitchen/dining room which leads out into a sun room with access to the rear garden. The front garden is paved providing OFF STREET PARKING. The property is offered with NO ONWAR...
"Absolutely stunning, two-bedroom ground floor garden flat, with its own entrance, in a highly sought after location close to Brighton city centre. Large reception room, separate kitchen/breakfast room. Beautifully decorated and presented throughout. West-facing garden. Share of Freehold."
"Charming bungalow in highly sought after North Woodingdean, this delightful home is ideal for someone who wants to downsize to be closer to nearby shops and bus routes or someone looking to put their own stamp on somewhere, with a lovely rear garden, beautiful sea views, ample off street parking ..."
"Hamlyn Smith are delighted to present this fantastic semi-detached 1930s family house which has a large south-facing garden, off-street parking for two cars, and directly overlooks Stanmer Woods on Coldean Lane."
*READY TO VIEW NOW* A luxury two bedroom first floor apartment located in the heart of Brighton just moments from the seafront/ promenade. Russell House benefits from having lift access to all floors and a concierge service.
"Three Bed Townhouse's in Bright & Bubbly Brighton, Available from £416,250 for a 75% Share Through Shared Ownership | Call to View for More information!"
A truly stunning flat with direct sea views one way and downland views the other. Offering two double bedrooms and a well thought out layout throughout. This is a cool and unique apartment right on the seafront with access to the Kemptown enclosures.
"AVAILABLE TO MOVE INTO NOW - A stylish two bedroom, two bathroom apartment with open plan kitchen, living and dining area. Onsite concierge service and residents lounge."
"Occupying an elevated position within a popular residential area, an end of terrace 1930's three bedroom house with west-facing garden and panoramic views. Well laid out accommodation which consists of a separate lounge, full-width kitchen/diner, three bedrooms and bathroom. Corner plot with scop..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £413,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £625,000"
"OPEN HOUSE THIS SATURDAY (1ST APRIL) - by appointment only. A great terraced family house with generous rooms, lovely living space and pretty rear gardens the (potential for self-contained student/teen/business potential internal annex) is an easy configuration, even with its own front door! Ther..."
"* READY TO MOVE INTO NOW * This fourth floor one bedroom apartment comes complete with a high specification finish throughout, integrated appliances and quartz worktops. Situated in central Brighton, this apartment is within close proximity to the seafront and mainline train station."
"Three Bed Townhouse's in Bright & Bubbly Brighton, Available from £408,750 for a 75% Share Through Shared Ownership | Call to View Now!"
"An ideal family home which has three bedrooms, a modern kitchen diner, spacious, bright lounge and good size, split level garden with pleasant views. It is end of terrace with private parking for a couple of cars to the front."
"This stunning two bedroom top floor apartment in the heart of Brighton offers lovely views over the Old Steine and is just moments from the beach, bars and restaurants!"
Charming detached chalet bungalow In a highly sought after cul de sac in Woodingdean. Although the home may benefit from some updating it offers fantastic space throughout and has huge potential. Further scope to extend is on offer subject to planning and some beautiful far reaching views can be ...
"Spacious purpose built apartment with three double bedrooms, two balconies, reception room, two bathrooms with one ensuite and a separate kitchen. Perfectly placed near Brighton Marina and a short stroll to Kemp Town. The balconies offer fantastic views towards the Sussex Downs and Brighton Seafr..."
A fabulously situated two bedroom terraced home offered to market with potential to enlarge throughout subject to the relevant consents
"Set directly on Brighton´s lively seafront and positioned on the second floor of an attractive period converted building, Marine Parade is situated perfectly; the apartment is located within easy reach of everything Brighton has offer."
"Chain Free! Rarely available traditional and original semi-detached family home with eat-in kitchen overlooking the garden, additional utility area/garden room plus plenty or storage. This is the perfect opportunity for someone looking for a blank canvass that they can really make their own home...."
"This investment opportunity is an exiting prospect for any experienced, or first time Landlord. With immediate return on investment, and low hassle due to the property's excellent condition, the house represents a safe and lucrative investment, but with further options to add capital value and im..."
"*HMO investment!* Successful fully occupied HMO, rear garden ideal for alfresco dining, situated in the popular residential area of Bevendean. Within walking distance to the universities and transport links into the city, Cureent rental £2330 pcm. No onward chain!"
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 | Brimming with potential to add considerable value, this generous two-bedroom apartment is a rare gem in the city. Elevated on the second floor of an attractive Mid-Century apartment building in central Hove, it also benefits from far-reach..."
"A spacious two bedroom fourth floor apartment with over 950sq/ft of internal accommodation in Sussex Heights, Sussex's tallest mid- century purpose built developments."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000
An extremely spacious two bedroom ground floor Regency style apartment situated moments away from Brighton's prestigious seafront. The property is extremely spacious and has loads of potential for someone who is looking to put their own touch on a propert..."
"Originally built in the 1980s as a family home but currently rented as a four bedroom let with HMO licence in place and achieving £24,685 per annum gross income. Nestled at the foot of the hill which leads to Brighton Racecourse, at the end of a cul de sac, adjacent to football/basketball courts,..."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 | With some of the most exceptional views in the city and with bright, generous rooms, this two-bedroom, upper floor apartment is immediately impressive. From its elevated position, it enjoys sea views between the rooftops of the local h..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 *** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to bring to market this spacious two bedroom apartment situated on the second floor of Park Royal. Park Royal is to be found on Montpelier Road above the junction of Montpelier Terrace and is within a short walk of th..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £450,000 *** AN IMPECCABLY WELL-PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM LOWER GROUND FLOOR PERIOD APARTMENT WITH A GARDEN AND A PATIO EXCELLENTLY-POSITIONED IN THE CLIFTON AND POWIS DISTRICT. Tastefully-decorated to an exacting standard, this spacious l..."
"Have you ever dreamt of waking up, watching the sun rise and then sitting on your own PRIVATE BALCONY and watching the sun set? Well look no further. Open House Estate Agents are pleased to be able to offer to the market this stunning 2-bedroom first floor apartment, which is situated in the (cont.)"
"A well presented two bedroom, semi-detached family home on North Road, in the heart of Portslade Village, with a private driveway and rear garden. This home boasts an abundance of natural light throughout. Upon entering, there is a spacious living room and sperate kitchen...a great soc..."
"A very nicely presented, bright and spacious apartment with two double bedrooms, a good sized balcony and sea views, situated in a central location close to the beach."
"This recently renovated two bedroom house offers a fantastic opportunity to live in one of Brighton's most sought-after locations. With its stylish interior, off-street parking and private outdoor space, this property is sure to impress - Viewing highly recommended!"
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £450,000*** This well-presented, two double bedroom apartment is situated on the fourth floor of this prestigious Boardwalk development. The property offers impressive Westerly views towards the City and benefits from its own private balcony to enj..."
This quaint terraced house has a lovely kitchen / breakfast room with a separate lounge. The garden is a brilliant size with both patio and decking area prefect for those summer barbecues. There is even a powered cabin room with storage. The parking and side access are also a welcome addition to ...
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, I-Am Sold. Huge potential and chain free this semi-detached home is just waiting for new owners ..."
"Offers In Excess Of £400,000. Outstanding three bedroom apartment, in what potentially Brighton best pocket of the city, Queens Park. The property offers all one would want from an apartment, Share of freehold, Parking, West Facing Balcony, opposite the park, perfect in every way."
"A delightful two bedroom, South facing lower ground floor apartment with a light and bright aspect to the front, situated in a prime location within a conservation area and offered to market with no onward chain."
"Two Double Bedrooms, Two Bath / Shower Rooms & 23ft Living Space | A spacious and beautifully presented third floor Art Deco apartment with a breath-taking 23ft living space, two large double bedrooms and two bath / shower rooms located in the beating heart of the City centre close to the sea..."
"Being set back from the road and offering good size accommodation is this three bedroom semi detached home requiring modernisation. The separate living room benefits from far reaching views, whilst the dining room overlooks the rear garden. The galley style kitchen has a range of fitted base and ..."
Mishon Mackay are proud to present this spacious three bedroom semi-detached home with a large south facing landscaped garden.
"Located on the outskirt of Bevendean, this deceptively spacious family home is a fantastic purchase. With hilltop, country views across the South Downs this home is tastefully decorated throughout, you can unpack your bags and move straight in. The rear wrap around garden is a fantastic size too!"
David Harrington is delighted to offer for sale this attractive 3/4 bedroom house on Bevendean Crescent.
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: To be sold by public auction on the owners' instruction. A two-bedroom beachfront apartment with spectacular views. Ideal for investors or owner-occupiers. To be sold via online bidding on Friday, 28 April 2023. Auctioneer's comments: 'This Lot offers the buyer a rar..."
"** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this spacious three bedroom end of terrace house in an ever popular area of Woodingdean. Upon entering you have a good size hallway with the perfect space for coats and shoes, moving through you have a separate lounge to o..."
"Forming part of this imposing and attractive double-fronted Victorian Villa, this spacious three double bedroom apartment occupies the entire first floor and is offered with no onward chain, long lease and a share in the freehold. With Seven Dials on your doorstep the property is perfectly posit..."
"Fox and Sons are delighted to offer this bright and well laid out family home situated on Coldean Lane in the highly sought after Coldean Village area of Brighton. With three bedrooms, two reception rooms a generous rear garden, parking and a garage. This is a must see!"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £396,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £600,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £396,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £600,000"
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this well presented, modern fitted two bedroom apartment located in Russell Mews, Central Brighton. This apartment has everything to offer. Upon entering the apartment through the entrance hall you will find your open planned kitchen/diner/living ..."
"Excellent opportunity to purchase this 4 bedroom HMO with a tenancy in place to offer immediate return on investment. Situated in a student hot-bed, this property has been consistently and reliable let as to student sharers for an extended period of time. Nice finished with bells and whistles..."
"An attarctive and spacious 2 doubel bedroom, 2 bathroom first floor purpose built flat with west facing balcony, forming part of this small modern block situated in the highly favoured Surrenden locality. * * NO ONWARD CHAIN * * "
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** In the PERFECT LOCATION with a very MODERN and PRACTICAL LAYOUT this 2 bedroom apartment is ideal for a FIRST TIME BUYER or INVESTOR LANDLORD. Its been RECENTLY LET OUT so has ALL COMPLIANCE/SAFETY certificates that a owner occupied property wouldn't usually have.
Peacefully positioned between Lewes Road and the countryside stands this smart four bedroom student house. EPC: C Council Tax: C
"Spacious Ground Floor Regency Flat With Two Double Bedrooms | This extremely spacious raised ground floor flat spoils you for space with high ceilings, lots of storage and a long renewed lease all situated in a highly desirable position between Brighton mainline station & trendy Seven Dials!"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £393,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £595,000"
"A good size, light & airy, 2 BEDROOM PERIOD FAMILY HOUSE situated in a popular residential location, CLOSE TO FIVEWAYS with its range of independent shops & cafes, and within the catchment area for good local schools. The property WOULD BENEFIT FROM INTERNAL MODERNISATION AND UPDATING but would m..."
Well-presented 2 bedroom flat located in Brighton Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hall Bright and spacious living room/diner with original marble fireplace Well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units Generously sized master bedroom Additional well...
"Your Move are delighted to present this newly refurbished lower ground floor flat located in the heart of Kemptown. The property is a two minute walk to the seafront and the infamous promenade, perfect for summer. The property also benefits from being close proximity to the well regarded Brighton..."
"Beautifully decorated throughout, this garden flat is a great find! Enter via your own private entrance, each room is a great size and has been recently modernised throughout. Located in the heart of Kemp Town with original features come and take a closer look. Being offered chain free."
"Rarely available 3 BEDROOM END OF TERRACE family home situated in the quiet cul-de-sac running adjacent to Rotherfield Crescent & Carden Hill as well as close to local schools, bus routes & shops. The house benefits from many features with GAS FIRED CENTRAL HEATING, a REAR PATIO/GARDEN and GARAGE..."
"Offered with no onward chain, this deceptively spacious three double bedroom bay fronted 1930s family home enjoys an elevated position in the increasingly popular Coombe Road Area. Internally all rooms are considered well proportioned, enjoying a great sense of natural light and comprising of a ..."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. A sizeable house in the popular Elm Grove close to the highly sought-after Elm Grove school and Brighton general hospital. Great location for access to town, station, and the seafront. Ideal for a large family or for those needing home offices. Enclos..."
"This 3 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR & LOWER GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE is located within an attractive red brick Edwardian building. Ideally located in a quiet street in central Brighton, just behind Park Crescent, close to local independent shops & cafes, approximately 10 minutes walk from Brighton Station..."
One bed apartment on the Fifth floor offering East facing views with the added benefit of a balcony. Only 0.7 mile walk to Churchill Square Shopping Centre.
"Guide Price £380,000 - £400,000. Fantastic apartment occupying the first floor (top) of this well maintained period building. The apartment benefits from good sized rooms, a split level layout and plenty of natural light all combining to create a real sense of space throughout. The spac..."
Looking for a pied-a-terre by the sea? This super bright and inviting one bedroom apartment may just be what you have be searching for! Having been subject to a complete refurbishment and the property is presented in immaculate order. Upon entry there is a useful cloakroom and the open plan kitch...
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £380,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £575,000"
"GUIDE PRICE: £380,000--£400,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Set within a substantial Victorian house on a tree lined road close to Preston Park, this bright and airy two-bedroom garden flat is brimming with period character and charm. It bears the ge..."
If you're looking for a property turn key condition then take a moment to look at this beautifully presented 2 bedroom apartment that has been tastefully updated throughout offering restful water views towards the inner harbour from both the living/dining room and main bedroom. The living/dining ...
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. A generous semi-detached family house with great size bedrooms, a lovely kitchen/diner, separate lounge and handy utility space incorporating a downstairs toilet. This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £376,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £570,000"
"**75% RESERVED** 37 Edward Street Quarter is part of Brighton's newest eclectic community where the best of the city will live, mix and meet. 60 luxurious one, two and three bed apartments, minutes from the sea and city centre; many with stunning coastal views. If you thrive on creativity the..."
CASH BUYERS ONLY | A rare opportunity to acquire a superb purpose built apartment with two double bedrooms and two bathrooms situated in the extremely popular New England Quarter of Brighton City centre moments from Brighton mainline railway station. A private balcony gives you some spectacular v...
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000*** A ground floor two bedroom flat forming part of a grade listed converted property located on one of the city centres most highly sought after roads."
"Robert Luff & Co are delighted to offer to market this ideal investment opportunity comprising a three bedroom HMO in Dewe Road. This property benefits from a kitchen/diner, three bedrooms, bathroom and rear garden."
"** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer this new to the market two bedroom family house, it has a wealth of space and potential in a brilliant family location. The property comprises of a large kitchen with space for a eat in dining table area, you have a large separate ..."
Terraced family home in a friendly neighbourhood within walking distance to good schools and all the fun that Brighton has to offer. Lovely views and a good size rear garden.
"**Guide Price - £375,000 - £400,000**This charming two bedroom maisonette apartment is located in the heart of central Preston Park area. Just a few minutes walk from Preston Park train station, this property is ideally situated within easy access of the park itself as well as surrounding amenities"
"A newly decorated two bedroom flat situated in one the most advantageous locations in Brighton. This uniquely placed property with no ongoing chain is an ideal investment, pied-a-terre or primary residence. The entire flat is flooded with light from the east and west and has a spacious 16ft x "
Semi-detached house | Two double bedrooms | Spacious lounge | Kitchen/breakfast room | Family bathroom | Attractive corner plot | Mature garden | Gated driveway
"This is a very attractive property with minimal work required to bring it to its full potential. As such, it represents a great opportunity for any buyer seeking an excellent investment. A lovely semi-detached home on the outskirts of Brighton, the property offers a range of benefits. From its g..."
"Five bed semi-detached house offering flexible accommodation. Accommodation comprises downstairs of entrance hall, 2 bedrooms, W/C, and kitchen/diner with access to the rear garden. Upstairs, there are a further 3 bedrooms and family bathroom. The property benefits form having a HMO License, rear..."
BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY. Fox & Sons are delighted to offer this two bedroom converted ground floor apartment situated in a sought after location close to the seven dials and Brighton station.
"Sitting in the midst of Brighton’s thriving city centre, spanning the entire top floor of a striking Regency building just minutes from the sea, is this generous, sun-filled, two-bedroom apartment. It is exceptionally spacious and beautifully renovated using a stylish, clean palette alongsi..."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000Introducing Prestonville Court, Dyke Road. Situated in one of the most prestigious locations, this area is perfectly positioned between the South Downs, National park and the city. Within walking distance to Preston Park and Brighton station, p..."
** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment in this ever popular location near the city centre. This two bedroom apartment has plenty of space to offer with a separate lounge to the front with a large bay window provid...
We are pleased to offer to the market this deceptively spacious three bedroom mid terrace house is being offered for sale having been refurbished throughout over the past three years. It is the perfect home for a first time buyer or family who are looking to be in a great location. This h...
"Offered with no onward chain. A deceptively spacious three bedroom, two reception, bay-fronted, early 20th Century terrace located in the increasingly popular Coombe Road district of Brighton, with ease of access in and out of town on foot, by bus or the cycle lanes. A sweet flagstone front garde..."
"Three bedroom semi-detached house that has garage and driveway, three bedrooms, separate cloakroom and a spacious lounge/dining room. It would make an ideal family home and is sure to prove popular."
Quirky two-bedroom mews house in the heart of Kemp Town Village with off-street parking.
"Ideal first time buy in a very popular location that moments from the sea and it is being sold with no chain. It is beautifully presented throughout, including two bedrooms, kitchen/diner, modern fitted bathroom and private patio garden."
"A spacious and well-presented two bedroom apartment with a private patio garden situated in the heart of Brighton, this property is sold with a share of the freehold and no onward chain."
Two Double Bedrooms & Stunning City Views | A spacious and beautifully presented second floor Art Deco apartment with two double bedrooms and balcony located in the beating heart of the City centre close to the seafront & mainline railway station!
Share of freehold second floor flat that is being sold with no chain. The building benefits from having a communal garden that only the building can use as well as the Kemptown enclosures
"Tucked away in a quiet cul de sac and enviably close to the South Downs this well presented 2-bedroom bungalow is sure to be popular. Competitively priced and just a short stroll from the shops, bus stops, and schools, means that everything is on your doorstep. Driveway and off-street parking. Ea..."
Stunning this two-bedroom apartment which offers incredible sea views as well as direct views of Brighton's famous Palace Pier. The apartment benefits from being on the third floor with the addition of the passenger lift which is in exceptional condition. The building and the communal...
"Tucked privately away behind gates in a secret mews at the heart of the fashionable Kemptown Village, this modern two bedroom house with allocated parking is a rare find. Perfect for health professionals or investors as both the University Medical School and Royal Sussex County hospital are both ..."
Avard Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this fabulous two bedroom beautifully presented ground floor apartment. Benefits from having a new lease granted in 2022 with 165 years remaining. Situated in the heart of Kemp Town's vibrant village with its vast array of boutique independent s...
Set back from the road in a commanding position is this attractive two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow with phenomenal views over Patcham and the South Downs National Park beyond!
"Guide Price £400,000 A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three bedroom, semi-detached home with potential to improve. Situated in Pankhurst Avenue of Brighton with plenty of good schools nearby, including St Lukes, Queens Park and Elm Grove Primary schools. Queens Park itse..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £390,000 SPACIOUS, GROUND FLOOR, TWO BEDROOM GARDEN APARTMENT** This purpose-built, Art Deco style apartment has a hallway, kitchen with door opening onto a private terrace, living room with wood burner and doors out to a Southerly aspect private walled garden, two doubl..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £373,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £565,000"
"Situated within the Village Square this top floor, 3 bedroom apartment is well positioned to easily get to all the cafe's, shops, restaurants and leisure facilities the marina has to offer. The spacious living/dining room, with its feature West facing box window, is open plan to the large fitted ..."
"If you are looking for a bolt hole by the sea in a stunning Regency style, Grade II listed building on the seafront then this super 1 bed may just fit the bill! Moments from the beach The Balcony Flat enjoys an East and West facing aspect with some original features but has recently been refurbis..."
"Located to the upper floors of this imposing 19th century building, on the sought-after Clifton Terrace, is this spacious maisonette. Not only does this location impress with its regency style terrace homes, but its close proximity to the sea and city centre amenities makes this a real gem. Boast..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £369,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £560,000"
"OFFERS OVER £365,000. Period Property. Split level two bedroom apartment just off Kemp Town Seafront and in the heart of the Village. Share of freehold. Beautifully presented with a spacious reception room, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms and bathroom. Viewing highly recommended "
"With the wow factor only a fabulous waterfront location can deliver, this exclusive two bedroom apartment with secure, allocated parking enjoys panoramic, sweeping views over the tranquil waters of the inner lagoon of Brighton Marina from its south facing balcony. Quietly tucked away on a gated p..."
A delightful two double bedroom terraced home offered to market in good condition throughout and with the added benefit of off road parking for two vehicles!
Book now to arrange your viewing of this penthouse one bedroom apartment - Stamp duty exemption fees apply for first time buyers -a great opportunity not to be missed
"* CENTRAL BRIGHTON LOCATION * 50% NOW RESERVED * Situated in central Brighton, this BRAND NEW one bedroom top floor apartment is within close proximity to the seafront and mainline train station. Complete with a high specification finish throughout, integrated appliances and flooring!"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £363,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £550,000"
"MyHaus Brighton welcome you to Embassy Court, a glorious two bedroom apartment in an iconic Grade II listed building. The property is located right on the infamous seafront of Brighton, moments from the beach, and close to the shops and cafes of Western Road. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE £360,000 - £380,000 *** An opportunity to acquire this amazing ground floor duplex apartment which has been completely renovated throughout in this brand newly converted building located in the very heart of the city centre. The property is finished is to a high standard..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £359,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £545,000"
This well presented 2 bedroom apartment sits nicely overlooking the inner harbour with peaceful water views. The living/dining room is a perfect spot to relax and take in those views and has access to the balcony. The kitchen is fully fitted and well equipped with all appliances included and bene...
"***GUIDE PRICE £350,000-£375,000*** A rare opportunity to acquire a truly impressive example of period architecture in a prime location in central Brighton. The location is second to none with easy access to Brighton Mainline Railway Station, making this property idea..."
"Set back from the road in a tucked away location, this spacious three bedroom flat is situated on the first floor of a low-rise purpose-built block. Immaculately presented interior with three generously sized bedrooms, lounge/dining area, fitted kitchen, bathroom and separate WC. Enjoys a peacefu..."
"Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000. Superb apartment occupying the entire lower ground floor of this attractive Grade II Listed property on Brighton seafront. The spacious accommodation comprises two bedrooms, south facing lounge diner, separate kitchen, bathroom and shower room (both Ensu..."
"AVAILABLE CHAIN FREE. This 3 bedroom mid terrace family home is situated in this sought after area of Woodingdean which is close to a FREQUENT BUS SERVICE offering EASY ACCESS TO THE CITY CENTRE. The property benefits from off street parking, good size accommodation & has lots of potential. View..."
"One Bedroom Mews House with private parking. Perfectly formed Cottage style house with allocated parking in a friendly gated community moments from the seafront and within Kemp Town Village. One double bedroom with walk in wardrobe, spacious living room, fully fitted kitchen and bathroom."
Fox & Sons are delighted to welcome to the market this five bedroom flat on Lewes Road. The property is arranged as a five bedroom HMO with tenants in situ' until August 2023. The property can only purchase as an investment only.
"NEW BUILD - available March 2023, reserve now! An exclusive selection of only two new build semi-detached family homes finished to a good specification. Three bedrooms, 1 double and 2 singles are located on the first floor along with the family bathroom."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £350,000-£375,000 *** A VERY WELL-PRESENTED AND SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM PURPOSE-BUILT FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH A PRIVATE BALCONY AND A COMMUNAL ROOF TERRACE. EXCELLENTLY-POSITIONED CLOSE TO PRESTON PARK AND LONDON ROAD TRAIN STATION SOLD WITH NEW LEASE ON C..."
"* READY TO MOVE INTO NOW * Plot 5. Situated on the first floor is this stunning one bedroom BRAND NEW apartment boasting large living spaces, master bedroom with an ensuite. Finished to a high specification throughout apartment also comes with an allocated parking space."
"A secret, spacious hideaway this beautiful one bedroom apartment with use of the exclusive gardens for residents with a tunnel to the beach is private and quiet with large, light rooms. At the back of a magnificent Grade I listed house in one of the UK’s finest Regency terraces it has a dis..."
"Delightful Chain free mid terrace house, ideal for those looking to get onto the property ladder. Off street parking for two cars and a fantastic garden. Good size rooms throughout including lovely kitchen and lounge/diner. Walking distance from great shops, bus routes and local schools."
"GUIDE PRICE:£350,000--£375,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. CHAIN FREE. Sitting in one of the city’s most historic shopping thoroughfares, tucked in next to the newly regenerated Open Market, The Level and Preston Circus, this unique..."
"OPEN HOUSE Saturday 8th April 11am-12pm by appointment Only This is a semi-detached bungalow which is need of modernisation and redecoration comprising: lounge, two bedrooms bathroom, sep wc, front and rear garden with private driveway. Sought after Rottingdean location."
"James & James Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented first floor maisonette situated in this residential area of Brighton. In brief the accommodation comprises private entrance with stairs to first floor, spacious landing, contemporary lounge/kitche..."
Jacobs Steel are delighted to offer for sale this attractively positioned one double bedroom ground floor flat in a popular central location of Brighton also benefitting from no on-going chain.
Fox & Sons are offering a spacious two bedroom second floor apartment situated in the popular New England Quarter moments from Brighton Mainline Station.
"***GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £360,000*** A fantastic opportunity to acquire this third floor apartment which has been tastefully modernised throughout and is situated in the very heart of the city which is only a stone's throw away from the best shops, restaurants, bars and everything you ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE: £350,000 - £375,000*** Situated in a fantastic Grade II listed building, this spacious two bedroom flat benefits from having its own private entrance. Once in the property, the lobby leads into a spacious living area which is south facing and benefits from the large w..."
** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer new to the market this spacious two bedroom apartment in the ever popular Preston Grange with stunning views overlooking Preston Park. Upon entering the building you are greeted with a very well kept entrance hall and communal parts...
"** Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000 ** Enjoy a guilt free, luxury lifestyle in this chic, eco sensitive two bedroom apartment where a private balcony looks over a broad walkway and a large communal roof garden is perfect for parties. At the pedestrian heart of the award winn..."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 Offered For Sale with no ongoing chain is this spacious, modern family home with two double bedrooms. This lovely home boasts a generous kitchen/dining room with white modern high gloss units, built in appliances and a tiled floor. There is a separate loun..."
"This 3 bedroom terraced home is situated in this SOUGHT-AFTER area of Woodingdean & is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property benefits from lovely views of the fields, good size accommodation & the well presented rear garden. Viewings are highly recommended. Energy Rating: C71 Exclu..."
"Fox & Sons are excited to bring to market this fantastic two bedroom apartment with incredible views overlooking Preston Park. The property comprises of two bedrooms, family bathroom, large living room, kitchen and balcony. Viewings are highly recommended."
"A fabulous, feel good retreat this stylish one bedroom cottage with allocated parking is one of a kind, securely tucked away within a gated mews. Full of light and brimming with character this black and white, flint faced property is a hidden gem with a sociable ground floor where French doors fr..."
"A well-presented 2 bedroom terraced family home situated in a popular area with GREAT VIEWS over Woodingdean to Happy Valley and Downland. The property further benefits from GOOD SIZE ACCOMMODATION, a separate GARAGE, modern kitchen & good size garden with access gate to the rear. Viewings high..."
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 - £375,000***
Spacious Luxury Purpose Built City Centre Apartment | Situated in the beating heart of Brighton City centre, this fabulous apartment offers two double bedrooms, bathroom and en suite shower room, a 26ft living space and a private balcony so you'l..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 *** A WELL-PRESENTED AND SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH A BALCONY AND PARKING SITUATED IN THE PRESTON PARK AREA Set on the first floor of a well-maintained apartment block, this good-sized flat is decorated in ..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION on 26th April 2023 Auction Guide Price £350,000+ Freehold residential investment comprising of 2 self contained flats as follows: Ground Floor Self contained studio flat with garden benefiting from a lower ground floor that, subject to any necess..."
"Situated in the extremely popular & HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER area of Kemp Town, CLOSE TO THE SEAFRONT is this MID TERRACED 2 STOREY, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM ground and first floor MAISONETTE. The property would make either a good home for FIRST TIME buyers or a BUY TO LET INVESTMENT and is offered for sale ..."
"Yopa are delighted to offer for sale this spectacular, fully refurbished one bedroom semi detached bungalow with private driveway and spacious patio garden."
"This is a stunning newly refurbished family home which has two double bedrooms, modern fitted kitchen/diner, private parking space and front/rear gardens."
"***Offers over £350,000*** Tenure: Share of freehold. Property Description: This spacious, light-filled, internally modernized, and redecorated two double-bedroom flat occupies the entire first floor of this converted period building, sharing its entrance with one other flat only..."
"Step inside and admire the astonishing views across the city from this two-bedroom apartment positioned centrally within the Kemp Town Village. With a south facing balcony, great proportions throughout as well as easterly facing windows from the bedrooms, the natural light throughout this home is..."
"On a road that connects you to the leafy centre of the city at The Level (5 minutes on foot) and open countryside by our glamorous racecourse (10 minutes stroll) this big, bright two bedroom maisonette offers a convenient location – and a stylish open plan lifestyle with a sun deck large en..."
"Purplebricks Brighton & Hove is delighted to offer this delightful spacious one bedroom lower ground floor garden flat in a fantastic location close to the centre of Brighton and within easy reach of Brighton train station, for quick access to London and Gatwick. A stones throw from the beach and..."
"
Luxurious Purpose Built Balcony Appointment Moments From Brighton Station | This spacious second floor apartment boasts two double bedrooms, two bathrooms, communal gardens & roof terrace as well as its' own private balcony!"
"***Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000*** A fantastic first floor apartment is situated in a sought-after location which is within walking distance of Preston Park station, making it ideal for commuters. The property benefits from no onward chain, an allocated parking space and the use of a..."
"Superbly presented garden apartment in the heart of Kemp Town Village with its cafe culture, recently renovated to a high standard with refitted bathroom and a great kitchen that opens out to a south facing garden"
"A large, light and airy 2 BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT in a well maintained and enviably situated PURPOSE BUILT block CLOSE TO PRESTON PARK and central Brighton. The good sized accommodation includes a large lounge/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room as well as parking and a GARAGE and COMMUNA..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN This 2 DOUBLE BEDROOM terraced house is situated in a POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA, close to bus routes to Brighton city centre and within easy reach of local shops. Highlights include good sized accommodation including a 16'10 x 10'2 DUAL ASPECT LIVING ROOM and 15'0 x 10'2 master ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 TO £375,000. FOX AND SONS are excited to bring to market this spacious two bedroom first floor apartment. The property comes with share of freehold, a parking space and access to the communal pool."
"Beautifully presented spacious raised ground floor flat with high ceiling, off street parking space, offered for sale with no onward chain."
"This property will be available today and gone tomorrow. The location is second to none and it doesn't get any more central than Norfolk Square. If you want spacious living space, then this stunning two bedroom ground floor flat would be perfect!"
"Period | Garden | HW estate agents are delighted to offer this wonderful Georgian conversion, lower ground floor apartment situated in the ever desirable Sussex Square with its tranquil an..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £346,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £525,000"
***NO CHAIN***This well presented 2 bedroom apartment enjoys a light and airy feel with views towards both the inner and outer harbours. The living/dining room with access to the balcony enjoys an East facing aspect as does the main bedroom both with views towards the harbours. The kitchen is wel...
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £343,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £520,000"
"GUIDE PRICE: £340,000 - £350,000 AVAILABLE CHAIN FREE this lovely unique 2 bedroom first floor split level maisonette in a sought-after area of Roedean. Some of the property highlights include the large triple aspect top floor Living Room with STUNNING VIEWS, good size accommodation & the re-fit..."
A fabulous newly refurbished top floor one bedroom apartment situated on the Montpelier/ Clifton Hill Conservation area of Brighton.
The Property Houseen Lettings is pleased to present this fantastic two double bedrooms and one bathroom in the sought after City Point Development of Central Brighton. The location of this property is perfect with easy access to Brighton mainline station and being within walking distance of both 
"Phillip Mann are extremely pleased to offer for sale this WELL MAINTAINED FAMILY HOME, which is situated in this POPULAR and DESIRABLE AREA. The property which is being offered with no chain is situated within walking distance to local shops, Happy Valley recreational grounds and direct bus links..."
"Synonymous with glamour from the streamlined yachts at anchor to its al fresco waterfront restaurants, Brighton Marina is a go to destination of our cosmopolitan coastal resort. Stylish and spacious, this two bedroom apartment with an allocated parking space, 24 hour security and the possibility ..."
"A stylish, three double bedroom ground floor flat, would make a great buy to let investment with planning permission granted for HMO for 3 people. Alternatively the property would make an ideal first time buy with the possiblity of renting rooms for additional income. Currently the property is i..."
*TOWN CENTRE LOCATION* A luxury one bedroom first floor apartment located in the heart of Brighton just moments from the seafront/ promenade. Russell House benefits from having lift access to all floors and a concierge service. READY TO MOVE INTO NOW
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! - An opportunity has arisen to acquire a bright dual aspect, 2 bedroom apartment with tenants in situ! The property enjoys direct inner harbour views to the East and a South facing balcony from the living/dining room. Located from living/dining room is the fully fitted kitche..."
Eighth floor one bedroom apartment NEWLY RELEASED located in Phase 1 of Home-X part of the Preston Barracks regeneration Available to move into now.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £330,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £500,000"
"*** OFFERS OVER £330,000 *** SPACIOUS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR MAISONETTE WITH A BALCONY VERY WELL SITUATED IN THE PRESTON PARK AREA. CHAIN FREE Neatly presented throughout, this well-lit home boasts a good-sized lounge, a separate kitchen, two double ..."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, I-Am Sold. Located in southerly Woodingdean near the ever-popular Happy Valley, this well presen..."
A rare opportunity to acquire a superb purpose built penthouse apartment with two double bedrooms and two bath / shower rooms situated in the extremely popular New England Quarter of Brighton City centre moments from Brighton mainline railway station. A private balcony gives you some spectacular ...
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £327,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £495,000"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £335,000 *** LOCATED IN CENTRAL BRIGHTON, VERY CLOSE TO THE STATION. A MODERN ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FOURTH FLOOR OF A PURPOSE-BUILT BLOCK WITH A PRIVATE BALCONY, COMMUNAL ROOF TERRACE AND ACCESS TO BIKE STORAGE. A modern..."
"GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 An utterly unique one/two bedroom first floor apartment offered to market with no onward chain and its own private garden."
"***Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000*** Highdown Court is one of three luxury apartment blocks on this prestigious development. There is seasonal use of an outdoor communal heated swimming pool. Preston Park with its sporting amenities including tennis courts, cycle track, bo..."
New to the market is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a two bedroom apartment in one of the best locations in Brighton. As you walking into the flat you have on your left a bright and spacious lounge kitchen area at the front of the building with large bay windows and a modern kitchen with spa...
"A unique opportunity to purchase a rare three-bedroom ground floor apartment situated in the ever-popular Westdene, offered to market with a..."
"A deceptively spacious one double bedroom flat situated on the ground floor of a charming period property, offered to market with no onward chain and with its own private garden!"
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000 This stunning ground floor flat is set in an idyllic position being directly opposite Preston Park and the very popular 'Rotunda' café. Upon entering this apartment you immediately notice the attention to detail with a mix of contrasting freshly plastered ..."
A stylish and skilfully converted one bedroom split-level seaside apartment with roof terrace and stunning views direct to sea and along the coast towards Brighton Beach and Marina beyond. A sympathetic blend of contemporary design within an impressive period building. Favoured position on the 4t...
"A DELIGHTFUL 2-BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT situated in the extremely popular & highly sought-after residential area. Benefits include MODERN FITTED KITCHEN & BATHROOM, gas-fired central heating, ATTRACTIVE REAR PATIO & LAWNED GARDEN. Exclusive to Maslen Estate Agents. Energy Rating: C70"
"Fox & sons estate agents are delighted to market this extended three bedroom semi-detached house within walking distance of local shops, park and schools. Regular bus services into Brighton City centre are close by. Viewings by appointment only."
"Two bedroom first floor flat situated in sought-after location off popular Elm grove. Queens Park with its leisure facilities as well as local schools are close by while the City centre, the seafront and main line railway station are easily accessible on foot. TWO BEDROOM FLAT - WELLINGTON ROA..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 *** Offered with no onward chain and its own private terrace, this beautifully presented two double bedroom raised ground floor period conversion forms part of an attractive bow-fronted townhouse and is perfectly positioned for those seeking the vibrancy ou..."
"ASKING PRICE £325,000 | This is an excellent opportunity to get your hands on a well presented two bedroom first floor flat with a sunny rear garden! Situated on a quiet residential street in a sought after location, you're just moments from all local amenities and transport links on Lewes R..."
"* Guide price £325,000 - £350,000 * Ground floor flat with its own entrance conveniently located for access to the city and beyond. Private rear garden, with patio area, ideal for entertaining in the summer. Move in condition, ideal first time buy."
Share of Freehold converted flat which is also being sold with no onward chain. It is beautifully presented throughout and a lovely blend of period features and modern touches. It has use of Kemptown enclosures and would make an ideal first time buy.
"This spacious two bedroom apartment offers partial Sea views and views over Old Steine Gardens. The property offers a open plan lounge /to a very modern Kitchen, Modern Bathroom and two double bedrooms."
"A real pad by the sea with views of the beach and sea, this one-bedroom split level flat is a unique blend of modern chic design and good old-fashioned elegance. The property comprises: communal entrance and lift, hall, open plan kitchen/ reception room, double bedroom, bathroom, and balcony...."
"Kendrick Property Services are delighted to offer for sale this versatile 2 double bedroom ground and first floor maisonette that occupies a prime central location, just off Lewes Road and therefore within immediate proximity of all amenities, including bus routes to the seafront and City center. "
"This two bedroom first floor flat with private rear patio garden is located in a popular residential area, with good transport links to the city centre, Brighton Station and the universities. The property is accessed via its own street entrance and consists of a full width living room, separate k..."
"Offers In Excess Of £325,000. Beautifully presented one bedroom apartment for sale in the heart of Kemptown. Boasting a South facing patio garden, double bedroom, fitted kitchen, bright and sunny reception room. Share of Freehold. Perfect for anyone wanting a turn key apartment in a fanta..."
"Guide Price - £325,000 - £335,000 Viewing advised on this stunning apartment located in the very popular Goldsmid Road, just a short walk from the popular Seven Dials. The apartment has be..."
"Giant Corinthian columns adorn this magnificent Grade II Regency mansion in Busby’s symmetrical masterpiece Portland Place, designed to frame the sea which sparkles at the end of the terrace. Inside has a sunny east/west disposition and an elegant 572 square feet (53.1m2) to enjoy including..."
"Well presented, 2 bed, semi-detached house located in a sought after residential area of Brighton. Accommodation comprise downstairs of entrance hall, lounge/dining area and kitchen. Upstairs, there are two double bedrooms and family bathroom and separate WC. The property benefits of a rear garde..."
"Two Bedrooms In Montpelier / Clifton Hill Conservation Area | This fantastic second floor period conversion is spacious, has no onward chain & is located the heart of the City centre close to everything you could possibly want including the seafront, Churchill Square and Brighton mainline rai..."
"Stunning Maisonette that is being sold with no chain. Located moments from Brighton beach, Soho House and Brighton town centre. There is a lift in the building and the flat has a private roof terrace with stunning views."
" A fantastic opportunity to acquire this third floor apartment which has been tastefully modernised throughout and is situated in the very heart of the city which is only a stone's throw away from the best shops, restaurants, bars and everything you could possibly need. Brighton's famous seafront..."
1 Bedroom Apartment With A Garden - Available to Reserve Luxury living in a convenient 7 Dials location. 
"Set in vast communal grounds, this stylish two bedroom apartment is in an exclusive location within a 4 minute walk of the legendary cafes, arts venues and restaurants of the North Laine and a scenic stroll through fountained gardens to the sea. Ideal for local professionals, commuters and invest..."
"***Cash Buyers Only***This delightful two bedroom purpose built apartment is situated in a popular conservation area located in a highly sought after location in Brighton close to local shops, boutiques bars and restaurants. With its bohemian feel and great community spirit close to Kemp Town it ..."
Two bedroom ground floor flat situated in the heart of porthall.
"Big enough for work, rest and play, this stylish two-bedroom apartment has leafy views at the front and back and a spacious, landscaped garden which steps up to catch the sun. Good to go with a sunny living room, two double bedrooms which do not share a wall and a streamlined fitted kitchen it is..."
"This well presented spacious and bright 9th floor flat has breathtaking panoramic views of the seafront, across to the Marina, situated in Kemp Town close to all its shops, bars and restaurants. Easy access to the Marina with its cinema and large superstore, ideal for a couple or young family, a ..."
Two bedroom converted flat which is located in on a wide avenue in central Kemptown and has the sea at the end of the road. It is being sold with no onward chain.
"Recently converted, stunning 2 bed Maisonette located in a favourable residential area of Brighton. Accommodation comprises on the first floor of a fully tiled family bathroom with bath and overhead shower, open planned kitchen/dining area with fully integrated appliances and separate lounge area..."
Jacobs Steel are delighted to present to the market this one double bedroom split level maisonette on the second and third floor of this period building being walking distance of central Brighton and with the added benefit of no onward chain.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 *** A delightful two bedroom flat with generously sized garden which has a pleasant leafy outlook to the rear. Forming the ground floor of an attractive Edwardian double-fronted property and benefiting from its own street entrance. Well presented accommodat..."
** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this new to market spacious one bedroom apartment with own private entrance in the ever popular Port Hall area. This spacious one bedroom apartment has a fantastic feeling of space yet a real sense of cosiness. Upon enteri...
Spacious two bedroom apartment | Lovely views | Open plan kitchen/lounge | Well maintained modern building | Short walk to seafront and North Laine | Walk in wardrobe | Bike storage | Leasehold 111 years remaining
Ground floor apartment in a landmark building on the edge of Kemp Town just up from Brighton Marina. Well-presented from the offset with a welcoming hallway. Large windows in all of the principle rooms offering impressive natural light throughout.
"***GUIDE PRICE £325,000-£350,000*** Immaculate apartment offered with no forward chain situated in a favoured block along The Strand, Brighton Marina. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout with a stylish finish and offers two double bedrooms, two ..."
"Grade II listed charm, a chic, refurbished interior and oblique views of the sea at the end of this Regency terrace are a winning combination for this spacious one bedroom apartment. Offering a sophisticated open plan lifestyle with a stylish, brand new kitchen and on trend bathroom, at the back ..."
Sixth floor one bedroom apartment NEWLY RELEASED located in Phase 1 of Home-X part of the Preston Barracks regeneration Available to move into now.
"A beautifully presented spacious one bedroom garden flat in sought after residential location just off of Elm Grove. Local shops, cafes and bus services which operate to the City centre and surrounding areas are within easy reach. BRADING ROAD - ONE BEDROOM GARDEN FLAT - £320,000 LEASEHOLD (TO..."
"Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this new to the market one bedroom apartment in the heart of Brighton, location in the highly sought after Preston Park area. This spacious one bedroom apartment has so much to offer including a fantastic living room with a large bay window,..."
"Close To Fiveways Wonderful size Two double bedroom First Floor Flat with Distant views, Close To the Popular Fiveways. Own Street entrance, Large Lounge, Kit/Breakfast room, Bathroom with Shower, Sep W.C. Benefiting from Gas Fired C.H. "
"GUIDE PRICE: £320,000--£340,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Light and spacious, this luxury two bedroom apartment with onsite parking is surrounded by greenery in the exclusive area of Preston Park which has just been given a top spot in the Sunday T..."
"* READY TO MOVE INTO NOW * This BRAND NEW one bedroom apartment comes complete with high specification finish throughout, integrated appliances and quartz worktops. Situated in central Brighton, this apartment is within close proximity to the seafront and train station."
"GUIDE PRICE: £320,000--£340,000. VACANT POSSESSION. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILBLE ON REQUEST. Withdean Court is a smart Deco development nestled in amongst mature trees on the border of Surrenden and Preston Village. This attractive two-bedroom apartment ..."
"Yopa are delighted to offer for sale this period two bedroom garden flat which is a light and bright first floor flat. The property consists of a lounge to the front aspect, kitchen/breakfast room and a bathroom to the rear and two good sized bedrooms and a garden."
AVAILABLE NOW. West facing flexi one bedroom apartment located on the third floor of this new development in Brighton's new eclectic community. MOVE IN NOW.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £314,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £475,000"
"Middleton Estates are delighted to present this neutrally decorated 2 bedroom apartment close to ""fiveways"". Positioned on the ground floor this apartment offers 2 double bedrooms, spacious living room with area for dining, separate modern kitchen and a modern family bathroo..."
Spacious ground floor two bedroom apartment situated in the heart of Brighton City Centre making it an ideal city pad. The property is located just moments away from Churchill Square Shopping Centre and Brighton Seafront and with easy reach of Brighton Mainline Station.
"*Guide price £300,000 - £325,000* Kingsmere is a popular block located near to Preston Park and Fiveways, the train station and just a short walk into the city. This apartment is located on the first floor with a passenger lift and comes with a useful garage, parking is also available. Check out ..."
"*** SHOW HOME NOW AVAILABLE*** Stunning 2 bed, first floor, new new build apartment located in a quiet close on the outskirts of Brighton. Accommodation comprises two double sized bedrooms, bathroom and open plan living/dining/kitchen area. The property also benefits from a private parking space...."
"Purpose Built | Spacious | Garage Situated on the top floor of this imposing purpose built building sits this delightful spacious two double bedroom apartment, situated in a highly desirab..."
"Well-presented 2 bed apartment, in a highly desirable area of Brighton. Accommodation is split across two floors and comprises of entrance hallway, spacious living room, recently refitted, modern kitchen area, Two double bedrooms (with the attic room being accessed via a Paddle Ladder) and family..."
"Fox & Sons are proud to bring to market this spacious ground floor garden flat. The property consists of 2 double bedrooms, living room, kitchen, bathroom and private garden."
"A very well presented top floor apartment, situated in a an extremely central position."
"An impressive two double bedroom period conversion which occupies the entire first floor of this imposing turn of the 20th Century house, on a favoured road located in the increasingly popular Elm Grove area of Brighton. Beautifully modernised throughout to a high standard, the property now enjo..."
"Located in the highly sought after village of Rottingdean this property is not one to be missed out on with its proximity to the beach, shops, pubs, and bus routes to Brighton or Eastbourne. It is the ideal home for couples or individuals to enjoy the stunning sea views from the private patio or ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000*** Terrific, one double bedroom apartment offered with no forward chain. Set within an attractive, period building is this light and bright lower ground floor flat offering brilliant room sizes throughout and the benefit of its ow..."
"Beautifully decorated, this flat is a fantastic buy! With your own street entrance into the large hallway and living space with a big bay window letting in floods of light. The sunny rear garden is low maintenance, the perfect spot to relax. Unpack your bags and move straight in, offered chain free."
Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this new to market 2 bedroom apartment in a fantastic location in Westdene. Upon entering the building you have a small flight of stairs to get to the apartment entrance located on a raised ground floor. Entering the apartment you have a be...
"*** OFFERS OVER £300,000 *** ATTRACTIVE TWO BEDROOM THIRD FLOOR APARTMENT IN KEMP TOWN, NEAR TO BRIGHTON SEAFRONT. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This period apartment is set across two floors and is very well-presented throughout. The property briefly offers a spacious open plan l..."
"This TWO bedroom RAISED GROUND FLOOR flat, ideally situated on this sought after wide avenue, just off BRIGHTON SEAFRONT and in the heart of Kemp Town village. GUIDE PRICE £300-325,000"
"Guide Price £300,000-£325,000 Avard Estate agents are delighted to offer for sale a beautiful newly renovated two bedroom first floor flat. This light and airy flat offers a large living room, a spacious separate kitchen, bathroom, separate toilet and 2 bedrooms. The living room has a be..."
"***Guide Price Of £300,000 to £320,000***
Spacious Two Bedroom Garden Flat | A fantastic opportunity to acquire a bright & extremely spacious two bedroom first floor garden flat situated in the vibrant Lewes Road area moments from all local amenities & close to Brighton City C..."
"The Weatherill Property Group are very pleased to present this VERY LARGE AND WELL LAID OUT GROUND FLOOR FLAT, offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, an IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET, positioned in Buckingham Place, roughly equidistant between PAVEMENT CAFE CULTURE AT SEVEN DIALS AND BRIGHTO..."
"Yopa are delighted to offer for sale this very well presented upper floor, two bedroom Maisonette in Brighton. The property consists of entrance hall, light and spacious lounge with bay window, two double bedrooms, separate modern fitted kitchen and bathroom."
"GUIDE PRICE: £300,000--£325,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. CHAIN FREE. Well-presented with a stylish finish throughout its generous rooms, this two-bedroom apartment has pride of place on the first floor of a grand Victorian house, givi..."
Sold With No Chain. Raised ground floor converted flat that has stunning south facing lounge with period features. Located moments from the sea and in central Kemptown.
"Chain Free! Larger than average ground floor flat with high ceilings, plenty of useful storage space and character features which is located close to Preston Park station, shops, and cafes. Also comes with allocated parking."
Cox & Co are pleased to offer this third-floor top-floor apartment in this smart purpose-built development in Brighton's Patcham district. This apartment is offered for sale in excellent decorative order throughout the accommodation is laid out as follows there is a lift service to the t...
Unleash your cosmopolitan streak and enjoy a glamorous coastal lifestyle to the full in this fabulous one bedroom loft style apartment with a chic address at the heart of Brighton’s famous North Laine. In the former Evening Argus Newspaper premises transformed into luxury apartments by awar...
A second floor apartment situated in a sought after location close to the seafront and Brighton's mainline station.
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000. A fabulous one bedroom apartment located in the centre of Brighton just moments away from the seafront / promenade."
"Guide £300,000 - £325,000 Set within this attractive 19th century property, is this bright and homely two bedroom apartment. Situated on Beaconsfield Villas, the property is less than a ten-minute walk to both Preston Park Station and London Road Station, perfect for anyone commuting to ..."
"A delightful one bedroom ground floor apartment situated in a highly sought after residential block in Rottingdean. The property benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, West facing living room, modern shower room and double bedroom. The property has communal gardens to the rear as well as an alloc..."
"This light, bright and airy flat is ideal if you work from home with as it floods with natural daylight. The small front and private rear patio garden are great for fresh air and entertaining. The living space is a good size and the flat is modern and beautifully presented throughout, a move stra..."
"Chic, secure and steps away from the beach, this sophisticated one bedroom apartment is an ideal first buy or investment, tucked away on the third floor of a beautiful Grade II building attributed to the famous Regency architects Busy and Wilds. Inside blends period proportion with a finely honed..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 *** SITUATED IN CENTRAL BRIGHTON, MOMENTS FROM THE TRAIN STATION; A WELL-PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM RAISED GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH A PATIO GARDEN, PERIOD FEATURES AND A SHARE OF FREEHOLD. Set on the raised ground floor of an at..."
"Fox & Sons are delight to market this stunning two bedroom maisonette. This property has been decorated to a high standard throughout and features two double bedrooms, spacious contemporary living space and south-facing rear garden & terrace."
Avard Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this 2 bedroom flat in this beautiful period Victorian building. The property is located in the popular tree lined Springfield Road between the Fiveways and the 'Level area' of Brighton. It is also only a stroll away from Down's junior and infant ...
"Kendrick Property Services are delighted to offer for sale this TOP FLOOR apartment located within a STONES THROW from BRIGHTON BEACH, the property also benefits from SHARE OF FREEHOLD and NO CHAIN "
"*** OFFERS OVER £300,000 *** ELEGANT TWO BEDROOM MAISONETTE IN BAY FRONTED PERIOD PROPERTY. CHAIN FREE. SOUGHT AFTER PRESTON CIRCUS LOCATION. SHORT WALK TO BRIGHTON TRAIN STATION. SOLD WITH A NEW LEASE OF 125 YEARS Conveniently situated on a quiet road near to the gre..."
"Recently converted, stunning 2 bed, lower ground floor flat located in a favourable residential area of Brighton. Accommodation comprises of a fully tiled family bathroom with bath and overhead shower, open planned kitchen/dining area with fully integrated appliances and access to the rear courty..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000*** This grand, double-fronted Victorian Villa set on a peaceful tree-lined street has great appeal. With stately bays and attractive front gardens on each side of broad steps leading to an impressive entrance and a smart front door secured by an answer ..."
A spacious two bedroom apartment with rear patio gardens situated moments from the seafront/ promenade. The property is spacious.
"Situated on the second floor, this recently refurbished flat is offered for sale with immediate vacant possession and no onward chain. The flat benefits from a share of the freehold."
"GUIDE PRICE: £300,000 - £325,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. VACANT POSSESSION. Deceptively spacious with generous room proportions, this two-bedroom duplex flat is formed from the first and second floors of a smart, low-rise purpose-built..."
"Two Bed Apartments with Integrated Appliances, Under Floor Heating & Communal Gardens Access. Available From £300,000 for a 75% Share Through Shared Ownership.Call Today for More Information!"
"Chain Free! * Guide price £300,000 - £325,000 * Ground floor flat available in quiet yet central location. Additional basement space, currently used as a studio plus direct access to sunny communal garden at the rear. Well-presented and ready to move into makes an ideal first-time purchase."
"An extremely spacious one bedroom maisonette situated in the highly desirable Clifton/Westhill area of Brighton located moments away from Brighton mainline station. The property has a large lounge/diner, spacious fitted kitchen, family bathroom. The substantial size double bedroom is located on u..."
"Well presented, two bedroom garden flat centrally located in this popular no through road with its own street entrance. Accommodation comprises of 2 bedrooms (one large double to the front of the property and one smaller double to the rear), open plan kitchen/dining area,, bathroom and entrance h..."
"Perfectly positioned pied-à-terre offered chain-free and with a 50% share in the freehold. A charming period conversion, this lower ground floor patio flat is thought to be the only one in the square and forms part of a bay fronted Victorian house, neatly tucked away to the far side of this desir..."
"A one bedroom ground floor flat, located in Albert Road within close proximity to Brighton's Mainline Station and Seven Dials."
Beautiful one bedroom flat situated on the raised ground floor of a Grade II listed Regency terraced house in the East Cliff Conservation Area.
"A light, bright tastefully decorated and well equipped 1-bedroom lower ground floor flat that is accessed from a private entrance and small patio area to the front of the property. Located in one of the few remaining Elm tree lined streets in the Queens Park Area. This Edwardian house was built..."
"One bedroom flat situated in sought after Hanover location, Queens Park with its leisure facilities as well as local schools are close by while the City centre, the seafront and main line railway station are easily accessible. ALBION HILL - ONE BEDROOM FLAT - £299,950 LEASEHOLD - VIEWING BY APPO..."
Avard Estate Agents are pleased to be able to offer for sale this 1 bedroom garden flat in Springfield Road considered to be in good order throughout and viewing is essential to appreciate this lovely home. Situated in this highly desirable location between the Fiveways and the popular 'Level are...
"The Property Shop Brighton are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful period property full of character and in the desired location of Kemptown, a stones’ throw from local shops and the beach. This first floor flat boasts two great size double bedrooms, the master benefiting from fl..."
"Brilliantly located between Brighton and Hove Stations, and just a few minutes from the beach and the city centre, sits this beautifully presented and naturally light, one-bedroom flat. It is formed from the entire first floor of an immaculate Regency townhouse, so its ceilings soar, and the room..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £297,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £450,000"
"Two Bed Apartments with Integrated Appliances, Under Floor Heating & Communal Gardens Access. Available From £296,250 for a 75% Share Through Shared Ownership. Call to View Our Homes!"
"A most attractive 2 bedroom first floor flat with useful attic room, enjoying an elevated position with open views from the front of the property, and being situated in the popular Hollingdean area close to local shops in Hollingbury Place and within a short stroll of the Fiveways community."
"PERFECT LOCATION. Wonderfully located apartment with its own private entrance and perfect size patio. One large double bedroom, separate kitchen, plenty of storage. The seafront at the bottom of the road and short stroll to Brighton Centre. Stunning finish and light and spacious."
"OIEO £295,000Jack Taggart & Co are pleased to offer you this stunning period terraced house, based in the sought after and desirable area of Hollingdean. It is in walking distance of all local amenities and not far from London Road train station, also no parking rest..."
Two bedroom apartments available through Shared Ownership. Call today to view our show homes!
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £291,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £440,000"
"Chain Free! Well-proportioned first floor flat with extra space for dining table/working from home, plus garden and loft space for storage which is in popular and friendly community of Hollingdean, just down from Fiveways with local shops, cafes and much more."
"In a sought after garden square with glittering sea views, this spacious one bedroom apartment is in prime position on the first floor of a beautiful, grade II listed Regency house with a wrought iron balcony where guests can spill out to enjoy this glamorous location between the beach and the le..."
"From the glamorous yachts at anchor to its al fresco waterfront restaurants, Brighton Marina is the go to destination of our cosmopolitan coastal resort. Stylish and secure, this two bedroom apartment with an allocated parking space has all you need for fabulous coastal lifestyle: A sophisticated..."
"Video/Face Time Tour Upon Request. Victorian period converted apartment with its own private entrance. Directly opposite Brighton College playing fields in a tranquil street yet moments away from Kemp Town Village and the seafront. Double bedroom, spacious living room with large bay window, pat..."
"This large end of terrace top floor maisonette is one not to be missed! Spacious throughout, with each room being tastefully decorated. Located on Upper Hollingdean Road, with your own front entrance, you're very well situated close to Fiveways, excellent schools and transport links."
"Offers In Excess of £290,000 A wonderful apartment, in good decorative located on Elm Grove, consisting of a large bright lounge, a spacious double bedroom, separate kitchen, and private courtyard. With excellent transport links and a short walk to the city centre, this property would be per..."
"New to the market is this two double bedroom apartment situated within the New England Quarter. The flat offers an open plan living/dining and kitchen area, a bathroom/shower/WC and a rear patio area with access to the high street. The property has huge potential. Other benefits include double gl..."
"A spacious 3 BEDROOM 2nd (top) floor PURPOSE BUILT FLAT situated in this popular development in Hollingdean. The property benefits from many features with GOOD SIZE ACCOMMODATION, gas fired heating, double glazed windows and FANTASTIC FAR REACHING VIEWS. Energy Rating: C78 Exclusive to Maslen Es..."
Well appointed two bedroom second floor apartment in heart of the historic village of Rottingdean. Very well presented with two good size double bedrooms as well as a spacious reception room. No Onward Chain. A Garage is available by separate negotiation
"A spacious and well thought out one-bedroom ground floor apartment. This home benefits from having two ports of outdoor space associated to the apartment. Moments away from Brighton's famous Queens Park as well as Hanover bustling community, this apartment certainly has a lot to offer."
"*** ASKING PRICE £285,000*** A SPACIOUS AND WELL-PRESENTED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR MAISONETTE VERY WELL-SITUATED IN PRESTON PARK. LEASEHOLD. NO ONWARD CHAIN. Set across the first and second floors of an attractive end-of-terrace period property, this ..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £281,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £425,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £280,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £425,000"
"GUIDE PRICE:£280,000--£300,000. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. A stylish interior, period features and a pretty courtyard garden come together to create this superb one-bedroom flat which is ready to move straight into. It sits in the newly regener..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £280,000-£300,000*** Built in approximately 1880, this charming, raised ground floor apartment is located in one of Brighton's most central positions. The accommodation is well laid out and each room is light and bright with original sash windows,..."
"GUIDE PRICE: £280,000--£300,000. SHARE OF FREEHOLD. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Ideal for first time buyers and buy to let investors, this smart and stylish one-bedroom flat is ready to move straight in to. It is formed from the part-lower ..."
"Perfect for first time buyers and commuters! A two bedroom flat, within a purpose built block located within walking distance of Preston Park Station."
** SUPERB GROUND FLOOR FLAT | LONG LEASE | GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION | GREAT LOCATION **
Avard Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this good sized one-bedroom lower ground floor with a patio garden forming part of this period Victorian building. Located in the popular Ditchling Rise area between the popular 'Level area'. There are local shops and cafes nearby at Preston Circ...
"***GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £300,000*** An opportunity to acquire this amazing one bedroom first floor flat apartment which has been completely renovated throughout in this brand newly converted building located in the very heart of the city centre. The property is finished is to a high s..."
"A charming maisonette in a Regency building and is is being sold with no chain with new extended lease. The flat has plenty of character including exposed brick work, a feature fire place, wooden roof beams. It also has access to highly regarded Kemp Town Enclosures."
"A very well presented first floor apartment in walking distance to a variety of shops, restaurants, and Preston Park. With an abundance of natural light through the beautiful bay window into the open plan lounge/kitchen area is the social space."
"GUIDE PRICE : £280,000 - £300,000. VIEWING BY APPOINTMENT ONLY. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. VACANT POSSESSION. CHAIN FREE. Beautifully renovated with bright, spacious rooms and far-reaching views across the city to the..."
"OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £280,000 Calling all Investors...perfect buy to let. A two bedroom, ground floor flat, within a purpose built block located within walking distance of Preston Park Station. With two large double bedrooms, a generous lounge, separate kitchen and direct access to communal ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £290,000*** A WONDERFULLY PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH FANTASTIC PRIVATE COURTYARD WALLED SOUTH FACING GARDEN. LOCATED IN KEMPTOWN MOMENTS FROM THE SEAFRONT. This beautifully decorated apartment offers a large centr..."
"A one bedroom top floor flat forming part of a converted property located on one of the city centres most highly sought after areas. Offering easy access to Brighton's mainline station, which is considered ideal for commuters."
"Nestled in a quiet private road, this 2 bedroom flat benefits from all of the amenities that Lewes Road and Hollingdean have to offer. Yet being off-set from the main road, the property makes a quiet and peaceful home with such additional features as a private off-street parking space, and both a..."
"A modern and bright basement flat with a private garden. Located in central Brighton in Franklin Road, walking distance to local amenities in Lewes road. Chain free, this property is ready to move into, no work required its already modernised and redecorated to a high standard. Private e..."
"GUIDE PRICE : £280,000 - £300,000. CHAIN FREE. INTERNAL VIEWINGS AVAILABLE ON REQUEST. Preston Village remains one of the most highly sought-after areas to live in Brighton, as it is quiet, leafy and is well connected to both the city and London. This ..."
"Offered to the market CHAIN FREE!A generous one bedroom garden flat situated within a convenient central location and within close proximity to mainline rail services from London Road Station.The surrounding is offers an excellent variety of stores, services and popular restaurants and pubs a..."
A one bedroom first floor apartment forming part of a period terraced building located opposite the recently renovated Victoria Gardens just to the North of the Royal Pavilion.
"This bright and modern one bedroom flat sits in the heart of Brighton creative zone; The North Laine, where streets of boutique shops, fashionable bars and an antique emporiums lead the way through the city centre towards the sea. EPC: TBC Council Tax: A"
"TRUEMANS - ***Guide Price - £280,000 - £300,000*** A stylish and spacious one-bedroom apartment within the prestigious Argus Lofts building situated right in the heart of the North Laines. Offering sophisticated city living, this property is in immaculate condition throughout with solid ..."
"Three Bed Townhouse's in Bright & Bubbly Brighton, Available from £227,500 for a 50% Share Through Shared Ownership | Call to View for More information!"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £275,000 - £300,000 *** WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM FREEHOLD HOUSE IN SOUGHT AFTER CENTRAL BRIGHTON LOCATION CLOSE TO SEA FRONT. NO ONWARD CHAIN. Situated in the Regency Square conservation area and surrounded by some of the best examples of Bright..."
"** NEW LISTING ** Purplebricks Brighton are delighted to offer for sale this new to market two bedroom converted apartment in this ever popular location near Preston Park. Set out over the top two floor this spacious apartment consists of two double bedrooms, a separate kitchen, a spacious yet ..."
"A fabulous first floor one bedroom apartment situated in the heart of the South Lanes in central Brighton moments from the seafront/ promenade, Brighton Mainline Station and all of the cities popular restaurants, cafes, bars, shops and boutiques."
"Big and bright with an easy flow, this sociable one bedroom apartment is a 4 minute walk from both the beach at the bottom of the hill and Queen’s Park at the top, and the vibrant bars and al fresco lifestyle of St James’s Street are in between – but out of hearing! On the groun..."
"This wonderful purpose built ground floor apartment features its own private patio, secure allocated underground parking and storage space as well as light, spacious living accommodation throughout and all of this in such a sought after residential located in Preston Park!"
"Jacobs Steel are delighted to offer for sale this top floor two double bedroom apartment positioned just off Marine Parade in central Brighton, benefitting from direct sea views."
"Situated in the Clifton Hill & Montpelier Conservation area, this apartment has been fantastically looked after by the current owner. Having been the sole owner, the property has remained in excellent condition."
"*** ASKING PRICE £275,000 *** CENTRALLY LOCATED IN BRIGHTON, CLOSE TO THE AMENITIES OF LEWES ROAD; A GOOD-SIZED ONE BEDROOM RAISED GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH A GENEROUS REAR GARDEN. SHARE OF FREEHOLD. Encompassing the entire ground floor of an end-of-terrace period b..."
"** Guide Price £275,000 - £300,000 ** A beautifully presented one bedroom apartment with al large garden and its own street entrance, close to London Road station."
"***Guide Price of £275,000 - £300,000*** Spacious Purpose Built City Centre Apartment With Parking Space & Communal Roof Terrace. This fantastic first floor purpose built apartment offers spacious, redecorated living accommodation and an off road parking space situated in the heart ..."
"Forming part of a charming, Victorian terrace, this bright and spacious apartment makes for an ideal first home or investment and has the added bonus of a brilliant sized rear garden. Being raised ground floor, the bay window of the living room allows for heaps of natural sunlight to ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £275,000-£300,000 *** A GOOD-SIZED TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR PURPOSE-BUILT APARTMENT WITH OFF-STREET PARKING SITUATED IN KEMP TOWN. OFFERED WITH A SHARE OF FREEHOLD AND NO ONWARD CHAIN. Conveniently located a short walk away from the bustling cafes and..."
Kendrick Property Services are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 2 bedroom apartment located just off London Road. The property is located on a quiet private road and is ideal if you are a commuter or like being central without the hustle and bustle. 
"This is the one you've been waiting for! An extremely spacious first floor two bedroom split level apartment which is only a stone's throw away from all the main high street shops, restaurants, pubs and supermarkets."
"Three Bed Townhouse's in Bright & Bubbly Brighton, Available from £272,500 for a 50% Share Through Shared Ownership | Call to View Now!"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £271,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £410,000"
"Fourth floor flat with stunning all round sea views. Brighton Marina and the seafront at your fingertips, this beautifully presented light and spacious flat is a perfectly positioned. Situated across from the marina and close to all that Kemp Town has to offer. With lifts to all floors, all ages ..."
"Chic and stylish, this luxury one bedroom apartment is in a prime location opposite the fountains and lawns of Victoria Gardens and just one minute from the Royal Pavilion and its surrounding arts venues. Benefiting from the recent re-routing of traffic, this is a surprisingly quiet retreat with ..."
"1 Bed Ground floor Flat located in a highly popular residential area of Brighton. Accommodation comprises of entrance hall, lounge area, double bedroom, kitchen and bathroom with bath and overhead shower. The property benefits from no onward chain and own garden. Located in a popular r..."
"A well presented one bedroom second floor apartment set within an attractive modern building (circa 2009). Moments away from everything Brighton has to offer. Ideal for couples, singles as well as for those looking for a buy to let investment. Central Brighton location; with The North Laine, Qu..."
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £280,000 Lextons is delighted to bring to market this stunning one-bedroom split level apartment, situated on Vernon Terrace. The property has been fully refurbished to very high standard and can be found within this elegant mid 19th-Century building in the heart o..."
"Built in 2014 and well looked after since, this flat is a good size with balcony that offers sea views during the day and lovely sunset views come evening. Communal bike storage, communal roof gardens. Ideal first time buy."
"***GUIDE PRICE £270,000-£300,000*** Offered CHAIN FREE is this fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautiful, two double bedroom apartment situated in the heart of Brighton Marina just moments from the waterfront; this super apartment offers a seaside lifestyle and enjoys e..."
"** 2 BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT WITH GARAGE ** A 2 bedroom flat in a purpose built block situated in a popular residential area of Brighton just of Ditchling Road, close to London Road mainline train station and near Preston Park. Ideal for local primary schools and secondary schools in the area. AVA..."
*NEEDS WORK* POSSIBLE INVESTMENT Two bedroom purpose built flat that is being sold with no chain. It has stunning views of the sea and down the coast and the building benefits from having a lift. The lounge is a good size and has plenty of space for dining table and chair.
"Ginger & Sanders are delighted to offer this SUPERB CITY CENTRE FLAT IN THE HEART OF BRIGHTON. Close to shops, sea, and transport links. The property comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, double bedroom, and family bathroom. The property further benefits from private rear courtyard cont.."
A fantastic one bedroom flat tucked away in a peaceful purpose-built development off of London Road
Stunning period conversion. First floor balcony apartment with fantastic sea views ideal for relaxing after a hard day at the beach. Double bedroom with plenty of room for furniture. Spacious lounge. Separate kitchen and shower room. Just off Brighton seafront and near Brighton City Centre. Chain...
"An elegant bijou apartment located within a stones throw of the Kemptown Enclosures and the beach. A few steps from the cafes and shops of St. James Street, and the famous pier , The apartment itself is neat and graceful, with high ceilings, sash windows and a fireplace. The property ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £265,000 - £275,000 *** Robert Luff & Co are delighted to bring to market this fantastic one bedroom ground floor apartment located in the ever popular Elm Grove / Hanover area. Accommodation currently offers one bedroom, living area with period features, separate kitchen..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £264,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £400,000"
"In a sought after location of New Steine with the sea just a short walk away, this spacious one bedroom apartment is in prime position on the ground floor . An ideal first purchase or rental, the property comprises of a spacious Lounge/Diner with sea views out of the beautiful bay window, a large..."
"*** SHOW HOME NOW AVAILABLE*** Stunning 1 bed, Lower Ground Floor, new build apartment located in a quiet close on the outskirts of Brighton. Accommodation comprises double sized bedroom, bathroom and open plan living/dining/kitchen area. The property also benefits from a private rear garden."
"An ATTRACTIVE one bedroom RAISED GROUND FLOOR FLAT with direct access to a SHARED REAR GARDEN, close to Brighton mainline station and POPULAR SEVEN DIALS with a selection of bars, restaurants and shops. The property retains SOME ORIGINAL FEATURES including internal doors, high skirtings, ceiling..."
"This 2 bedroom flat is located in a highly sought after and central location. Accommodation comprises of entrance hall, with built in storage, 2 large double bedrooms, bathroom, with bath and over-head shower, separate WC, Kitchen and separate Lounge dining area with access to a balcony. The apar..."
"Fantastic Sea Views. Two double bedroom sixth floor apartment situated very close to employers such as American Express and the Royal Sussex County Hospital as well as offering easy access to Brighton City Centre and local shops, restaurants and bars on St James Street. "
"MyHaus Brighton welcome you to Montpelier street, a one bedroom apartment offering the chance to put your own stamp on the property. This apartment comprising of a large living room, kitchen, bathroom, bedroom and courtyard style garden is located in central Brighton and would be a fantas..."
With fantastic views over Withdean Park and a south facing balcony this two bedroom apartment near Preston Park Station is not one to be missed. This sought after block features communal gardens and residents parking along with a passenger lift providing access to all floors. Internally the apart...
**TOP FLOOR SPLIT LEVEL 2 BEDROOM FLAT | DESIRABLE LOCATION | NO CHAIN | IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR BUY TO LET INVESTMENT**
"A stylish retreat with shops and cafes on the doorstep and the sea just two blocks down, this one bedroom apartment with precious outside space is a great first time buy or high end investment within a 15 walk from the County Hospital (or 7 by bus). With a bright east/west orientation, on the gro..."
An Excellent Newly Refurbished One Bedroom Basement Garden flat with its own Private Entrance in a quiet sought-after Cul-de-Sac in a popular Kemptown location.
"An Excellent Newly Refurbished One Bedroom Basement Garden flat with its own Private Entrance in a quiet sought-after Cul-de-Sac in a popular Kemptown location. This delightful one-bedroom flat is an ideal first-time purchase or investment opportunity and offers a front patio garden, private..."
Fox & Sons are delighted to offer for sale a one bedroom flat forming part of a purpose built block located on the corner of Buckingham Road and Dyke Road in the centre of the city.
"This well presented one double bedroom apartment situated in central Kemp Town. The property benefits from a modern kitchen area with granite work surfaces, a modern shower room and is located close to Kemp Town seafront."
"Lovely First Floor One Bedroom flat located in the heart of bustling Kemp Town. Situated on George Street it is moments from the American Express building and a short stroll into the city centre and station and RSCH. The light and airy double bedroom with bed, great built in wardrobe and acce..."
Scope For Improvement. Avard Estate Agents are pleased to be able to offer for sale this 2-bedroom ground floor flat with a patio garden situated in the highly regarded Roundhill conservation area located between the Fiveways and the popular 'Level area'. This property also benefits from...
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a two double bedroom second floor apartment in need of modernisation and refurbishment, sold with a remainder of 999 lease."
"Regency period converted third floor apartment. Perfectly placed at the rear of the building for tranquillity is this bright and spacious one bedroom apartment. High ceilings and sash windows, separate kitchen, spacious living room and access to the Private Residents Sussex Square Gardens. Just o..."
